(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ python main.py
“Comment below and let us know why or why not!”
“Tell us, HollywoodLifers — Do YOU think that Miley and Liam got married over the holidays?”
“Interestingly enough, she posted a picture of Liam’s relatives on Instagram and referred to them as her “in-laws” — sparking rumors that the pair might have had a secret wedding.”
“As if all of this wasn’t adorable enough, Miley “couldn’t help but get very emotional,” adding that she definitely “teared up” during the top secret event.”
“Yes, that does sound exactly like we would expect a Miley Cyrus wedding to be!”
“For the ceremony, Miley and Liam reportedly had soft chants playing in the background, incense burning, and Christmas lights strung up.”
““There were touching words about how they were each other’s soul mates.” Aw!”
“...for it They wrote the vows themselves the source revealed...”
“More details about the alleged wedding include that there were only 10 loved ones in attendance and that it was all spur of the moment A source added Liam and Miley really love each other and have talked about tying the knot for so long they decided to just go...”
““It was very psychedelic and hippie-esque, exactly what you’d imagine a Miley Cyrus wedding to be!” HollywoodLife.com has reached out to reps for Miley and Liam regarding this report.”


"Please comment below and let us know why!"
"Tell us, Hollywood stars - do you think Miley and Liam got married on holiday?"
"Interestingly, she posted photos of Liam's relatives on instagram and called them her" in laws "- sparking rumors that they might have a secret wedding."
"It seems that none of this is cute enough, Miley" can't help being very excited. "She also said that in this top secret activity, she must be" full of tears. "
"Yes, as like as two peas Miley Cyrus's wedding!"
At the wedding, Miley and Liam played soft hymns, burned incense and hung up Christmas lights in the background, according to reports
"Touching words about how they became each other's soul mates." Ah
“… They wrote their own vows, the source said
"More details about the so-called wedding, including that only 10 relatives were present, were all impulsive. A source added that Liam and Millie really fell in love and decided to get married after talking for so long..."
"It's a very psychedelic and hippie style. It's what you think of as a Miley Cyrus wedding!" Hollywood life has contacted representatives of Miley and Liam for this report. "



Number  1
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments section below!”
““The one silver lining about having to share the kids this Christmas is that she and Blake will get a chance to have some extra time for themselves.”
“Here’s all the EXCLUSIVE details!”
“Christmas is right around the bend and we’re hearing that this year Blake Shelton, 42, has made some arrangements to ensure he and his ladylove Gwen Stefani‘s, 48, Christmas is truly unforgettable!”
““Gwen is going to be sharing the kids with Gavin [Rossdale] this Christmas,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““It’s going to be a bit of a juggling act because she still wants her time with them too, but they’ll make it work.”
“Blake’s going to be by her side and she’s planning to throw a big party at her place again this year.” Head here to take a look back at Gwen and Blake’s relationship in photos!”
“The insider went on to add that once the kids are with her ex, they’re planning to make the most of their time alone!”
“Gwen loves her kids so much and will miss them dearly when they are with their dad.”
“HollywoodLifers, are you loving these juicy details as much as us?!”


"Please let us know in the comments section below!"
"The silver lining of spending Christmas with the kids this year is that she and Blake will have a chance to give themselves more time."
"Here are all the exclusive details!"
"Christmas is just around the corner. We heard that Blake Sheldon, 42, has made some arrangements to make sure his Christmas with his 48 year old lover Gwen Stefani is really unforgettable!"
"Gwen is going to have a baby with Gavin this Christmas," a source told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life
"It will be a juggling act because she still wants her time with them, but they will make it work."
"Black will be with her and she plans to have another big party at her house this year." Come here and see the relationship between Gwen and Blake in the photo
Once the children are with her ex, they plan to make the most of their time alone, "the person added
"Gwen loves her children so much that when they are with Dad, she will miss them very much."
"Holly bug, do you like these interesting details as much as we do?"



Number  2
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“People disagree on what actual facts are.”
“MERYL STREEP We don’' know where north is.”
“"She owned [The Post].”
“"This is why she was different," says Pascal of Graham.”
“...lot for a wide ranging discussion about the Fox picture which opens Dec 22 and the issues it raises...”
“On Nov 28 THR gathered Spielberg 70 and some of the key women who worked on the film first time screenwriter Liz Hannah 31 producer and former Sony chief Amy Pascal 59 Streep 62 and the director s longtime producer Kristie Macosko Krieger 47 in his offices on the Universal...”
“Nearly half a century after she made her momentous choice, Graham's tale is at last told (she was infamously excluded from the 1976 Watergate drama All the President's Men).”
“Graham now faced a terrible dilemma: Go ahead with the Post's article and risk imprisonment or withhold and silence the truth.”
“(The New York Times had broken the story on the report, which revealed that America was losing the Vietnam War, but a court had ruled it couldn't publish more about the top-secret documents.)”
“The $50 million-plus Post tells the story of how Graham gave the green light to her editor Ben Bradlee (Tom Hanks) to report on the Pentagon Papers in 1971.”


"People disagree about what the actual situation is."
"Meryl Streep, we don't know where the north is."
"She has the position."
"That's why she's different," said Graham's Pascal
“…… There has been a lot of discussion about the fox film released on December 22 and the problems it raises... "
"On November 28, Spielberg, 70, got together in the offices of the world wide web with Amy Pascal, former Sony CEO, 31 year old producer and screenwriter of the first time, 59 year old Streep and 47 year old longtime producer Christie mcosco Krieg..."
"Nearly half a century after she made a big choice, Graham's story is finally told (she was notoriously excluded from the president's hands in Watergate in 1976)
"Graham now faces a terrible dilemma: continue to write the post, risk imprisonment, or hide the truth and remain silent."
(the New York Times reported that the United States was defeated in the Vietnam War, but a court ruled that it could not publish more information about top secret documents.)
"This $50 million post tells how Graham gave the green light to her editor Ben Bradley (Tom Hanks) in 1971 to cover Pentagon documents."



Number  3
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A number of royals were invited to the event since it started in 2014, but Middleton had never been to it.”
“Also, Queen Elizabeth II invited the Duke and Duchess of Sussex to the Queen's Young Leaders Awards ceremony.”
“In fact, the two have a great relationship.”
“"She has developed an increasingly close, warm relationship with [both] the queen and her father-in-law, Prince Charles," the insider said.”
“"She wants to please them and is doing whatever she can to educate herself to make sure she doesn't put a foot wrong."”
“This news comes after the National Enquirer reported that the "British monarchy is open to modernizing."”
“However, Markle's "tacky Hollywood-princess style is not what the royal family had in mind."”
“The tabloid alleged that Markle's diva behavior has gotten under everyone's skin.”
“The unidentified source said that the Queen has "told Prince Harry to give his bossy bride a 'shape up or else' ultimatum because she's wrecked his credibility."”
“The insider added that the Queen called Markle to her chambers and reprimanded her about her fashion.”


"Since 2014, many members of the royal family have been invited to participate in this event, but Middleton has never participated in it."
In addition, Elizabeth II also invited the Duke of Sussex and his wife to participate in the Queen's Youth Leadership Award Presentation Ceremony
"Actually, they have a good relationship."
"Her relationship with the queen and her father-in-law, Prince Charles, is getting closer and warmer," the source said
"She wants to please them and is doing her best to educate herself and make sure she doesn't make mistakes."
"The news came after the National Enquirer reported that" the British monarchy is open to modernization. "
However, Marcel's "tacky Hollywood princess style is not what the royal family wants."
"The tabloid claimed that markel's heroine's behavior has been deeply rooted in the hearts of the people."
The unidentified source said the queen had "told Prince Harry to give an ultimatum to his overbearing bride or she would ruin his reputation."
"The person also said that the queen called markel to her room and scolded her for her fashion."



Number  4
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I am about to be nuzzled by the largest land animal on Earth.”
“We hold our breath, grit our teeth and fall silent as they get closer.”
“...www.oryxphotography.com Play slideshow Penny Robartes, ORYX 1 of 17 As a wildlife photographer, I constantly have to be aware of the scene around the subject I'm wanting to photograph.”
“African wildlife up close and personal Mon, June 6, 2016 Penny Robartes, a Photo Tour Leader for ORYX captured these stunning up close and personal wildlife images.”
“Despite (and very probably because of) being at risk of predators, he seems to notice the smallest of movements in the distance – he’s an expert at finding exotic shapes, everything from hippos and lone giraffes to zebras.”
“The tracker perched on the bonnet with his rifle is much better at it.”
“There are rustles and strange sounds in the long grass but I can’t see any animals.”
“Picking our way through the bush it’s difficult to spot anything.”
“While the park is home to 147 species, the main draw is the Big Five – that’s lion, leopard, elephant, rhino and buffalo.”
“Thousands of animals roam this vast space, an area roughly the size of Scotland.”


"I'm about to be snobbered by the largest land animal on earth."
"We held our breath and clenched our teeth. When they came near, we kept silent."
“... www.oryxphotography.com Slide show penny robartes, Oryx 1 of 17 as a wildlife photographer, I always have to pay attention to the scenes around the subject I want to shoot. "
"On Monday, June 6, 2016, African wildlife close up and personal photos were taken by Bonnie robats, the photo guide of the gazelle
"Despite the danger of being attacked by predators, he seems to have noticed the smallest movement in the distance - he is an expert in looking for strange shapes, from hippos to giraffes to zebras."
"It's a lot better to sit on the hood with a rifle on the tracker than he is."
"There are rustles and strange sounds on the grass, but I can't see any animals."
"Groping through the bushes, it's hard to find anything."
"Although there are 147 species of animals in the park, the five main species that attract tourists are lions, leopards, elephants, rhinoceros and buffaloes."
Thousands of animals roam in this vast space, about the size of Scotland



Number  5
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'She was touching his arm a lot and flicking her hair over her shoulder,' the onlooker said of the 53-year-old supermodel, adding: 'There was a lot of flirting going on.'”
“Another rumour: Meanwhile according to New Idea, Elle Macpherson has also been spotted cosying up to actor Brad during a recent rendezvous in Hollywood'They definitely seemed cosy together, like a couple on an intimate date,' the publication's source claimed on Monday.”
“Sienna's representatives have also been contacted.”
“A representative for Brad declined to comment when approached by MailOnline.”
“I couldn't believe it - they were kissing in the VIP section of the Rabbit Hole.'”
“Party girl: Sienna headed to Glasto with her pals including Poppy Delevingne but according to a new report she met up with Brad in the early hours of SaturdayAnother onlooker told Daily Star Online: 'Brad and Sienna were looking very cosy.”
“Bradley Cooper left and Brad and Sienna headed back arm in arm to their private Winnebego.'”
“'The party was cut short and they had to leave after five minutes because the venue was closing.”
“...explaining They seemed keen to get away from prying eyes and made a dash for the Rabbit Hole the festival s underground and exclusive venue with a group of friends and were inseparable as they waited to go inside...”
“Intimate Both Sienna and Brad were among the A list contingent who descended on the UK s Somerset event for a weekend of music The insider added that Brad who up until then was keeping a low profile at the world famous festival looked delighted to meet up with Sienna...”


The 53 year old supermodel said: "she often stroked his arm and put her hair on her shoulder." "There were a lot of people flirting," she added
Another rumor: at the same time, according to new ideas, Al McPherson was found making out with actor Brad during a recent date in Hollywood. The magazine's source said on Monday that they looked absolutely close together, like a couple on a close date
"Siena's representative has also been contacted."
"A representative of Brad declined to comment in an interview with mailonline."
"I can't believe it - they kiss in the VIP area of rabbit hole."
"Party girl: Siena and her friends went to Glaston, including Bobbie delaviny, but according to the latest report, she met Brad early Saturday morning, and another bystander told the Daily Star Online:" Brad and Siena look very close. "
"Bradley Cooper is gone, and Brad and Sienna go back to their private Winnebago hand in hand."
"The party was interrupted and they had to leave in five minutes because it was closing."
“…… They explained that they seem to want to avoid prying eyes and rush to rabbit hole, the underground and exclusive venue of the festival, together with a group of friends. They are inseparable when waiting to enter... "
"Close Sienna and Brad are both members of group A at the weekend of the Somerset Music Festival in the UK. People familiar with the matter added that Brad, who had kept a low profile at world-famous music festivals before, was very happy to meet Siena... "



**Something goes wrong**
“CNN reports...”
“...case a month ago The back and forth about Pitt s child support payments In legal documents filed on August 7 Jolie s attorney claimed Pitt has paid no meaningful child support since separation Jolie also asked the court to order Pitt to pay her the money she is owed...”
“That “incident,” which reportedly involved Pitt and son Maddox Jolie-Pitt, is said to be what prompted Jolie to file for divorce.”
“Back in September 2016, we learned that an “incident” reportedly went down on a private plane, and that the Los Angeles Department of Child and Family Services and FBI got involved.”
“So what went wrong?”
“They were involved for 12 years, and had six kids and a French vineyard together.”
“But despite their, erm, salacious start, Pitt and Jolie proved to be the real deal.”
“Eventually, he and Aniston split up, and his relationship with Jolie (officially) came to light.”
“Rumors about what may or may not have gone down between Pitt and Jolie on set ran rampant.”
“The pair met while filming Mr. and Mrs. Smith in 2004 — back when Pitt was still married to Jennifer Aniston.”


"CNN report..."
“…… In the case one month ago, before and after Pitt paid child support in the legal document submitted on August 7, Julie's lawyer claimed that Pitt did not pay any meaningful child support because Julie also asked the court to order Pitt to pay the money she owed... "
It is reported that the "incident" between Pitt and her son, Maddox Jolie Pitt, is the reason for Julie's divorce
"As early as September 2016, we learned that there was a reported" incident "in a private plane, involving the Los Angeles Department of children and family services and the FBI."
"What's wrong?"
"They've been dating for 12 years, with six children and a French vineyard."
"But, even though they, er, started off as lewd, Pete and Julie proved to be a real deal."
"In the end, he broke up with Aniston and his relationship with Julie came to light."
"There's a lot of talk about what happened or didn't happen to Pete and Julie on the set."
"The couple met when filming the Smiths in 2004, when Pitt was still married to Jennifer Aniston."



Number  7
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Kourtney does not like the influence Sofia has over the kids and she does not want the kids getting attached to someone that Kourtney feels will not be around or a part of their lives for very long,””
““Kourtney does not believe Sofia and Scott will stay together long-term and so she asked Sofia to respectfully back off from spending so much time with her children,” a Kardashian insider shared with us EXCLUSIVELY.”
“HL learned exclusively, she’s desperate for her sis to end it.”
“For one, she thinks he’s ‘way too old!’Turns out, Lionel Richie, 68, isn’t the only family member who’s not on board with Sofia Richie, 19, and Scott Disick‘s, 34, relationship.”
“Sofia’s big sister, Nicole Richie, 36, is not a fan at all of their “unhealthy” romance, and she’s apparently been pleading with her sis to break up with the reality star — before things go too far.”
“Being a mom herself, Nicole is especially concerned about Scott and Kourtney Kardashian‘s, 38, kids, as Sofia has recently been spending time with them.”
“For the fashion designer, that’s a major red flag!”
“Click here to see adorable pics of Kourtney and Scott’s three children.”
““ Nicole has reached out to her sister Sofia, pleading with her to end her unhealthy relationship with Scott,” a source close to Nicole shared with HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““ Nicole worries that Scott and his bad-boy ways, are a bad influence on her much younger little sister.”


"Courtney doesn't like Sophia's influence on children. She doesn't want children to be attached to someone who Courtney doesn't think will be around or part of their life for a long time."
"Courtney didn't believe Sophia and Scott would be together for a long time, so she asked Sophia not to spend so much time with her children," an exclusive Kardashian insider told us
"I know she really wants her sister to end this."
"First of all, she thought he was too old! It turns out that Lionel Ritchie, 68, is not the only family member not with Sophia Ritchie, 19, and Scott Disick, 34
"Sophia's eldest sister, Nicole Richie, 36, is not a fan of their" unhealthy "relationship at all. She has obviously been pleading with her sister to break up with reality TV stars - before things go too far."
As a mother, Nicole is particularly concerned about Scott and Courtney Kardashian, 38, because Sophia has been with them recently
"For fashion designers, it's a major danger sign!"
"Click here to see cute pictures of Courtney and Scott's three children."
"Nicole has reached out to her sister Sophia and begged her to end her unhealthy relationship with Scott," a source close to Nicole told reporters
"Nicole worries about Scott and his bad boy's way of being a bad influence on her sister much younger."



Number  8
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Kylie and Travis as a couple?”
“Kylie and Travis, as well as the Kardashian family have yet to confirm the baby news.”
“After apparently missing this year’s Kardashian Christmas, where his girlfriend, Kylie Jenner was, is Trav about to reunite with his girl?”
“See this mysterious photo…Christmas may have came late for Travis Scott, 25, and Kylie Jenner, 20.”
“After he’s been traveling all over, playing shows for packed crowds, the rapper is finally headed “home,” wherever that may be.”
“Travis took to Snapchat on December 27, to show his followers — and most likely, Kylie Jenner — that he had boarded a private plane and will “make it home to ya one way or another.” So, who really was his caption directed at?”
“— Our guess is his reported pregnant girlfriend, who was seemingly without her baby daddy on Christmas.”
“While some reports claim Travis was present at Kris Jenner‘s annual Christmas eve party, he was nowhere to be found in photos; Yet, Kylie, who has been M.I.A., since the news of her pregnancy broke, was surprisingly photographed.”
“The stars came out for the momager’s annual bash, but, Travis wasn’t seen, as far as we know.”
“However, Khloe Kardashian, 33, who proudly showed off her growing baby bump in a beaded jumpsuit, and the rest of the K-fam danced the night away to Travis’ tracks.”


"Hollywood star, do you think Kelly and Travis are a couple?"
"Kelly and Travis, as well as Kardashian's family, have not confirmed the baby
It's clear that Tel Aviv missed this year's Kardashian Christmas. His girlfriend, Kelly Jenner, is there. Is Tel Aviv going to be reunited with his girlfriend? "
"Look at this mysterious picture Travis Scott, 25, and Kelly Jenner, 20, may be late for Christmas
"After he traveled around the world and performed for the crowd, the rapper finally" went home, "no matter where he was."
Travis went to snapchat on December 27 to show his followers - probably Kelly Jenner - that he had boarded a private plane and would "return to your home in one way or another.". So, whose are his subtitles aimed at? "
"We guess it's his pregnant girlfriend who doesn't seem to have her baby dad at Christmas."
"Although it is reported that Travis attended Chris Jenner's annual Christmas Eve party, he can't be found in the photo; however, Kelly, who has been working as M.I.A. since the news of pregnancy, was accidentally photographed."
"The stars came out to mother's annual party, but, as far as we know, Travis didn't show up."
"However, Khloe Kardashian, 33, wore a beaded jumpsuit and proudly displayed her growing lump, while the rest of k-fam danced in Travis's footsteps all night."



Number  9
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“A post shared by Beylite (@beylite) on Nov 17, 2017 at 6:11pm PSTHollywoodLifers, do you think it was wise of Kanye to skip a confrontation with Beyoncé at Serena’s wedding?”
“A post shared by Beylite (@beylite) on Nov 17, 2017 at 6:41pm PST#SerenaWilliamsWedding.”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details that he wanted to avoid an awkward run-in with Beyoncé at all costs.”
“There’s a good reason that Kanye West, 40, skipped the celebrity wedding of the season when tennis great Serena Williams married Reddit founder Alexis Ohanian, 35 in a lavish New Orleans wedding on Nov. 16.”
“While wife Kim Kardashian, 37, attended the big event, he knew that Serena’s close pal Beyonce, 36, was going to be on hand and he didn’t want an awkward confrontation.”
“Especially after he dragged Bey and hubby JAY-Z, 47, so viciously during a Sacramento concert in Nov. of 2016.”
““It was no accident that Kanye chose to avoid Serena’s wedding.”
“Kanye is not particularly close with Serena, or her husband, who are more Kim’s friends so Kanye opted out of what he felt may be an awkward evening for him.”
“Kanye knew that Beyoncé, a close friend of Serena’s, would likely be at the wedding which might make for an uncomfortable situation,” a Yeezy insider tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““Kanye still has a lot of unresolved issues with Beyoncé and her husband.”


"A post shared by beylite (@ beylite) on November 17, 2017 at 6:11 p.m. in Hollywood lifers, do you think it is wise for Kanye to skip the confrontation with Beyonc é at Serena's wedding?"
"A post shared by beylite (@ beylite) at 6:41 p.m. PST on November 17, 2017 # Serena Williams wedding."
"We have exclusive details and he wants to avoid embarrassing running in with Beyonce at all costs."
"Kanye West, 40, married Alexis Ohanian, 35, founder of reddit, at a grand wedding in New Orleans on November 16, which is a good reason that she didn't attend this season's Celebrity Wedding."
"Although his 37 year old wife, Kim Kardashian, was present at the event, he knew that Serena's 36 year old close friend Beyonce would be there, and he didn't want to be embarrassed."
"Especially at a concert in Sacramento in November 2016, he dragged Bei, 47, and her husband Jay-Z so viciously."
"It's no accident that Kanye chose to avoid Serena's wedding."
"Kanye is not particularly close to Serena or her husband because Serena and Kim are friends, so Kanye chose to leave because he thought it might be very embarrassing tonight."
"Kanye knows that Beyonce, Serena's close friend, is likely to be at the wedding, which could make for an uncomfortable situation," a yeezy insider told Hollywood Life exclusive
"Kanye has a lot of unsolved problems with Beyonce and her husband."



Number  10
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Her first solo walk was Sunday, and today, she was snapped leaving her place in a very floral print romper and Kate Spade snakeskin backpack.”
“And after breakup rumors started spreading among fans Swift also took the opportunity to make a statement about the status of her and Joe Alwyn s relationship through her necklace choice Splash News Getty Images Fans were worried that Alwyn and Swift had hit a rough patch when photos of...”
“...her Sunday look a Faith Connexion dress Elie Saab sunglasses a Stella McCartney bag and Jimmy Choo knee high boots below very visibly didn t include Swift wearing her silver J pendant necklace the one she appears to be wearing again today above...”
“Splash NewsSwift always wears the necklace as a tribute to her boyfriend and their so-happily-private romance.”
“She explained everything about the necklace in her song, "Call It What You Want" with the lyrics, ""I want to wear his initial on a chain round my neck/Chain round my neck/Not because he owns me/But 'cause he really knows me."”
“Swift told some fans that all of Reputation's love songs were about Alwyn.”
“LaineyGossip pointed out that Sunday was just the second time Swift had been seen without her necklace; she also didn't wear it while performing last Tuesday in Maryland either.”
“Maybe that meant something since Swift thinks about the details with her image; maybe it doesn't because it's just a necklace.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Her first solo walk was on Sunday, and today she was photographed leaving her home in floral jumpsuits and Kate Spade's snakeskin backpack."
"After the rumor of breaking up began to spread among fans, swift also took this opportunity to make a statement through the necklace she chose to explain the relationship between her and Joe Alvin, which aroused the concern of fans because of the photos of Alvin and swift
“… Her Sunday look faith connexion dress, Elie Saab sunglasses, Stella McCartney bag and Jimmy Choo knee high boots obviously don't include swift wearing her silver J Pendant Necklace, and she seems to be wearing another one today... "
"Splash newswift always wears this necklace to pay tribute to her boyfriends and their happy personal relationship."
"She explained everything about the necklace in her song" whatever you say. "I want to wear his initials on the necklace around my neck, not because he owns me, but because he really knows me," she wrote
"Swift told some fans that all the love songs of fame are about Alvin."
"Lainey gossip pointed out that Sunday was the second time swift didn't wear a necklace; she didn't wear a necklace when she performed in Maryland last Tuesday."
"Maybe it means something, because swift considers the details with her image; maybe not, because it's just a necklace."



Number  11
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“We guess time will tell.”
“While attending his launch party for Privé Revaux in NYC, the 39-year-old actress arrived separately — and a few guests thought they spotted a baby bump!”
““Now she feels like all their time spent hiding was well worth it.”Some fans are convinced that Katie is already carrying Jamie’s child.”
“...years...”
“For years she has wanted Jamie to be her husband and has wanted to give her daughter Suri a brother or sister and now Jamie s ready to give that all to her a second source previously shared of the couple who ve attempted to hide their relationship for four...”
““This is a dream come true for Katie.”
“And that’s reflected in her look and style: “They joke that Katie needs a makeover!”The Oscar winner recently confided in his friends about his plans to marry Katie and start a family with her.”
“It’s just that they think she’s too straitlaced for him.”
“...dislike Katie the source says...”
“For example outgoing Jamie loves the nightlife while Katie is more of a homebody and nightclubbing isn t her thing The insider adds She d much rather be sitting at home reading a book and spending time with her daughter Suri Getty Images It s not that Jamie s friends...”


"We think time will tell."
"The 39 year old actress arrived separately in New York for the priv é revaux launch - some guests thought they found a baby lump!"
"Now she thinks all their time is worth it." Some fans believe Katie is pregnant with Jamie's baby
“… Year... "
"For many years, she has always wanted Jamie to be her husband and to give her daughter Suri a brother or sister. Now Jamie is going to give her a second source of all this. The couple have been trying to hide their relationship for four years..."
"It's Katie's dream come true."
This is reflected in her appearance and style: "they joked that Katie needed to change her face! "The Oscar winner recently revealed to his friends his plans to marry Katie and start a family with her."
"It's just that they think she's too hard on him."
“… I don't like Katie, the source said
"For example, Jamie, an extrovert, likes nightlife, while Katie is more like a family member. Nightclubs are not her business," the person familiar with the matter added. She would rather sit at home reading books and spend time with her daughter suligetti, who is not Jamie's friend... "



Number  12
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Kate did partake in a 100-metre sprint, with Prince William and Prince Harry...”
“Pippa is a keen sportswoman and patron of sports charity Disability Snowsport UK.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“Kate Middleton, 36, attended the London Marathon in 2017 to support her mental health charity, Heads Together.”
“The Duchess of Cambridge is known to be very sporty, but she didn’t run in the marathon.”
“She is regularly seen at big sporting events, sometimes pictured sporting her trainers and publicly promoting fitness.”
“Before marrying William she was often snapped at sporting events, and played various sports at her boarding school.”
“However, according to Kate’s friend Bryony Gordon, Kate is not allowed to run marathons.”


"Kate did take part in the 100 meter dash, Prince William and Prince Harry..."
"Pippa is an enthusiastic female athlete and a patron of the British Disabled Sports Association."
"Sometimes it includes suggestions for other relevant newsletters or services we provide."
"Our privacy statement explains in detail how we use your data and your rights."
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"Kate Middleton, 36, participated in the London Marathon in 2017 and supported her mental health charity heads together."
"As we all know, the Duchess of Cambridge loves sports, but she didn't take part in the marathon."
"She often appears in major sports events, and is sometimes photographed in sports shoes and in publicity for fitness."
Before she married William, she often took part in sports activities and took part in various sports activities at boarding school
"However, according to Kate's friend Britney Gordon, Kate is not allowed to run marathons."



Number  13
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For more on this, pick up the latest issue of In Touch — and for more exclusive content sign up for our newsletter!”
““She’s determined to hold on to Scott.”
“Ever since she started dating Scott Disick last year, the 19-year-old has seemingly morphed into his longtime ex Kourtney Kardashian, 38.”
“Sofia wears similar clothes.”
“She dyed her blond hair dark brown.”
“She’s been spotted out with Scott’s kids.”
“Did we mention she dyed her hair dark brown?!”
“Don’t think for a second that this is all a coincident!”
““Sofia wants to be Kourtney 2.0,” an insider tells In Touch exclusively.”
“What better way to do that than to become the woman he’ll never stop loving?” That may sound totally weird, but Scott, 34, is actually into it, according to the source.”


"For more information, please click on the latest issue of in touch - for more exclusive content, please register for our press release!"
"She's determined to get Scott."
"Since she started dating Scott Disick last year, the 19-year-old seems to have become his 38 year old ex girlfriend, Courtney Kardashian."
"Sophia wears similar clothes."
"She dyed her golden hair dark brown."
"She was found with Scott's children."
"Did we mention that she dyed her hair dark brown?"
"Don't think it's a coincidence!"
"Sofia wants to be Courtney 2.0," an insider told exclusive contact
"What better way than to be a woman he always loves? "It may sound strange, but according to the source, Scott, 34, is actually interested in it."



Number  14
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Or would be it be a big step down?”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think it would be a good career move for Selena to join American Idol?”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on how producers have their eyes on Selena Gomez to join the show.”
“It would be pretty awkward to see Taylor Swift‘s BFF Selena Gomez, 25, sitting next to arch-enemy Katy Perry, 32, week after week on American Idol, but the “Fetish” singer is at the top of the show producers’ wish-list for judges.”
“Producers think that Selena would be great to join the judging panel because she d bring in a younger crowd for ratings she d be considered the nice judge and they would love her to join because the impact she has with social media an AI insider tells HollywoodLife com...”
“EXCLUSIVELY”
“Sel is the most followed person on Instagram with a whopping 127 million followers, so of course the show would love to have a judge who can reach so many people.”
““They are putting together a proposal for her and are hoping she will accept it and join the show, it’s a long shot but they are taking the chance to get her.”
“They’d love to have her signed up and all judges by mid October,” our insider adds.”
“So far the show has been striking out right and left when it comes to getting other stars to join Katy on the panel.”


"Or will it be a big step?"
"Hollywood stars, do you think it's a good career choice for Selena to join American Idol?"
"We have exclusive coverage of how the producers are looking to Selena Gomez to join the show."
"It would be embarrassing to see Taylor Swift's boyfriend, 25-year-old Selena Gomez, sitting with 32 year old rival Katy Perry on American Idol over and over again, but the" fetishist "singer is the show producer's first choice for the judges."
"Producers think it's a good thing that Selena joins the jury because she will bring a young audience, she will be considered a good judge, they will like her to join because of her influence with social media, an AI insider told Hollywood Life com..."
"Exclusive"
"Sel is the most watched person on instagram, with 127 million fans, so of course the show hopes to have a judge who can reach so many people."
"They are preparing a proposal for her, hoping that she will accept it and take part in the performance. Although the hope is slim, they are seizing the opportunity to fight for her."
"They want her and all the judges to sign up by mid October," our insider added
"So far, the show has been on both sides in getting other stars to join Katie's jury."



Number  15
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But now she accepts it’s not going to happen.”Watch the video above and don’t forget to subscribe to our YouTube Channel!”
“The source adds: “She’s got no idea why Amal and George for that matter have an issue with her.”“Angie wanted them to be friends since they have so much in common and Brad’s not standing in the way anymore.”
“She turned her down flat!”This snub infuriated Jolie who thought that her approach would be warmly welcomed when she admitted that her divorce from Brad Pitt has been very difficult.”
“...knows let alone has any respect for...”
“An insider tells Star Angie went out of her way to try and mend fences reasoning there s a lot of water under the bridge and life s too short for petty grudges But Amal was bemused at the suggestions she would want to socialize with a woman she barely...”
“Amal, 39, who has recently had twins, Ella and Alexander, was not interested after Jolie, 42, tried to mend their friendship.”
“George Clooney’s wife has snubbed mother-of-six Jolie after she reached-out to her.”
“Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)Click to share on Facebook (Opens in new window)Click to share on Twitter (Opens in new window)Amal Clooney does not want to be friends with Angelina Jolie.”


"But now she admits it won't happen." Watch the video above and don't forget to subscribe to our YouTube channel
"She didn't know why Amar and George had an argument with her over this," the source added "Angie wants them to be friends because they have so much in common that Brad is no longer in the way."
"She flatly refused! "This indifference angered Julie, who thought her approach would be warmly welcomed because she admitted that her divorce from Brad Pitt was very difficult."
“… Know, not to mention respect... "
"An insider told star Anji that she tried every means to mend her relationship because there was a lot of water under the bridge and her life was too short to have a little resentment. However, Amar was advised that she wanted to have a relationship with someone she hardly had..."
"Amar, 39, recently gave birth to twins, Ella and Alexander. Amar was not interested after Julie, 42, tried to mend their friendship."
"George Clooney's wife snubbed the mother of her six children after Julie offered her a helping hand."
"Click send this message to a friend (open in a new window) Click share on Facebook (open in a new window) Click share on twitter (open in a new window) Amal Clooney doesn't want to be friends with Angelina Jolie."



Number  16
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us know!”
“She reportedly hopes he “will be taken by complete surprise.”
“Angelina Jolie could be getting married again, according to a shocking new report!”
“She has allegedly been dating a mystery man for months now, and hasn’t told Brad a thing!”
“She’s still technically married to Brad Pitt, 52, but Angelina Jolie, 41, allegedly has her heart set on a new marriage.”
“Barely a year after filing for divorce from her husband, Angelina is reportedly planning her fourth wedding to a wealthy, 40-something businessman and philanthropist, according to InTouch Weekly!”
“Angelina and her handsome British guy reportedly started dating in early 2017, and has been keeping the whole relationship “very hush-hush.” That means that Brad has no idea she’s dating, let alone engaged or getting married.”
“Uh oh!”
““Angelina could tell Brad what’s going on but she’s choosing not to,” a source told InTouch.”
“If it makes Brad unhappy when he finds out, she’s fine with that.” She actually hasn’t even told her six kids about the alleged wedding for fear that they’ll spill the beans to their dad.”


"Let us know!"
According to reports, she wanted him to be "totally unexpected"
Angelina Jolie may be getting married again, according to a shocking new report
"It's said she's been dating a mystery man for months and hasn't told Brad anything!"
"Technically, she is still married to Brad Pitt, 52, but Angelina Jolie, 41, is reported to be bent on a new marriage."
Just a year after divorcing her husband, Angelina plans to have her fourth wedding with a wealthy businessman and philanthropist in her 40s, according to touch weekly
"It is reported that Angelina and her handsome British man started dating in early 2017, and the whole relationship has been" very low-key ". It means Brad doesn't know she's dating, let alone engaged or married. "
"Oh
"Angelina can tell Brad what happened, but she chooses not to," a source told InTouch
"If Brad finds out that he's not happy afterwards, then she's OK." In fact, she didn't even tell her six children about the so-called wedding because she was afraid they would tell their father the secret



Number  17
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Nobody kicks ass like K.Stew.”
“Our dishy source says the Stewart-McAvoy version of the project might not come to fruition, but it remains a slim possibility—and wouldn't it be damn hot!”
“Our insider says Kristen was approached to fill Jolie's hot-woman void in the franchise and met at least once with Timur Bekmambetov, the director of the series.”
“However, Angelina's participation in the project is still up in the air.”
“While her character died in the first installment of the film, Bekmambetov told MTV that he would bring her back in some capacity, in the sequel.”
“Only problem is A.J.”
“...reportedly backed out of the film.”
“We hear details aka money and exactly how much time she d need to give to the flick were never worked out which is why Angelina is out for now but she could possibly make a cameo if the film...”
“...actually happens...”
“So can Kristen save the franchise?”


"No one can kick his ass like K. stew."
"Our sources say that the Stewart McAvoy version of the project may not have a result, but it's still a slim possibility that it won't be damned hot!"
"Our insiders say that Christine came into contact to fill Julie's gap in the spice girls series, and she met at least once with Timur Beckman bertov, the director of the series."
"However, whether Angelina is involved in the project is still up in the air."
"When her character died in the first film, Beckman bertov told MTV that he would bring her back in some capacity in the sequel."
"The only problem is A.J."
“… It's said that he quit the film. "
"We've heard that some details, such as the money, and how much time she needs to spend on this film, are not clear, which is why Angelina is going to play in this film now, but if this film
“… It actually happened... "
"So can Christine save the team?"



Number  18
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Market research,” he added.”
“Kate Hudson attended the premiere with her two sons Ryder and BinghamSpeaking to E!”
“Actresses Angelina Jolie, Kate Hudson and Naomi Watts all brought along their children for the film event, on Saturday.”
“Although she walked the red carpet alone, Angelina Jolie was later joined by five of her children.”
“Pax, Zahara, Shiloh, Vivienne and Knox joined their mother to watch the latest instalment of the triology, but Maddox and the actress’ husband Brad Pitt were not in attendance.”
“Angelina Jolie walked the red carpet alone but was later joined by her children to watch the filmThe actress looked chic and sophisticated in a short black Saint Laurent shift dress, that highlighted her lean physique.”
“She kept her look simple, wearing her long dark hair down and accessorizing her outfit with diamond earrings, two bracelets and her large sparkling wedding ring.”
“Also enjoying some bonding time with her children was Kate Hudson.”
“The Almost Famous actress brought along her two sons Ryder and Bingham to watch the film.”
“The 36-year-old looked stunning in a floor-length dress and pink lipstick.”


"Market research," he added
"Kate Hudson was at the premiere with her two sons, Ryder and Bingham!"
Actresses Angelina Jolie, Kate Hudson and Naomi Watts all took their children to the film festival on Saturday
"Although Angelina Jolie walked on the red carpet alone, her five children joined in later."
Parks, Zahara, Shiloh, Vivian and Knox watched the latest trilogy with their mother, but Maddox and the actress's husband Brad Pitt did not attend
Angelina Jolie walked alone on the red carpet, but later her children watched the film together. The actress, dressed in a black St. Laurent skirt, was stylish and sophisticated, highlighting her thin build
"She kept her simple appearance, hung her long black hair down, and decorated her dress with diamond earrings, two bracelets, and big sparkling wedding rings."
"Kate Hudson also enjoys being with the kids."
"The almost famous actress took her two sons, Ryder and Bingham, to see the film."
The 36 year old man looks very charming in a long skirt and pink lipstick.



Number  19
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Do you think it’ll happen for him?”
“This will be John’s second marriage, just like George, who married Amal Clooney, 39, in 2014.”
“After announcing his engagement to younger GF Caitlin McHugh, we’ve learned exclusively the star’s excited about possibly becoming a dad.”
“His inspo?”
“George Clooney!”
“Taking a page from George Clooney‘s, 56, book, John Stamos, 54, is ready to become a father for the first time!”
“The actor popped the question to his girlfriend Caitlin McHugh, 32, earlier this week, and apparently he’s ALREADY got babies on the brain!”
“Despite his age though, John is eager to settle down and raise a fam — after all, if George can make it happen, he can too!”
“But George isn’t the only one who’s inspired John to become a family man.”
“Click here to see adorable pics of celeb dads with their kids.”


"Do you think it will happen to him?"
"This will be John's second marriage, just as George married 39 year old Amar Clooney in 2014."
"After announcing his engagement to young girlfriend Caitlin McHugh, we learned exclusively that the star was excited about becoming a father."
"His inspo?"
"George Clooney!"
"Turn a page from George Clooney, 56, and John Stamos, 54, is going to be a father for the first time!"
Earlier this week, the actor posed the question to his 32 year old girlfriend Caitlin McHugh, who apparently has a baby! "
"Although John is old, he is still eager to settle down and form a family - after all, if George can do it, he can do it too!"
"But George is not the only one who inspired John to become a housewife."
"Click here to see a lovely picture of the star father with his child."



Number  20
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A post shared by KATY PERRY katyperry on Aug 20 2017 at 9 02pm PDT Now that I ve exalted in the SolarEclipse2017 I m ready to take on the rest of this week like pic twitter com y9b9obPoIp Elizabeth Banks ElizabethBanks August 21 2017”
“Wrigs made his own pair youtherealmvpnanette pic twitter com UNVKQHPRmO Elena Delle Donne De11eDonne August 21 2017 Total eclipse of the heart A post shared by Kim Kardashian West kimkardashian on Aug 21 2017 at 9 17am PDT sleeping through the eclipse tomorrow just to be different ok lindley ricky...”
“...founding mystics fan comes through in the clutch and drops off eclipse glasses...”
“A post shared by The Walking Dead thewalkingdead on Aug 21 2017 at 9 40am PDT Ok solareclipse we are ready also making sure there are no mayors around just saying rachelgoodwinmakeup mararoszak A post shared by Sarah Michelle sarahmgellar on Aug 21 2017 at 9 47am PDT When a...”
“It’s really happening #solareclipse A post shared by Josh Gad (@joshgad) on Aug 21, 2017 at 9:16am PDTThe family that eclipses together… A post shared by Jack Black (@jackblack) on Aug 21, 2017 at 10:35am PDTWho’s ready for #solareclipse2017??”
“— Marquette King (@MarquetteKing) August 21, 2017Science happened today.. right behind that cloud there pic.twitter.com/GNZZRcg8B7 — Pat McAfee (@PatMcAfeeShow) August 21, 2017It’s happening guys.”
“?”
“#solareclipse2017 A post shared by Darius Rucker (@dariusrucker) on Aug 21, 2017 at 11:25am PDTAll them taxes we pay in cali and can’t see no eclipse!”
“Here we go!!”
“From Seattle Seahawks head coach Pete Carroll to Dwayne “The Rock” Johnson himself – in addition to many professional sports teams like the Baltimore Ravens and Tennessee Titans – here are some of the ways the biggest names in entertainment celebrated the 2017 solar eclipse.”


"Katy Perry shared a post on August 20, 2017 at 9:02 p.m. Pacific Daylight Time. Now that I'm in the sun in 2017, I'm ready to be interviewed for the rest of this week like pic twitter com y9b9obpoip Elizabeth Banks Elizabeth Banks on August 21, 2017."
"Wrigs made a couple of his own, youtherealmvpn Nette pic twitter com unvkqhprmo Elena delle Donne de11edonne, the heart of the total eclipse on August 21, 2017. Kardashan shared an article at 9:17 a.m. on August 21, 2017," sleeping in the eclipse tomorrow is just to be different, OK Lindley Ricky... "
“… Fans of the founder mystics get out of the clutch and drop their eclipse glasses
"The post shared by the walking dead at 9:40 a.m. on August 21, 2017. OK, we're ready to make sure there's no mayor around. We just said that rachelwood win masquerade mararoszak, a post shared by Sarah Michelle sarahmgellar at 9:47 a.m. on August 21, 2017, when
"It's really happening ᦇ solaeclipse, a post shared by Josh GAD (@ joshgad) at 9:16 a.m. on August 21, 2017, a family eclipse together A post shared by Jack Black (@ jackblack) at 10:35 a.m. on August 21, 2017, who's ready to "solarceptipe2017?"
"- Marquette King (@ Marquette king) August 21, 2017 science takes place today.. Right behind that cloud pic.twitter.com/GNZZRcg8B7 -Pat McAfee (@ pat McAfee show) this happened on August 21, 2017
“?”
"Solar eclipse 2017 Darius Rucker (@ Darius Rucker) shared a post at 11:25 a.m. on August 21, 2017, telling them that the tax we paid at Cali didn't see the solar eclipse!"
"Come on!"
"From Seattle Seahawks coach Peter Carroll to Dwyane Johnson himself - in addition to many professional sports teams such as the Baltimore Ravens and Tennessee Titans, here are some of the ways the entertainment industry's big names celebrate the 2017 eclipse."



Number  21
Source test case:  ['Opinion']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“And he regularly provides security for the whole family not just Kim Image zoom Credit AKM GSI And though there isn t much security on site at the hotel As I recall there s a receptionist downstairs who buzzes you through the door in the courtyard and a nightman a...”
“...told PEOPLE”
“… I told him that I didn’t know, he took out a gun and I showed him the ring.”She continued, according to the report: “They grabbed me and took me into the hallway.”
“It’s worth $4 million.”
“It was on the bedside table.”
““He demanded with a strong French accent, my ring.”
““It’s the one with the ski goggles who stayed with me,” she said, according to the report.”
“Through the door, I saw two people arrive, plus the night man who was tied up.”The two men apparently had police paraphernalia and one individual wore ski goggles.”
“I called my bodyguard at 2:56 a.m.”
““No one answered.”


"He often provides security for the whole family, not just Kim image zoom credit AKM GSI. Although I remember there was not much security at the hotel site, there was a receptionist downstairs calling you by the buzzer in front of the door in the yard, and a night attendant as well..."
"Tell people"
“…… I told him I didn't know. He took out a gun and I showed him the ring "They grabbed me and took me to the hallway," she added
"It's worth four million dollars."
"On the bedside table."
"He asked in a strong French accent, my ring."
"It was the man with the ski glasses who stayed with me," she said, according to the report
"Through the door, I saw two people coming, and the night man tied up." The two men apparently had police equipment and one was wearing ski glasses
"I called my bodyguard at 2:56 in the morning."
"No one answered."



Number  22
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But I do want to say, I clearly had one drink too many and I am deeply embarrassed about the things I said," she told Us Weekly.”
“"Out of respect for the ongoing legal situation, I cannot comment on everything that is being reported right now.”
“She later apologized for her behavior via her publicist.”
“Toth, who was also arrested on a suspected DUI charge, blew a .139 on a breathalyzer test (the legal limit is Georgia is .08), according to the publication.”
“...and refused to stay in her car.”
“Variety said she screamed at an Atlanta police officer, "Do you know my name...you're about to find out who I am!"”
“Witherspoon, who became irate after her husband was pulled over for driving in the wrong lane, (via Variety) was booked for disorderly conduct.”
“In 2013, fans of the Wild actress were shocked to learn that America's sweetheart was arrested in Atlanta, Georgia.”


"But what I want to say is, it's clear that I've been drinking too much and I'm deeply embarrassed by what I've said," she told us
"Out of respect for the current legal situation, I can't comment on everything reported so far."
"She later apologized for her actions through the public relations staff."
Tot was also arrested on suspicion of drunk driving and scored 0.139 in an alcohol test (the legal limit is 0.08)
“… Refuse to stay in her car. "
Variety magazine said she screamed at an Atlanta police officer: "do you know my name You'll know who I am! "
After Witherspoon's husband was stopped in the wrong lane, she became angry and was ordered (through the variety show) for misbehaving
"In 2013, fans of the wild actress were shocked to learn that the American sweetheart was arrested in Atlanta, Georgia."



Number  23
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“According to Ok!, the married actor is “flirting up a storm” with his co-star on the Georgia set of the indie drama, The Peanut Butter […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“That’s the claim in one of this week’s new tabloids, but Gossip Cop has the truth.”
“Has Shia Labeouf actually been hitting on Dakota Johnson while filming their upcoming movie?”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
"Press! The married actor is "flirting" with his partner on the Georgia set of the independent drama peanut butter IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"That's what a new tabloid said on Monday, but gossip police has the truth."
"Did Shia Labov really have contact with Johnson in Dakota when making their upcoming movie?"



Number  24
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The bigger the better, she figures!””
“Worried about her implants hardening, “she massages her breasts twice a day, and every six weeks she sees a doctor for laser resurfacing.” Though she traded up to D cups last fall, “Cait’s talking about getting them redone again.”
“...get cleavage wrinkles says the insider...”
“Cait who didn t undergo full sex reassignment surgery until January but has had two breast augmentations since 2015 slathers on firming cream at night and she sleeps in a special bra that separates her boobs so she won t...”
“...source...”
“Caitlyn Jenner may be revealing The Secrets of My Life in her new memoir but here s one she hasn t detailed The transgender star is breast obsessed and goes to great lengths to keep hers looking good says a...”


"The bigger, the better!" she thought
"Worried that her implants would harden," she said, massaging her breasts twice a day and seeing a doctor every six weeks for laser resurfacing. "Although she changed the D cup last fall," Kate said she would do it again
“… Get cleavage wrinkles said, inside
"Kate didn't have a full-scale sex change operation until January, but she has had two breast augmentation operations since 2015. She is applying Tightening Cream at night and sleeping with a special bra that separates her breasts so that she won't..."
“… Source... "
"Caitlin Jenner may have revealed the secret of my life in her new memoir, but here's one thing she hasn't explained in detail. This transsexual star is obsessed with breasts, and she spared no effort to maintain her beauty, a said..."



Number  25
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Holmes was nowhere in sight.”
“Foxx was caught earlier this month partying hard at an Oscars afterparty.”
“As fans know, the 39-year-old is reportedly having relationship problems with her on-and-off boyfriend Foxx as he was seen hanging out with his baby mama several times this month and Holmes was not happy about it!”
“The duo are said to be “keeping it platonic,” however.”
“The actor, who is happily married to Kimberly Brook whom he shares five children with, “has always carried a torch for Katie when they worked together and he still feels like there could be chemistry between them,” reveals the informant.”
“So she’s decided two can play at that game, and has gotten back in touch with James.”And Van Der Beek “was thrilled,” snitched the source.”
““Katie’s spent a lot of lonely nights without Jamie Foxx and is reading all the reports of his flirting with other women.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Sherlock Holmes is gone."
"Fox was caught reveling at the Oscars earlier this month."
"Fans all know that Holmes, 39, is reported to have a problem with her off and on boyfriend fox because he was not happy to see him go out with his baby mother several times this month."
However, it is said that the pair "keep the Platonic style"
"The actor and Kimberly brook are happily married. They have five children. When they work together, he always has a passion for Katie. He still thinks there may be a chemical reaction between them," the person familiar with the matter said
"So she decided that two people could take part in the game and got back in touch with James." Van der Beek is "very excited," the source said
"Katie has spent a lot of lonely nights without Jamie Fox and is reading all the stories about him flirting with other women."



Number  26
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Only time will tell!”
“The Playboy star and Hank have had many ups and downs over the course of their marriage, but a third child may bring the couple closer together.”
““That second that she went into the preschool I got empty-nest syndrome already!”Kendra shares Hank IV, 6, and daughter Alijah, 2, with her NFL star husband.”
“MORE: Greyson is All Smiles in Jenni “JWOWW” Farley and Roger Mathews’ New Instagram Posts — Check it Out“I said ‘absolutely not,’ but now our daughter just entered preschool,” she says.”
“Kendra, who initially wasn’t interested in having another child, admits she has babies on the brain again.”
““Which would indicate a susceptibility to pregnancy.”He then asks Kendra a second time if she wants to her expand her family.”
“MORE: Kendra Wilkinson’s Dog Dies, Shares the News on Social MediaTyler Henry asks the mother-of-two if she’s interested in expanding her family, to which Kendra hesitantly responds, “Why would you ask?”“You have a susceptibility to some hormonal changes,” the medium explains.”
“During a reading on Wednesday’s episode of Hollywood Medium, the reality star learns that another bundle may be on the way for her and husband Hank Baskett.”
“Big baby news for Kendra Wilkinson!”


"Only time can prove everything!"
"The Playboy star and Hank went through a lot of twists and turns in their marriage, but a third child may bring the couple closer."
"The second she entered preschool, I had empty nest syndrome!"! "Kendra and her NFL star husband shared six-year-old hank IV and two-year-old daughter aria."
"More: Gleason smiles in new instagram posts by Jenny" jwoww "Farley and Roger Matthews - check it out," I said, "absolutely not," but now our daughter has just entered preschool, "she said
"Kendra was not interested in having another child at first. She admitted that she had another child."
"It shows that she's sensitive to pregnancy." He asked Kendra a second time if she wanted to expand her family
"More: Kendra Wilkinson's dog died and shared the news on social media. Tyler Henry asked the mother of two if she was interested in expanding her family. Kendra hesitated and said," why do you ask? "You're sensitive to changes in certain hormones," the media explained
In an episode of Hollywood media on Wednesday, the reality TV star learned that another deal with her husband, Hank Basquet, was coming
"Kendra Wilkinson's big news!"



Number  27
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He has also won four Grammys for his musical contributions.”
“Starring in such films as "The Pursuit of Happyness," Ali," "Six Degrees of Separation" and "Bad Boys," the 46-year-old Smith has been nominated for four Golden Globe and two Academy Awards.”
“Smith and Pinkett have been married since 1997 and have two teenage children together, both of whom have started to carve out their own place in Hollywood.”
“Through all the drama, a rep for Pinkett Smith now tells Gossip Cop the former "Set It Off" and "Gotham" star is convinced there's nothing factual in the rumors.”
“...an instance of the two goofing off in some photos of them together at a party...”
“As far back as 2013 Star Magazine ran a cover story alleging that Smith and Robbie had been caught cheating but that turned out to be much ado about nothing after it was found the most incriminating evidence was simply...”
“"Will likes Margot too much, and the feeling seems mutual."”
“"Jada's dreading it," a source said.”
“Smith and Robbie are also slated to work together on the upcoming flick "Suicide Squad," and there have been previous reports that Pinkett Smith is "stewing" over the prospect of it all.”
“And she doesn't trust Margot one bit."”


"He also won four Grammy Awards for his musical contribution."
"The 46 year old Smith has starred in films such as pursuit of happiness, Ali, six separations and bad boy, and has won four Golden Globes and two Oscar nominations."
Smith and pinkert have been married since 1997 and have two teenagers. Both of them have started to open up their own world in Hollywood
In all the drama, a representative of pinkert Smith now tells the former gossip cop "stir up trouble," and the "Gotham" star is convinced that there is no truth in the rumor
“…… An example of two people having an affair at a party... "
"As early as 2013, star magazine published a cover story claiming that Smith and Robbie were arrested for cheating, but after they were found, all this was nonsense, and the best evidence to prove their guilt was...."
"Will likes Margot so much that it seems to be mutual."
"Jada is scared," one source said
"Smith and Robbie are also planning to work together in the upcoming film" suicide squad "after it was reported that pinkert Smith was" upset "about the prospect of all this
"She doesn't trust Margot at all."



Number  28
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“...to help her purchase her current home and has contributed over 1 3 million for the benefit of Jolie and the minor children...”
“RFO request for a court order for the establishment of a retroactive child support order In a filing the next day Pitt s lawyer Lance Spiegel slammed Jolie s filing as unnecessary and a thinly veiled effort to manipulate media coverage The filing state that Pitt loaned Jolie 8 million...”
“Inside their divorce battleAngelina Jolie and Brad Pitt‘s split in September 2016 was sudden and shocking — but after an initial flurry of ugly accusations, the couple entered divorce mediation and largely kept their negotiations private.”
“Now their divorce has exploded into the headlines again as the couple battle over visitation and child support for kids Maddox, Pax, Zahara, Shiloh, Vivienne and Knox.”
“Here’s a brief history of how things between them got so heated.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“Their Shocking SplitJolie and Pitt were last photographed together in public in July 2016, when they stopped into a Jamba Juice store in L.A. with Shiloh.”
“On Sept. 19, 2016 Jolie filed for divorce.”
“She cited irreconcilable differences as the reason for the split and asked for physical custody of their six children.”
“Image zoom Pitt and Jolie with (from left) Pax, Zahara, Knox, Shiloh and Maddox in May 2014.”


“…… He helped her buy her present house, and donated more than 1.3 million yuan to Julie and the underage children. "
"The next day, Lance Spiegel, Pete's lawyer, attacked in a document that Julie's application was unnecessary and an understated effort to manipulate media coverage - Pete lent Julie $8 million to apply for state..."
"In their divorce dispute, Angelina Jolie and Brad Pitt's breakup in September 2016 was sudden and shocking - but after the initial series of ugly charges, the couple entered the divorce mediation process and largely kept their negotiation privacy."
"Now, their divorce is making headlines again, because the couple had a dispute over visiting and raising their children, Maddox, Pax, Zahara, Shiloh, Vivienne and Knox."
"It's a brief history of how things between them became so intense."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Jolie and Pete's shocking breakup was last photographed in public in July 2016 when they and Shiloh stopped at a Jamba juice store in Los Angeles."
"On September 19, 2016, Julie filed for divorce."
"She broke up with irreconcilable differences and asked for actual custody of their six children."
"In May 2014, Pitt and Julie posed with parks, Zahara, Knox, Shiloh and Maddox (from left)



Number  29
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Justin was one of very few guys at the shindig (L-R Ruth Negga, Jennifer Connelly, Emma Stone, Sienna Miller, Nicolas Ghesquiere, Doona Bae, Laura Harrier, Sophie Turner)”
“Justin Theroux, 46, and Laura Harrier, 28, hung out aboard superyacht in France over the weekendLucky Guy!”
“The 46-year-old was spotted flaunting his chiseled abs to Emma Stone, 29, on Wednesday.”
“Just 24 hours earlier the actor had put on a similar show for 28-year-old actress, Laura Harrier.”
“Sexy Emma Stone wore a red hot swimsuit while relaxing with eligible bachelor Justin Theroux in France on Wednesday Gun show The 46 year old was spotted flaunting his chiseled abs to Stone 29 Two can play that game Emma meanwhile was doing some showing off of her own in...”
“...a red one piece swimsuit that exposed a generous helping of sideboob But Wednesday was Emma s day and the thespians spent the afternoon together in a secluded cabin nestled in the woods in the South of France...”
“Justin wore nothing but a pair of black shorts, showcasing his toned torso for his Maniac co-star.”
“Besides his fine physique, the Leftovers star also showed off his huge back tattoo depicting a pigeon and a rat.”
“While those two animals juxtaposed might for most people conjure an epic battle to the death in a recent viral video from Brooklyn, Justin recently explained the tat was somehow dedicated to his dogs.”
“Hanging out The thespians spent the afternoon together in a secluded cabin nestled in the woods in the South of France Keep it brief Justin wore nothing but a pair of black shorts Watch this He showcased his toned torso for his Maniac co star Inked Besides his fine physique...”


"Justin is one of the few people on shindig (L-R Ruth nega, Jennifer Connelly, Emma stone, Sienna Miller, Nicholas gasquell, Duna Bay, Laura Harris, Sophie Turner)"
Justin serux, 46, and Laura Harrier, 28, hang out on a French superyacht for the weekend's good luck
On Wednesday, Emma stone, 46, was found showing off her slender ABS to Emma stone, 29
Just 24 hours ago, the actor put on a similar performance for 28 year old actress Laura Harris
"Sexy Emma stone wore a red hot swimsuit while relaxing with eligible bachelor Justin Theroux in France on Wednesday. During the gunfight, Emma, 46, was found showing off her slender abdominal muscles to stone. They can play the game, and Emma is also showing off her own
“… A red one-piece swimsuit, revealing a generous helping side chest, but Wednesday was Emma's day and the spians spent an afternoon in a secluded cottage, nestling in the woods in southern France... "
"Justin only wore a pair of black shorts to show his bodybuilding for his crazy partner."
In addition to her beautiful physique, the star also displayed a huge back tattoo with a pigeon and a mouse on it
"In a recent viral video in Brooklyn, juxtaposition of the two animals may be an epic battle for most people, but Justin recently explained that Tat is somehow dedicated to his dog."
"In a remote cottage in the woods of southern France, the two actors spent an afternoon together, keeping it short. Justin wore only a pair of black shorts. Looking at this watch, he shows his strong body. In addition to his beautiful physique, he also paints ink for his crazy partner.... "



Number  30
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And scroll through the gallery below for photos of Gwake in happier times!”
“For more updates on your favorite celebrity couples, pick up the latest issue of Life & Style, on newsstands now.”
“Amid reports that the couple split, a source tells Life & Style that the musical duo has been forced to put on a show while appearing on their hit NBC singing competition, The Voice.”
“MORE: Gwen Stefani Livid with Miranda Lambert, Wants Her to Stop Talking About Blake Shelton“The Voice producers are pushing Gwen and Blake to act very affectionate and playful with each other,” the source reveals.”
““[They] really wanted an on-screen proposal.”That won’t be happening, but Gwen’s still uncomfortable about the whole thing.”
““[She’s] feeling the pressure to play Blake’s loving girlfriend [on the show] while off-set, she’s miserable,” the source adds.”
“It doesn’t help that the return of American Idol is looming large.”
“As Life & Style previously reported, things have been deteriorating between the two performers over the last couple of months.”
““Gwen and Blake began to argue more.”
“Then she started to realize they’re just too different to spend the rest of their lives together,” a different insider shared.”


"Scroll through gwake's happy time photos in the gallery below!"
"For more up-to-date news about your favorite celebrity couple, please read the latest issue of life and fashion at the newsstand now."
"It's reported that the couple broke up, and a source told life and fashion magazine that the music group was forced to perform in NBC's popular singing competition" the voice. "
"More: Gwen Stefani is furious with Miranda Lambert and wants her to stop talking about black Sheldon." "Voice producers are pushing Gwen Blake to be very friendly and playful," the source said
"(they) really want to propose on screen. "That won't happen, but Gwen is still not very happy with the whole thing."
"[she] felt the pressure to play Blake's beloved girlfriend in the show, and she was miserable," the source added
"It doesn't help the return of American Idol."
"As life and fashion previously reported, the relationship between the two performers has been deteriorating over the past few months."
"Gwen and black are starting to argue more."
"Then she began to realize that they were too different to spend the rest of their lives together," another person familiar with the matter said



Number  31
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“[Featured Image by Harry How/Getty Images]”
“Over the years, the Kardashian/Jenner sisters have been romantically linked to a number of pro athletes, several of whom inexplicably began to suffer through rough patches in their careers right about the time they went public with one of the sisters.”
“The NBA star and Kim Kardashian’s younger sister have been romantically linked now for about two weeks and if Clippers’ brass gets its way, things won’t progress much beyond that point.”
““He’s been warned that his new relationship with Kendall better not affect his form this season,” a source told Radar.”
““He’s not telling anyone yet whether they’re actually together, but Clippers bosses have told him that regardless, she’s not welcome to crash their locker room and distract everyone with the Kardashian circus.”
“They saw what happened to former Clipper Lamar Odom when he was with Khloe Kardashian and they are not having that from their marquee player The Clippers only recently signed Griffin to a massive five year 173 million extension officially making him the face of the franchise with Chris Paul...”
“...having recently been dealt to the Houston Rockets...”
“Now, management seems to be of the mind if they are going to get a solid return on that investment Griffin needs to end things with Jenner before the so-called “Kardashian Kurse” takes effect.”
“Odom’s NBA career tragically fizzled amid rampant rumors he was hooked on drugs while still married to Khloe Kardashian.”
“Finally, Kanye West, Kim’s current husband, was recently hospitalized in the wake of suffering a “mental breakdown” and Scott Disick, the father of older sister Kourtney’s three young children, has long been dogged by drug and alcohol problems.”


"Harry how / Getty Images"
"Over the years, the Kardashian / Jenner sisters have been romantically associated with some professional athletes, some of whom inexplicably began to experience the ups and downs of their careers when they went public with one of their sisters."
"The NBA star has been in love with Kim Kardashian's sister for two weeks, and if the Clippers boss succeeds, it won't make much progress."
"He was warned that his new relationship with Kendall had better not affect his form this season," a source told radar
"He hasn't told anyone if they're really together, but the Clippers boss told him that anyway, she doesn't welcome crashing into their dressing rooms and distracting people with the Kardashian circus."
"They saw what happened to former clippers Odom and Kardashian when they were together. They didn't see their main player Griffin signing Griffin recently. The five-year contract extension of 173 million officially made him the spokesman of Chris Paul's team..."
“… Recently traded to Houston Rockets... "
"Now, the management seems to be thinking about if they are going to get a steady return on Griffin's investment that needs to end the relationship with Jenner before the so-called" Kardashian kurs "takes effect."
"Odom's career in the NBA unfortunately died, because rumors are so rampant that he took drugs when he married Kardashian."
"Finally, Kim's current husband, Kanye West, was recently hospitalized with a" mental breakdown "and his sister, Courtney's father of three young children, Scott disc, has long suffered from drug and alcohol problems."



Number  32
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRELATED CONTENT:Selena Gomez Is the Sassiest 5-Year-Old You'll Ever Meet in Hilarious Throwback Video: WatchSelena Gomez All Smiles in New York Amid Justin Bieber Engagement NewsHailey Baldwin Praises Justin Bieber and Selena Gomez's Romance in Awkward Resurfaced Tweets...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“The 24-year-old singer got engaged to Hailey Baldwin on Saturday, but he still has his tattoo dedicated to his ex-girlfriend -- Selena Gomez -- on his left wrist.”
“On Tuesday, Bieber and Baldwin were snapped together in New York City, where the tattoo -- featuring a girl with long hair, meant to be Gomez -- was still clearly visible.”
“TheImageDirect.comTheImageDirect.comBieber previously talked about attempting to cover up the tattoo in February 2016.”
“"This is my ex-girlfriend," he told GQ, pointing to the distinct ink.”
“"So, I tried to cut her face up with some shading, but people still know."”
“Clearly, Bieber's tattoos are important to him.”
“Last June, he showed off his "Better at 70" tattoo on his leg, which he actually referenced again in his Instagram confirming his engagement to Baldwin.”
“"My goodness does feel good to have our future secured!"”


"Embedded code restart" content: Serena Gomez is the most fashionable 5-year-old you meet in the funny backtracking Video: watching Serena Gomez smile in New York when Justin Bieber is engaged news Haley Baldwin praises the romance between Justin Bieber and Serena Gomez on the embarrassing re emergence of twitter... "
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
The 24-year-old singer was engaged to Haley Baldwin on Saturday, but he still has a tattoo on his left wrist dedicated to his ex girlfriend Selena Gomez
"On Tuesday, Bieber and Baldwin were photographed together in New York, with a girl with long hair on her tattoo. It was originally Gomez, but it is still clearly visible."
“ TheImageDirect.comTheImageDirect.comBieber The company talked about trying to cover up tattoos in February 2016. "
"This is my ex girlfriend," he said to GQ, pointing to the ink
"So I tried to cut her face open with a sunscreen, but people still know."
"Obviously, Bieber's tattoo is very important to him."
Last June, he showed off his leg tattoo of "70 is better", which he mentioned again on instagram, confirming his engagement to Baldwin
"My God, our future is safe. It feels good!"



Number  33
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...woman Said Freeman Aside from all that physical beauty she s a real person...”
“More Good Works In terms of Pitt s work in Louisiana Jolie s costar in the movie Wanted Morgan Freeman told PEOPLE Thursday at the Pathfinders to Peace Forum and Gala We were in contact with Brad about the situation in New Orleans and he called Jolie such a wonderful...”
“In addition, $20,000 went to an art park in Los Angeles, as did separate $5,000 donations to two orphanages that Jolie had visited.”
“A and to the Epidermolysis Bulloma Medical Research Foundation...”
“Additional gifts included 137 935 to the Namibia Red Cross Action Program their daughter Shiloh was born in the African country 100 000 to the Daniel Pearl Foundation the late journalist s widow Marianne Pearl was played by Jolie in A Mighty Heart 100 000 to Global Green U S”
“In terms of dispensing their funds, according to records for 2006, the foundation handed out $2,367,935, including $1 million to both Doctors Without Borders (International Division) and to the Global Action for Children.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“(These latest figures don’t include 2007 – in which, among other charitable efforts, Brad’s Make It Right Foundation raised $5 million.)”
“All told, they gave more than $8 million in donations in 2006, with Pitt putting in $4,402,317, and Jolie donating $4,123,613, the Huffington Post reports, citing newly released federal tax filings.”
“The couple's foundation is financially strong – and generous, say tax filesNews cameras have captured Brad Pitt building homes in New Orleans, and now federal tax filings for the Jolie Pitt Foundation have documented the good works that Brad and Angelina Jolie are doing behind the scenes.”


“… Women say that Freeman is a real person besides her beautiful appearance
"More about Pete's work in Louisiana, Julie's partner in the movie wanted, Morgan Freeman, told people at the peace Pathfinder forum and party on Thursday that we had contact with Brad about New Orleans, and he called Julie a great person..."
In addition, 20000 dollars went to an art park in Los Angeles, and another 5000 dollars went to two orphanages Julie visited
"Epidermolysis bullosa Medical Research Foundation..."
"Additional gifts include 137 935 Namibian Red Cross action plan, their daughter Shiloh was born in the African country 100000 Daniel Pearl foundation, late reporter's widow Marian Zhenzhu plays Julie in a strong heart 100000 global green America."
According to 2006 records, the Foundation allocated $2367935, including $1 million for MSF (International sector) and global children's Action Fund.
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"(the latest figures don't include that in 2007, Brad's do it right foundation raised $5 million in other charitable activities.)
In 2006, they donated more than $8 million, Pitt $4402317 and Julie $4123613, the Huffington Post reported, citing the latest federal tax documents
"The couple's foundation is well funded and generous," fields fields nex cameras capture Brad Pitt's house in New Orleans, and now federal tax documents for the JoeI pit foundation document Brad and Angelina Jolie's good work behind the scenes.



Number  34
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She was made up with smoky eye shadow and black mascara with a hint of blush and nude lip color and added gold earrings...”
“Selena and The Weeknd made their public debut as a couple at the Met Gala in May.”
“The singer's ex-boyfriend Justin Bieber, 23, was spotted arriving at her home in the Studio City neighborhood of Los Angeles on Sunday, according to TMZ.”
“The website reported that first Justin rolled up in his Mercedes G-Wagon with Selena, 25, arriving just a few minutes later.”
“Scroll down for video Just friends Justin Bieber pictured last month was seen arriving at Selena Gomez s LA home on Sunday where he hung out with his former girlfriend until midnight TMZ reported Sources told TMZ that the former couple hung out until about midnight with mutual friends also...”
“...joining them...”
“The pair reconnected after Selena went public last month with the news that she had undergone a kidney transplant due to complications of lupus.”
“TMZ also claimed Selena and Justin spent time together too last week.”
“It comes as the Biebs has moved into a luxury $55,000-a-month rental in an exclusive neighborhood in Beverly Hills.”
“New pad The get together comes as Justin 23 moves into a luxury 55 000 a month rental in an exclusive neighborhood in Beverly Hills from where he shared this selfie Saturday More ink Bang Bang Tattoo s Keith McCurdy spent 26 hours over three consecutive days at the luxury...”


"She used smoked eye shadow and black mascara with a hint of blush and nude lip gloss, plus gold earrings."
"Serena and Zhou de made their debut at the metropolitan party in May."
Justin Bieber, the singer's 23-year-old ex boyfriend, was found at his home near Studio City in Los Angeles on Sunday, TMZ reported
"The website reports that the first Justin and 25-year-old Serena arrived in his Mercedes Benz g in a few minutes."
"Justin Bieber, who was filmed last month, arrived at Selena Gomez's home in Los Angeles on Sunday, where he and his ex girlfriend played until midnight. According to TMZ, the source told TMZ that the ex couple and mutual friends also played until around midnight..."
“… Join them... "
"After Serena announced last month that she had received a kidney transplant due to complications of lupus, they re established contact."
"TMZ also claimed that Serena and Justin were together last week."
"At the same time, the biebers moved into a high-end neighborhood in Beverly Hills for $55000 a month."
"On the occasion of the new pad party, Justin moved into a high-end community in Beverly Hills on the 23rd and rented a 55000 pound luxury apartment for a month, where he shared this Saturday's self portrait, more ink and tattoos. Keith mccordy spent 26 hours in this luxury hotel for three consecutive days..."



Number  35
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[11]”
“[1]After the Chicago police had held Balfour for the maximum 48 hours allowable without charging him with a crime, he was held by the Illinois Department of Corrections on a parole violation.”
“...his mother Darnell Donerson occurred on October 24 2008”
“They were discovered shot to death inside Donerson's home in Chicago, Illinois.”
“[1] The victims were the brother and mother of singer Jennifer Hudson.”
“Jennifer's seven-year-old nephew Julian King, the son of her elder sister Julia Hudson, was initially reported missing and an AMBER Alert was issued; Julian King's body was found on October 27 in Chicago's West Side area, in a parked car matching the AMBER Alert description.”
“[2] Autopsy results indicated that Julian King's death was due to "multiple gunshot wounds.”
“"[3] A pistol found in a West Side vacant lot was confirmed as the murder weapon by Chicago police.”
“[4]Investigation [ edit ]On the day that the bodies of Hudson's mother and brother were discovered, Chicago police took Julia Hudson's estranged husband William Balfour, 27, into custody but did not file charges against him.”
“[5] Balfour was on parole and spent nearly seven years in prison for attempted murder, vehicular hijacking and possession of a stolen vehicle.”


“[11]”
Chicago police detained Balfour for up to 48 hours without charging him with a crime before he was detained by the Illinois Department of corrections for violating parole rules
“… His mother, Danielle Townsend, happened on October 24, 2008
"They were found shot at the Townsend home in Chicago, Illinois."
"[1] the victims were singer Jennifer Hudson's brother and mother."
Jennifer's seven year old nephew, Julian king, the son of her sister Julia Hudson, was initially reported missing and issued an Amber Alert; Julian King's body was found in a parked car on the west side of Chicago on October 27, which matched the description of the Amber Alert
An autopsy revealed that Julian King's death was due to "multiple gunshot wounds"
"A pistol found in a clearing on the west side was identified as a murder weapon by Chicago police."
On the day the bodies of Hudson's mother and brother were found, Chicago police detained 27 year old Julia Hudson's separated husband, William Balfour, but did not charge him
Balfour was paroled for attempted murder, hijacking and possession of stolen vehicles and served nearly seven years in prison



Number  36
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Good luck!”
“Once the dust has settled, it's time to move on Jen.”
“...few tips from Rachel from Friends After two years of marriage Jennifer Aniston and Justin Theroux have called it quits...”
“Though rather than wallowing in self depression and feeling unlucky in love we have no doubt that Jen will be getting over Justin in true Rachel from Friends style and here s how She ll keep reminding herself about the...”
“...reason she ended it The best way to get over an ex is to strip back all the good times you spent together and remember the reason you broke up...”
“Whilst Justin Theroux might not have cheated, there’s no doubt a good reason why they chose to call it quits after two years of marriage.”
“The more Jen remembers the reason, the easier it will be to move on.”
“Partake in an epic girls night...A boozy girls night in can work as the perfect healer.”
“Whilst doing this in wedding dresses like Monica Phoebe and Rachel might not be the healthiest way to go Jennifer knows all too well that getting your friends to perk you up is a great reminder that things are going...”
“...to be ok A night out on the town also never hurts...”


"Good luck!"
"Once the dust has settled, it's time to leave Jane."
“… Suggestions from friends after two years of marriage to Rachel: Jennifer Aniston and Justin Cyrus have broken up... "
"Although Jane doesn't feel miserable indulging in self depression and love, we have no doubt that she will get rid of Justin and real Rachel from her friend's style. Here's how she will constantly remind herself about..."
“… The reason why she ended all this is that the best way to forget her ex boyfriend is to erase all the good times you spent together and remember the reason why you broke up... "
"Although Justin seru may not have cheated, there is no doubt that there are good reasons for them to choose to break up after two years of marriage."
"The more Jane remembers the reason, the easier it is to move on."
"An epic girl's night A drunken girl's night can be the perfect healer. "
"Although wearing a wedding dress like Monica Phoebe and Rachel may not be the healthiest way, Jennifer knows very well that letting your friends cheer you up is a good reminder that things are developing..."
“… It doesn't hurt to have a good night in town... "



Number  37
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments below!”
“Source: GettyWhat do you think of Liam’s career switch?”
““Liam has an eye for fashion and has potential for designing down the road,” the insider shared.”
“The source even revealed that Miley’s man may want to design some day!”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyAnd modeling may not be the end of the line for Liam.”
“Source: GettyAccording to the insider, Liam is already close to achieving his goal, with brands like Calvin Klein, Ralph Lauren, and Burberry all vying for the Aussie hunk to star in their campaigns.”
“Stripping down for an underwear shoot may not be that different!”
“The actor often puts his abs on display while catching waves in Malibu.”
“...readers know, Liam keeps his body in shape with regular surfing.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDAs OK!”


"Please leave a message in the comments below!"
"Source: what do you think of Liam's career change?"
"Liam has a great eye for fashion and potential in future design," the insider shared
"The source even revealed that Miley's people may want to design one day!"
"The article continues with the following advertising sources: Getty and modeling may not be Liam's bottom line."
"Source: according to people familiar with the matter, Liam is close to achieving its goal, and brands like Calvin Klein, Ralph Lauren and Burberry are competing for the Australian's star in their campaign."
"Maybe it's no different to strip and shoot underwear!"
"The actor often shows his ABS when Malibu grabs the waves."
“…… As readers know, Liam often surfs to keep fit. "
The article continues with the following advertising source: backgradas OK



Number  38
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us how you feel below!”
“HollywoodLifers, are YOU happy to hear Kylie’s loving pregnancy?”
“The ‘Keeping Up With the Kardashians’ star IS battling morning sickness, but she has been both ‘happy and excited’ since becoming pregnant.”
““Kylie [Jenner] has been battling slight morning sickness during her first trimester,” but don’t worry because “she has been laughing her way to the bathroom in the morning, as she endures the entirely new experience.”
“Kylie has been sleeping more now that she is pregnant and spending more time in bed, relaxing and dealing with her subtle body changes.”
“Despite battling morning sickness, Kylie has been happy, excited and positively glowing since becoming pregnant.”
“She wears it really well,” a source close to Kylie tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“Isn’t that amazing?”
“We love hearing that Kylie, 20, is putting on a brave face despite battling morning sickness, because let’s be real — sometimes pregnancy isn’t pretty.”
“And by that, we just mean that it can often be painful.”


"Tell us how you feel!"
"Hollywood stars, are you happy to hear that Kelly is pregnant?"
"The star of" keeping up with Kardashian "is struggling with morning sickness, but since she became pregnant, she has been" happy and excited. "
"Kelly (Jenner) has been struggling with mild morning sickness in her first three months of pregnancy," but don't worry, because "she's always going to the bathroom with a smile, because she's enduring a new experience."
"Kelly is pregnant now, sleeping more, spending more time in bed, relaxing and dealing with subtle changes in her body."
"Despite fighting morning sickness, Kelly has been happy, excited and radiant since she became pregnant."
"She's well dressed," a source close to Kelly told reporters
"Isn't that amazing?"
"We're glad to hear that Kelly, 20, despite her fight against morning sickness, has a brave face, because let's be honest - sometimes pregnancy is not beautiful."
"So we mean, it's often painful."



Number  39
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Share in the comments below.”
“Angelina Now that Angelina has left Brad George took the opportunity to get Brad back together with Jennifer Have something to add to the story...”
“After Jennifer and Justin announced their split he encouraged Brad reach out and give their relationship another chance a source told Star magazine While Jennifer was close to George when she was with the Pitt in late 1990s until early 2005 George was shunted out of Brad s life by...”
“George was the first person to call him when his marriage to Angelina Jolie imploded.”
“"They've been secretly getting together for late night hook ups and it's all because of George.”
“PHOTO: POPSUGARPHOTO: VOGUE ITALYPHOTO: EVENING STANDARDActors Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston are reportedly considering giving their relationship another chance.Brad and Jennifer have been secretly meeting after George Clooney encouraged Brad to reach out to Jennifer following her split from Justin Theroux.”


"Share the comments below."
"Angelina, now that Angelina has left Brad, George takes the opportunity to reunite Brad and Jennifer. There are some things that can contribute to the story..."
"After Jennifer and Justin announced their breakup, he encouraged Brad to lend a helping hand and give their relationship a new opportunity, a source told Star Magazine, while Jennifer was close to George when she and Pete were in the late 1990s and until early 2005, George was shunted out of Brad's life by..."
"When his marriage to Angelina Jolie broke up, George was the first to call him."
"They've been secretly getting together late at night, all because of George."
Photo source: Pop sgarphoto:VOGUE-ITALYPHOTO : nightendard actors Brad Pitt and Jennifer Aniston are said to be considering opportunities to re-establish their relationship. Brad has been meeting in secret since George Clooney encouraged Brad to break up with Jennifer



**Something goes wrong**
“News, "Samantha's expertise is the protection of children and over the past few weeks, Angelina's come to rely on her counsel and decided to put her in the lead."”
“A source familiar with the proceedings also tells E!”
“"Angelina appreciates Laura's cooperation in transitioning the case over the past several weeks."”
“News in a statement.”
“"Angelina decided to change counsel to Samantha Bley DeJean of Bley and Bley, as Samantha's expertise is the protection and best interests of children," Mindy Nyby, spokesperson for Jolie tells E!”
“The 43-year-old Oscar winner has parted ways with divorce attorney Laura Wasser and will now be working with Samantha Bley DeJean.”
“Angelina Jolie is moving in a new direction amid her ongoing court battle with Brad Pitt.”


"News," Samantha's expertise is child protection, and in the past few weeks, Angelina has come to rely on her advice and decided to let her take the lead
"A person familiar with the matter told e!"
"Angelina thanks Laura for her cooperation in the transfer of cases over the past few weeks."
"The news in the statement."
Julie's spokesman, Mindy nibby, told e
"The 43 year old Oscar winner has broken up with divorce lawyer Laura Wasser and will now work with Samantha bradjean."
"Angelina Jolie is moving in a new direction in her court battle with Brad Pitt."



**Something goes wrong**
““Nothing is off limits.”This article was originally published on Vogue.com.”
““What I love about Ri is that she’s such a non-conformist, which pushes your boundaries of creativity,” says Weaver.”
“Though he’s mum on when we’ll see the next jaw-dropping Rihanna outfit, their partnership ensures plenty of great fashion on the horizon.”
““I have an amazing assistant Amir that really helps me stay organised and calm which allows me to just focus on all these crazy ideas,” he says.”
“...so NOT Coachella that it made us love the idea even more Making these unique pieces work requires styling magic and foresight and Weaver gives credit where it s due...”
“The Gucci team is so great to us and such a pleasure to work with and they made it happen The love at first sight rule also applied to the gauzy Y Project creation which came with extreme UGGs that made it an outside the box choice It was just...”
““So we started to think of what’s the next opportunity to wear this?”
““Ri and I both instantly loved it when it came down the runway,” says Weaver.”
“Case in point: the moment the balaclava turned up at Alessandro Michele’s autumn/winter 2018 Gucci show, it was destined to be worn.”
“Though they started to officially brainstorm a month in advance, when Weaver and Rihanna saw a great piece during February’s fashion month, they made a mental note.”


"Nothing is forbidden zone." This article was first published on fashion.com. "
"What I like about Li is that she's a non conformist, which will break through the limits of your creativity," Weaver said
"Although he's the mother when we're going to see the next amazing Rihanna outfit, their collaboration ensures a lot of fashion coming up."
"I have a great assistant, Amir, who really helps me stay organized and calm, so I can focus on all these crazy ideas," he said
“… So it's not cochella, it makes us more like the idea that making these unique works work requires modeling magic and foresight and Weaver gives credit, which is deserved... "
"The Gucci team is so great to us, and it's so pleasant to work with them. They have realized this. The principle of love at first sight is also applicable to frivolous project creation. This is an extreme ugg, which makes it an out of the box choice. It's just..."
"So we started to think about the next chance to wear this?"
"When it came off the track, Lee and I loved it," Weaver said
"For example: when Balaclava appears on Alessandro Michele's Gucci show in autumn and winter of 2018, it is destined to be put on."
"Although they started formally brainstorming a month in advance, when weaver and Rihanna saw a great piece at fashion month in February, they still kept their heart in mind."



Number  42
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“When you come to a wedding you don’t just go, ‘here, this is what you’re wearing’.”
“She got to reflect her in it.”Asked whether the American had contributed her own ideas to the creation, Ms McCartney said: “Yeah, we worked together.”
““It was very much her dress, and I felt very proud that she came to me for that part of the wedding.”
“And as a designer and as a woman who’s been married, it’s such a big deal.”
“Speaking on the BBC, Ms McCartney said: “I feel it’s such a private experience.”
“Ms McCartney designed the evening dress alongside the Duchess of Sussex and expressed her joy at making the Duchess feel “a million dollars”.”
“Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”


"When you come to a wedding, you don't just say, 'here, this is your dress.'"
Asked if the American had contributed his ideas to creation, Ms. McCartney said, "yes, we worked together."
"It's very much like her dress, and I'm very proud that she came to the part of the wedding."
"As a designer and a married woman, it's a big deal."
"I think it's such a personal experience," McCartney told the BBC
Ms. McCartney and the Duchess of Sussex designed the evening dress together and expressed her joy at making the Duchess feel "million dollars"
"Sign up now and don't miss the top Royal stories any more."
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"Our privacy statement explains in detail how we use your data and your rights."
"Sometimes it includes suggestions for other relevant newsletters or services we provide."



Number  43
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Her and I have been bonding and shopping for the new baby.”
“She's on the favourite child list.”
“She told Australia’s KIIS 1065’s Kyle & Jackie O: “The last couple days it's been Khloe.”
“Earlier this month, Jenner quipped that her “favourite child” changes every day but Khloé Kardashian – who is expecting her first child – was at the top of the list.”
““They’re in the process of having all the paperwork completed with the hope they might even be able to take their son home next month.”Standard Online have contacted representatives for Jenner for comment.”
“...a five year old boy from an orphanage on the outskirts of LA”
“In love Reports suggest Kris Jenner s boyfriend Corey Gamble has fallen in love with a five year old boy Alberto E Rodriguez Getty Images Seeing so many of her own offspring have children has made her broody to have another The insider continued Corey s fallen in love with...”
“A source told Closer Magazine: “Kris has been desperate for another child ever since her eldest daughter, Kourtney, gave birth to her first grandchild, Mason, eight years ago.”
“But reports suggest that the famous Momager is looking to adopt a five-year-old boy with her boyfriend Corey Gamble.”
“Jenner is already a mother six times over and a grandmother to eight beautiful infants, most recently welcoming Chicago and Stormi to the family.”


"She and I have been together, shopping for our new baby."
"She's on the list of favorite kids."
"The last few days have been Khloe," she told Kyle and Jackie o of kiis1065 in Australia
Earlier this month, Jenner joked that her "favorite child" was changing every day, but Carol Kardashian, who was about to have her first child, was at the top of the list
"They are finishing all the paperwork and hope to take their son home next month." Standard online has contacted Jenner's representative for comments
"A five-year-old boy from a suburban Los Angeles orphanage"
"Love reports show that Chris Jenner's boyfriend, Corey Gambo, fell in love with a 5-year-old boy, Alberto Rodriguez Getty. Seeing so many of her offspring have children, she has another person Corey Gambo falls in love with in a depressed way..."
"Chris has been eager to have another child since her eldest daughter Courtney gave birth to her first grandson, Mason, eight years ago," a source told closer magazine
"But there are reports that the famous mother is planning to adopt a five-year-old boy with her boyfriend, Corey Gambo."
Jenner has been the grandmother of more than six mothers and eight beautiful babies, and recently he has welcomed Chicago and Tommy to the family



Number  44
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us in the comments!”
“He’s an NBA star who plays for the Lakers, for goodness sake!”
“Sure, Lakers player Jordan Clarkson is cute and nice, but Kim allegedly doesn’t think he’s famous enough to date Kendall!”
““Kim [Kardashian] thinks Jordan [Clarkson] isn’t famous enough [to date Kendall Jenner],” a source told Life & Style magazine.”
““He’s a nice guy, but he barely has 150,000 followers on Twitter and she’d never heard of him until Kendall brought him up.”
“[She] told Kendall that dating Jordan isn’t a smart move, and that she should be dating a famous rapper or musician if she wants to gain popularity.”UPDATE: a source has told HollywoodLife.com that this is not true.”
“Wow!”
“To think that having 150,000 followers on Twitter is something to be ashamed of!”
“Kim, 35, has incredibly high standards for herself, and she wants Kendall, 20, to find a guy who’s her equal, just like she did with husband Kanye West, 38.”
“But calling 24-year-old Jordan un-famous is pretty unfair.”


"Tell us in the comments!"
"For God's sake, he's an NBA star for the Lakers!"
"Of course, Laker Jordan Clarkson is cute and nice, but it's said Kim doesn't think he's famous enough to date Kendall!"
"Kim [Kardashian] doesn't think Jordan [Clarkson] is famous enough [dating Kendall Jenner]," a source told life and fashion magazine
"He's a good man, but he doesn't have nearly 150000 followers on twitter, and she didn't hear of him until Kendall brought him up."
"(she) told Kendall that it's not wise to date Jordan and that if she wants to be popular, she should date a famous rap singer or musician." It's not true
"Wow
"It's a shame to think that there are 150000 followers on twitter!"
"Kim, 35, is very demanding of herself. She hopes Kendall, 20, can find a man like her, just like she and her husband Kanye West, 38."
"But it's quite unfair to say that 24-year-old Jordan is not famous."



**Something goes wrong**
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“The mansion was put on the block in 2016, and the couple agreed to split the profits, insiders said.”
“Gavin Won't Budge On Price Of Home He Cheated InGwen Trapped In $35M Sex House!”
“Gavin Won't Budge On Price Of Home He Cheated In Stefani stuck in the mansion where Rossdale cheated with the family nanny!”
“Gwen Stefani is stuck in the mansion where ex Gavin Rossdale cheated with the family nanny — because he won’t lower the price, RadarOnline.com has learned exclusively!”
“The Beverly Hills pad carries a whopping $35 million price tag, but it’s only worth about half that, and Gavin refuses to budge, sources told Radar.”
““Gwen is trapped!” dished a source.”
““You have to hand it to Gavin.”
“He’s worked this out so Gwen has to sleep in the same house where he cheated on her.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"The mansion was built in 2016, and the couple agreed to share the profits," the source said
"Gavin won't give in on the house price. He cheated the English teacher trapped in the $35 million sex room!"
"Gavin won't budge on the price of the house he cheated in Stefanie. He's trapped in the mansion where rosdale and his nanny cheated!"
"Gwen Stefani is trapped in a mansion cheated by the former Gavin Rossdale and the Housekeeper - because he won't cut prices, RadarOnline.com The website has learned! "
"Beverly Hills apartments are priced at as much as $35 million, but only half the price. Gavin refuses to give in, the source told radar."
"Gwen's trapped! "Provides a source."
"You have to give it to Gavin."
"He's solved it, so Gwen has to sleep in the same room he cheated her on."



**Something goes wrong**
“Sound off in the comments.”
“Source: INSTARImagesWhat are your thoughts on Khloe's warning before the episode airs?”
“One of its main stars, Khloe Kardashian, has issued a warning about what fans will see on the show prior to it airing, where she discussed one particular topic that occurred throughout the entire time they filmed the hit series.”
“Article continues below advertisementMajor drama has already played out between the family, even before the first episode aired.”
“A clip that was posted from the show earlier last week found Kim and Kourtney getting into it over a photo shoot, which ended with the former saying she's "the least exciting to look at" about her older sister.”
“Source: MEGAEven though Kourtney is reportedly not on good terms with Kim regarding the fight, the warning that Khloe issued about tonight's episode had nothing to do with that.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: MEGAWhat she discussed on her Instagram story on Sunday had to do with her "pregnancy lips" that she developed when she was with child.”
“The 34-year-old gave birth to her daughter True back in April.”
“Source: MEGA"PSA I was pregnant during the entire season of KUWTK," Khloe revealed on her IG story.”
“"Some women get 'pregnancy lips'.”


"Voice in comments."
"Source: instarimages before the show, what do you think of Khloe's warning?"
"One of the main stars of the show, Khloe Kardashian, had already issued a warning before the show, reminding fans what they would see before the show, and she discussed a specific topic during the whole process of shooting the hit show."
The article continues below. Before the first episode, there was a big play between the family
A video released earlier last week found Kim and Courtney involved in a photo shoot, with the former finally saying she was the "least noteworthy" sister
"Source: Although kurtni and Kim Jong Il are reported to have a bad relationship in this battle, Khloe's warning about tonight's incident has nothing to do with it."
The article continues with the following ad source: what megasa said in her instagram report on Sunday is related to the "pregnant lips" she developed when she was pregnant
"At the age of 34, she gave birth to her daughter in April
"Source: Mega," Khloe revealed in her funny story, "I was pregnant all season at kuwtk."
"Some women have" pregnant lips. "



Number  47
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Sound off in the comments below.”
“But it’s her loss.”Do you think that Sofia Richie makes a good step-mother to Scott Disick’s kids?”
“If Kourtney really wanted to work things out with Scott she could have.”
““Scott is her man.”
““Sofia has every right to get as close to Scott and his kids as she wants and she thinks that Kourtney just needs to grow the f**k up,” the source told Radar.”
“Since then, Richie — who just inked a massive contract to star on the upcoming season of Keeping up with the Kardashians — has been spotted on numerous occasions with Disick’s kids — much to Kardashian’s dismay.”
““She really just wants Kourtney to stop inserting herself into her and Scott’s life and she wants to be left alone.”As fans know, Kardashian, 39, has been co-parenting her three children with baby daddy Disick, 34, since the pair split over two years ago.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Voice in the comments below."
"But it's her loss." Do you think Sophia Ritchie is a good stepmother for Scott Disick's children? "
"If Courtney really wanted to solve the problem with Scott, she would have done it."
"Scott is her man."
"Sofia has every right to be as close to Scott and his children as possible, and she thinks Courtney just needs to grow up," the source told radar
"Since then, Ritchie - who has just signed a huge contract to keep in touch with Kardashian in the coming season - has been found on many occasions with dirick's children - which has frustrated Kardashian
"She really just wanted Courtney to stop meddling in her and Scott's life. She wanted to be alone." As fans know, Kardashian, 39, has been raising her three children with her 34 year old father, disik, since they broke up two years ago



Number  48
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In October 2018 Yeezy visited The Donald at the White House resplendent in his MAGA hat.”
“That’s just not fair."”
“He then dramatically announced: “I am YE.”He added: "I believe 'ye' is the most commonly used word in the Bible, and in the Bible it means 'You'.”
““The being formally known as Kanye West,” the Jesus Walks star began.”
“He said he would be shortening his name – a bit like how wife Kimberly Kardashian calls herself Kim.”
“The rapper stunned fans on September 29, 2018, when he made a dramatic announcement on Twitter.”
“Why did Kanye change his name to Ye?”
“Many people, including the new US President Donald Trump, have filed for bankruptcy multiple times.”
“Sometimes, it is simply used to manage debt or as an accounting procedure and shouldn't be interpreted as meaning the debtor has no money.”
“...necessarily mean you are completely broke...”


"In October 2018, yezzi, wearing a top hat, made a dazzling visit to Donald in the White House."
"It's not fair."
He then dramatically announced, "I am." "I believe 'Ye' is the most common word in the Bible, which means' you 'in the Bible," he added
"Officially known as kanyesi," Jesus began his walk
"He said he would shorten his name - a bit like his wife, Kimberly Kardashian, calling herself Kim."
"The rapper surprised fans with a dramatic announcement on twitter on September 29, 2018."
"Why did kenye change his name to ye?"
"Many people, including the new US President trump, have filed for bankruptcy many times."
"Sometimes it is only used to manage debt or as an accounting process and should not be interpreted as the debtor has no money."
“… It must mean you're broke... "



Number  49
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“If you are using ad-blocking software, please disable it and reload the page.”
“Rumors have been swirling this week that the 46-year-old actor-writer is dating Petra Collins after his Instagram followers took notice of a photo he posted of himself with the 25-year-old artist back in February.”
“Theroux shared the pic on the same day he was photographed at the Adam Selman show during New York Fashion Week.”
“"Justin is still heartbroken," a source tells ET, adding that Theroux is not one to play the field but rather prefers to be in a relationship and is still reeling over the fact that his marriage to Aniston did not work out.”
“Meanwhile, another source tells ET that the former Leftovers star has been relying on his friends to help him cope with the breakup, and notes that Theroux "had a nice time" during his "guys' trip" to Paris, France, earlier this month.”
“When abroad, the newly single star attended the Louis Vuitton runway show during Paris Fashion Week, and while his pals might have been eager to hit the town and flirt with women, Theroux was friendly rather than flirty, according to the source.”
“Getty ImagesA third source tells ET that Theroux is, however, ready for "his next phase in life."”
“As for his relationship with Collins, the third source says the two met through Selena Gomez when "they all hung out together."”
“"She is artsy and edgy and loves the New York nightlife," the source says of Collins before calling out that Gomez -- who's also friendly with Aniston -- recently unfollowed the artist on Instagram.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
If you are using ad blocking software, disable it and reload the page
"It's rumored this week that the 46 year old actor and writer is dating Petra Collins because his instagram fans noticed that he released a picture of himself with the 25-year-old artist in February."
"Theroux shared this photo the same day he was photographed on the Adam Salman show at New York Fashion week."
"Justin is still heartbroken," a source told et, adding that seru is not a field to play in, but rather prefers to be in a relationship, which is still haunted by the fact that his marriage with Aniston did not succeed
Meanwhile, another source told et that the former star had been relying on her friends to help him deal with the breakup, noting that ceroux "had a good time" on a "men's trip" to Paris earlier this month
According to sources, when he was abroad, the new single star took part in the Louis Vuitton runway show during Paris fashion week. Although his friends may want to go to the city to flirt with women, serrux is friendly, not flirting
A third source told et that seru was ready for "the next stage of his life."
As for his relationship with Collins, a third source said the two met through Selena Gomez, who was "together."
"She's artistic and avant-garde and loves New York's nightlife," the source said before Collins, who called Gomez - who is also friendly with Aniston - recently launched an artist on instagram



Number  50
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Read more about:”
“She’s absolutely fearless with her style, her dancing, her performing, and as a person in her clothes.”However, in April 2017, Dion told The Sun she wasn’t ready to enter the dating world again.”
“This was just one year after husband René Angélil passed away from a heart attack.”
“Here’s what we know about their relationship and Dion’s alleged boyfriend.”
“Her reps originally denied the reports, insisting that the two are just friends.”
“About a year ago, the two were spotted together in Paris, where Muñoz accompanied her to the Giambattista Valli fashion show.”
“GET CELINE DION CONCERT TICKETS!”
“Muñoz told Vogue about working with and getting to know Dion.”
““She’s the kind of person [for whom] the day has no schedule, no time, no nothing, so whenever she feels the creativity coming, that’s what happens,” he said.”
““She makes you feel welcome, like you belong to the family, and like you’re part of the group.”


Learn more:
"She's absolutely fearless about her style, her dance, her performance, and being a person in clothes." In April 2017, however, Dion told the sun that she was not ready to enter the dating world again
"Just a year ago, her husband Rene Angel died of a heart attack."
"Here's what we know about their relationship and Dion's so-called boyfriend."
"Her representatives initially denied the reports, insisting they were just friends."
"About a year ago, they were found together in Paris, and Mu NIOS accompanied her to the Giambattista Valli fashion show."
"Get Celine Dion's concert tickets!"
"Munios told vogue about working with Dion and getting to know Dion."
"She's the kind of person who (for her) has no schedule, no time, nothing in a day, so that's what happens when she feels creative," he said
"She makes you feel welcome, as if you belong to the family, as if you are part of the group."



Number  51
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“FYI: Irina is carrying a Bally bag.”
“I love u forever my pumpkin happy bday ❤️❤️❤️,” Irina captioned with her Facebook post the following day (December 12).”
“Brother, agent, friend he was there for me 24/7/365!”
““On this special day, wanna wish this special person only the best!”
“Irina and Bradley, 41, have not yet officially confirmed the news that they’re expecting, though sources have confirmed the news.”
“PHOTOS: Check out the latest pics of Irina ShaykShortly after, Irina was seen munching on a little snack as they headed back to their car.”
“The 30-year-old model kept close to Gloria as they were spotted heading into Whole Foods Market to grab some groceries together.”
“Pregnant Irina Shayk spent her Sunday with Bradley Cooper‘s mom Gloria!”


"For reference only: Elena is carrying a ball bag."
"I love you forever, my pumpkin. Happy birthday ❤️❤️❤️ "The next day (December 12), Elena posted a headline on Facebook."
"Brother, agent, friend, he works for me 24 hours a day!"
"On this special day, I just want to wish this special person the best!"
"Elena and Bradley, 41, have not officially confirmed what they expect, but the source has confirmed it."
"Photo: check out the latest photo of Elena Scheck. Soon after, someone saw Elena chewing a snack on the way back."
"The 30-year-old model was in close contact with Gloria because they were found to be coming into the whole food market together and snapping up some groceries."
Pregnant Irina sheck spent Sunday with Bradley Cooper's mother Gloria



**Something goes wrong**
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“BackgridShelton -- who divorced Miranda Lambert in 2015 -- is also pretty smitten with Stefani.”
“The two were recently spotted strolling down the beach in Playa del Carmen, Mexico, and even ran into Shelton's pal, Luke Bryan.”
“Stefani wore a white bikini top that she paired with a black sarong and a tan sweater, while Shelton sported a blue trucker hat that matched his board shorts and button-down shirt.”
“While they may have been an unexpected pair when they first started dating, Shelton and Stefani have been going strong for some time now.”
“Backgrid"Gwen really loves Blake for who he is and has never once tried to change him or anything about him.”
“She even loves his style!"”
“...the source tells ET.”
“"She thinks he's such a manly man and is incredibly attracted to that about him."”
“When they're not taking romantic walks along the beach, the couple often visit Shelton's house in Oklahoma along with Stefani's three sons with ex-husband Gavin Rossdale, 11-year-old Kingston, 9-year-old Zuma and 3-year-old Apollo.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"Beckgrid Sheldon, who divorced Miranda Lambert in 2015, is also fascinated by Stephanie."
"Recently they were found wandering on Carmen beach in Mexico and even met Sheldon's friend Luke Bryan."
Stefani wore a white bikini top with a black sarong and Tan sweater, while Sheldon wore a blue trucker hat to match his board shorts and button down shirt
"Although they may have been an unexpected couple when they first started dating, Sheldon and Stephanie have been gone for some time."
"Background" Gwen really loves black because of who he is and has never tried to change him or anything about him
"She even likes his style!"
“… Source tells et
"She thinks he's a very manly person and is fascinated by that."
"When they don't take romantic walks on the beach, the couple often visit Sheldon's house in Oklahoma with Stefani's three sons, as well as Gavin Rossdale, Kingston, 11, Zuma, 9 and Apollo, 3."



**Something goes wrong**
“Comment below, let us know!”
“Tell us, HollywoodLifers — What do YOU think about J.Lo calling Drake a “booty call” in concert?”
“Em.”
“Gee.”
“Jennifer Lopez totally dissed ex flame Drake during her Las Vegas concert by flat-out referring to him as just a ‘booty call’ as the crowd cheered.”
“You HAVE to see this video!”
“Jennifer Lopez, 47, seems to finally be setting the record straight about her romance with Drake, 30, in early 2017.”
“The “All I Have” singer took the stage for her Las Vegas, Nevada residency on Wednesday, May 24, and threw a little shade in the middle of her performance.”
“One fan was filming when Jennifer was dancing around the stage with her backup dancers behind her.”
“Suddenly the music slows down and plays what sounds EXACTLY like Drake’s “Hotline Bling,” and J.Lo stops dead in her tracks.”


"The comments are as follows, let us know!"
Tell us, Hollywood stars, what do you think of Luo Guancong calling Drake "booty call" at the concert
"Well."
"Oh, dear."
"At her Las Vegas Concert, Jennifer Lopez bluntly called ex flam ronk just a" booty call, "cheered the audience
"You have to watch this video!"
"It seems that Jennifer Lopez, 47, finally broke her love record with Drake, 30, in early 2017."
The "all I have" singer cast a shadow during her May 24 (Wednesday) performance at her residence in Las Vegas, Nevada
"When Jennifer was dancing on stage, a fan was filming and her dancers were behind her."
As like as two peas of music, Drake suddenly stopped playing music. Bling was just like the one on Drake's "hotline".



Number  54
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It’s currently being drafted, according to Gossip Cop.”
“The message was in no way a massive hint to the royals that he and Michelle were “available” to attend their wedding ceremony.”
“A fabricated story that Michelle Obama tried to “sneak a spot” on Prince Harry and Meghan Markle’s wedding guest list is untrue.”
“A blog called Just News USA claimed that Queen Elizabeth “delivered a brutal beatdown” to Michelle for trying to wormhole her way to being one of the exclusive guests at the royal wedding, which is to be held over Memorial Day weekend in 2018.”
“The website also alleged that Barack Obama practically stalked Prince Harry on Twitter sending a message of congratulations to him within seconds of the engagement news coming out which perhaps had an undertone of letting the royals know that he and Michelle were available that day to attend It went...”
“...on to claim that the former president posted a number of desperate tweets to Prince Harry in an effort to score a place on the guest list...”
“The article added that the queen “royally snubbed” Barack and Michelle Obama’s attempts to attend Prince Harry and Meghan Markle’s wedding.”
“Gossip Cop reports that the only shred of truth to the the website’s story is that Barack’s congratulatory message to Prince Harry was soon after the wedding announcement.”
“He wished the prince and Meghan Markle “a lifetime of joy and happiness” on Twitter.”
“Just that alone is false because Harry and Meghan’s wedding date hadn’t yet been revealed until two days after their announcement.”


"According to the gossip police, it is currently being drafted."
"This news is not a hint to the royal family that he and Michelle are" free "to attend their wedding."
Michelle Obama's attempt to "sneak" on Prince Harry and Megan Marcel's wedding guest list is untrue
"A blog called just news USA claims that Queen Elizabeth" brutally suppressed "Michelle because she tried to be one of the exclusive guests at the royal wedding on Memorial Day weekend in 2018."
"The website also claims that Barack Obama actually tracked Prince Harry on twitter, and within seconds of the news of his engagement, he sent a congratulatory message to Prince Harry, which may have a kind of secret tone to let the royal family know that he and Michelle are free to attend that day..."
“…… He claimed that the former president sent many desperate tweets to Prince Harry in order to get a place on the guest list... "
The article also said the Queen "Royal snubbed" Barack and Michelle Obama trying to attend the wedding of Prince Harry and Megan markel
"Gossip police report that the only truth reported on the website is that Barak's congratulatory message to Prince Harry was sent shortly after the wedding announcement."
On twitter, he wished the prince and Megan markel "a happy life"
"That's just wrong, because the date of Harry and Megan's marriage wasn't known until two days after they announced it."



Number  55
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“1501) on Thursday, August 30.”
““If you can find something real in spite of a bad reputation, then isn’t that what matters the most to you?”
“Taylor Swift sent fans into a frenzy when opening up about the meaning of her new album, Reputation, and how she found love again.”
“I think there was a bit of a bait and switch that happened with this album when we put out Look What You Made Me Do and we re like Guys this album is gonna be one thing And then the album came out Swift 28 told fans at her...”
“...intimate Taylor Swift NOW concert hosted by AT T in Chicago on Wednesday August 29 according to Entertainment Tonight...”
““It’s legitimately an album about finding love throughout all the noise.”The Grammy winner elaborated on her remarks, seemingly referencing her boyfriend, Joe Alwyn.”
““I starts with the noise and how that makes all you feel and how it makes you feel when people are saying things about you that you feel, like, aren’t true and living your sort of life in defiance of that.”
“And then, sort of, in the middle of the album you kind of realize, ‘How much do I really value that?’ she explained.”
“And doesn’t it matter the most to you that you know who your real friends are now?”Alwyn, 27, has supported Swift on many stops along her Reputation tour.”
“1113) or DIRECTV NOW or U-Verse (Ch.”


"1501) Thursday, August 30."
"If you can find something real in a bad reputation, isn't that the most important thing for you?"
"Taylor Swift surprised fans when she revealed the significance of her new album, her reputation and how she found love again."
"I think this album has a little bit of bait and switch, when we launch to see what you want me to do, we're just like men, this album will be one thing, and then the album comes out, swift 28 tells fans in her..."
“… Intimate Taylor Swift is now hosting the at t concert in Chicago on Wednesday August 29 under Entertainment Tonight
"It's an album about finding love in the hustle and bustle." The Grammy winner detailed her comments, as if referring to her boyfriend Joe Alvin
"I'll start with noise. When people say something you don't think is true, how do you feel, how do you feel, how do you feel, how do you feel, and live a life that ignores that feeling."
"Then, in the middle of the album, you realize, 'how much do I value that? "She explained
"Do you know who your true friends are that's not the most important thing to you? "Alvin, 27, has supported swift at many stops on her reputation tour."
"1113) or DirecTV now or u-verse (Ch.)



**Something goes wrong**
“Bernard Cross, Hemel Hempstead EnglandAdd your answer...”
“...a name like that George VI was Albert Frederick Arthur George and known as Bertie...”
“Rob Moseley, Loughborough Uni Charles II spent much of his time consorting with a very attractive, extremely buxom, young lady called Nell Gwynne.”
“Maybe our present Charles would welcome such misfortune!”
“David Vickery, Croydon, UK My understanding is that upon accession the Monarch is entitled to be crowned as, and therefore known by, any name (s)he chooses.”
“Hence King George VI (real name, I think, Albert, or Bertie), similarly King Edward VII's real name was I think Albert and King George V's real name was David.”
“The last one does sound a bit unlikely, but I seem to remember reading it somewhere.”
“Similarly, since the death of big bad much maligned Richard III, no-one seems to have been particularly keen to use the name Richard.”
“On the other hand, each royal house has tended to have its preferred first names, so maybe we shouldn't read too much into these things.”
“To answer the question, I don't think Prince Charles would have to change his name but he could if he wanted.”


"Bernard cross, Heimer Hempstead, English, please answer..."
“… Names like George VI are Albert Frederick Arthur George, Bertie... "
"Rob Mosley, Charles II of Loughborough University, spent a lot of time with a very charming, very plump young lady named Nell Gwen."
"Perhaps our present Charles would welcome such misfortune!"
"David Vickery, British Croydon, my understanding is that the monarch has the right to be crowned by any name he chooses as soon as he enters the world, and therefore known to him."
"So King George VI (I think his real name is Albert, or Bertie), King Edward VII's real name is Albert, I think, and King George V's real name is David."
"The last one does sound a bit unlikely, but I seem to remember reading it somewhere."
"Coincidentally, no one seems to be particularly keen to use the name Richard III since the Great Britain was criticized."
"On the other hand, every royal family has its own favorite name, so maybe we shouldn't read too much about these things."
"To answer this question, I don't think Prince Charles needs to change his name, but he can change his name if he wants to."



**Something goes wrong**
“"... She can tell me to f*** off all she wants.”
“You jumped that ship as soon as you did Diane Sawyer and attacked my mum', and instead, [she] tells me to 'get a life' and 'shut up' and I'm like, 'you shut up and you get a f***ing life.”
“I mean, just f*** you, Bruce."”
“"I honestly wish I never met this man.”
“"He can go f*** himself," she cries down the phone to a deadpan Kim.”
“October 2015: Season 10 of Keeping up with the Kardashians shows Kris' reaction to the Vanity Fair interview and she is, shall we say, more explicit with her wording.”
“Let's focus on the actual cause here and not drag my mum through the mud."”
“In our opinion you don't even need to mention my mum.”
“Caitlyn tells Khloe sent her "tough" text messages, to which Khloe responds: "I said we don't care what you're doing... we want to be there and support you but we don't think that entails you speaking negatively about my mum.”
“...show, I Am Cait, Khloe is seen visiting Caitlyn where she takes issue with her comments about Kris.”


"... she can tell me what she wants to do."
"As soon as you killed Diane Sawyer, you jumped out of the boat and attacked my mother." instead, (she) told me to "live" and "shut up." I said, "shut up and you'll live."
"I mean, it's just you, Bruce."
"I wish I had never met this man."
"He can go on his own," she called to the expressionless Kim on the phone
"October 2015: Season 10" follow the kardashians "shows Chris's reaction to the vanity fair interview, and we can say that her wording is more explicit."
"Let's focus on the practical reasons and don't drag my mother down."
"In our opinion, you don't even have to mention my mother."
Caitlin told Chloe to send her a "tough" text message, and Chloe responded, "I said we don't care what you're doing... We want to be there to support you, but we don't think that means you have to say negative things to my mom. "
“… Show, I'm Kate, Chloe was seen interviewing Caitlin and she commented on her Chris questions



**Something goes wrong**
““She’s forgetful I guess.””
“If you’ve not seen the GIF, you’ve probably not spent a lot of time on the web.”
“...the Lambs Recently...”
“I think it s kind of from word of mouth of things that have happened in the past that I m not really aware of Then last year Carey was doing an interview with The Cut in which she was asked about gifts she receives from her army of fans...”
““Like, we don’t know each other.”
““I know from back in the day, I’ve read things that she’s said about me that were not the greatest, but we have never met,” Lopez, who is no amateur at delivering a verbal knockout, said.”
“...the shade of it all...”
“The Aftermath It is years later I don t know her has become perhaps the most iconic words to come out of Mariah Carey s mouth since all I want for Christmas is you It was Andy Cohen in 2014 who was the first to ask J Lo directly about...”
“And, immediately, a meme was born.”
“[yawns] I’m sorry, I’m having a “sleep” moment…Well, there was a very interesting shirt that a fan made with a quote that I said years ago that, when I said it, I really wasn’t trying to be funny.”


"I guess she's forgetful."
"If you haven't seen GIF, you probably don't spend a lot of time online."
“… The nearest lamb... "
"I think it's from word of mouth that something happened in the past, I really don't know, and then last year Kelly was doing a cut interview and she was asked about the gifts she received from her fans..."
"For example, we don't know each other."
"I know, from that day on, I've read what she said about me, and although it's not the best, we've never seen it," said Lopez, who is not good at knocking down opponents verbally
“… The shadow of all this... "
"In the aftermath of many years, I don't know that she may have become the most representative word in Maria Kelly's mouth, because at Christmas, I just want you, Andy Cohen of 2014, to be the first to ask J. Rowe directly..."
"And then a meme was born."
(yawns) sorry, I have a "sleep" time Well, there's a very interesting shirt. A fan made it with a sentence I said a few years ago. When I said it, I didn't really mean to be funny. "



**Something goes wrong**
“Let us know in the comments.”
“Source: GettyWhat do you think about Miley and Liam planning to have their first kid?”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDNow, they're making room for one more!”
“Source: BACKGRIDThere's also been reports that the two recently secretly married.”
“"Miley loves the idea of kitting it out with great vintage pieces and is trawling Pinterest for inspiration.”Article continues below advertisementSource: BACKGRIDMiley and Liam recently purchased a $5.8 million mansion in Nashville.”
“...down which crib they want the source continued...”
“Article continues below advertisement Source Zillow There s no word on if she s actually pregnant yet but she wants to be an insider revealed to OK and they re having a great time putting together a nursery for their new Nashville dream home Source BACKGRID They ve already narrowed...”
“Click through for details about how they're already planning their nursery.”
“...that the happy couple has babies on the brain.”
“A source exclusively revealed to OK!”


"Please let us know in the comments."
"Source: what do you think of Miley and Liam's plan to have their first child?"
The article continues with the following advertising source: backgridnow, they are making more space! "
"Source: it has also been reported that the two married secretly recently."
"Miley likes to decorate it with great retro pieces and is looking for inspiration." The article continues with the following advertising source: backgrid, Miley and Liam recently bought a $5.8 million mansion in Nashville
“… They want the source to continue... "
"The article continues with the following advertising source zillow has not said that if she is really pregnant, but she wants to be an insider revealed to OK, they have a great time for their new Nashville dream home source backgrid, they have shrunk the nursery..."
"Click here to learn more about how they plan their nursery."
"This happy couple has children"
"Exclusive to OK's source!"



**Something goes wrong**
“This story has been updated.”
“Still, Affleck and Garner have continued to be seen in public together, attending church or taking the kids to school — though these joint appearances could simply be part of their vow to be hands-on co-parents.”
“But soon after, Affleck more or less went public with his romance with Lindsay Shookus, a “Saturday Night Live” producer whom he may have started seeing when he was still married to Garner.”
“But three years after that initial 2015 announcement, Affleck and Garner, both 45, have yet to finalize their divorce, raising the question: What’s taking so long?”
“A new report by Us Weekly cites sources who say that the “Batman v. Superman” actor is dragging his feet because he would like to get back together with Garner, with whom he has three children.”
“If this description of Affleck is close to accurate, he could be the Oscar-winning, movie star version of “Bachelor” star Arie Luyendyk Jr., who angered Bachelor Nation and the rest of America by vacillating between two women in the show’s final episodes.”
“For her part, Garner really tried to make things work with Affleck — despite his reported struggles with alcohol addiction, gambling and monogamy, according to Us Weekly.”
“This fall, Affleck also had a dark cloud hanging over him following news about multiple sexual misconduct allegations against his regular producing collaborator Harvey Weinstein.”
“In the wake of the Weinstein allegations and the launch of the #MeToo movement, Affleck was accused of groping two women and of being complicit in a Hollywood culture that allows sexually predatory men to stay in power.”
“After Garner and Affleck first announced their split in 2015, the “Alias” actress “put her heart and soul into fixing the relationship and wanted so desperately to turn things around for the children’s sake as well as theirs,” a source told Us Weekly.”


"The story has been updated."
"Despite this, Affleck and Ghana continue to appear in public, go to church together or take their children to school together - although these co-occurrence may be just part of their vows to be co parents who do it themselves."
But before long, Affleck more or less made public his love affair with Lindsay shokus, a "Saturday night live" producer who may have started dating Ghana when he married her
"But three years after the first divorce was announced in 2015, the 45 year old Affleck and Ghana have yet to finalize a divorce agreement, which raises the question: Why did it take so long?"
A new US weekly report quoted sources as saying that the reason why the leading actor of Batman and Superman procrastinates is that he wants to make up with Ghana, who has three children with him
"If the description of Affleck is close to accurate, he may be the Oscar winner and star of the movie star version of the bachelor, Arie luyendyk Jr., who swings between two women in the last few episodes of the play, angering the bachelor country and the rest of the United States."
For Ghana, she really tried to make things go smoothly for Affleck, despite reported difficulties with alcohol addiction, gambling and monogamy, US Weekly reported
In the fall, a dark cloud hung over him, too, after news that Harvey Weinstein, his regular production partner, had been accused of multiple sexual misconduct
"After Weinstein's accusation and the launch of the Mayo movement, Affleck was accused of touching two women and participating in Hollywood culture, which allows sexually abusive men to stay in power."
A source told us weekly: "after Ghana and Affleck first announced their separation in 2015, the" pseudonym "actress" devoted herself to repairing the relationship. For the sake of the children and their children, she really wanted to turn the situation around. "



Number  61
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Subscribe to our newsletter.”
“Photo: Hollywood LifeWhile Bloom and Perry were reportedly still together, Bloom was spotted out with pop princess Selena Gomez — and they reportedly got very close and comfortable with each other.”
“After seeing the photo, Bloom admitted to Elle that had he known he was being watched and photographed, "I wouldn't have put myself in that position if I'd thought it would happen."”
“So I had a moment of feeling free."”
“There was no way anyone could get anything.”
“Nothing around us.”
“"We'd been completely alone for five days.”
“I have a good radar," he stated.”
“"I've been photographed a million times in a million ways.”
“In an interview with Elle UK, Bloom admitted he had no idea there was paparazzi following them.”


"Subscribe to our newsletters."
"Photo: it's reported that while bloom and Perry were still together, bloom was found with pop princess Selena Gomez - they were reported to be very close and comfortable."
"After seeing the photos, bloom admitted to eller that if he knew he was being watched and photographed," if I thought this would happen, I wouldn't put myself in that position. "
"So I have a moment of freedom."
"No one can get anything."
"There's nothing around us."
"We've been completely alone for five days."
"My radar is very good," he said
"I've been photographed countless times."
"In an interview with Elle UK, bloom admitted that he didn't know paparazzi were following them."



Number  62
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Amy Mackelden Weekend Editor Amy Mackelden is the Weekend Editor at HarpersBAZAAR.com, where she writes about entertainment, celebrity news, beauty, and fashion.”
“He seems excited about life."”
“The separation was very dark for him, but lately he looks healthier and happier.”
“As People noted last month, "Brad seems to be in a better place.”
“The divorce news follows reports that Pitt has made some positive changes in his life since his dramatic split from Jolie.”
“The pair are ready to co-parent their six kids, but move on romantically.”
“...terms...”
“Getty Images The Sun is also reporting that the divorce is imminent and that the progress Jolie and Pitt have made is actually really positive It s a huge turnaround from where the marriage ended especially given the claims Angelina made against Brad but they are now on pretty good...”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Amy mceldon is the weekend editor HarpersBAZAAR.com She writes about entertainment, celebrity news, beauty and fashion
"He seems very excited about life."
"Separation is dark for him, but recently he looks healthier and happier."
As people said last month, "Brad seems to be in a better place."
"Before the divorce news, it was reported that there had been some positive changes in Pete's life since his dramatic breakup with Julie."
"The two are going to raise their six children together, but continue to live romantically."
“… Terms... "
"Getty Images sun also reported that the divorce is coming, and the progress made by Julie and Pitt is actually very positive. It's a huge turning point from where the marriage ended, especially considering Angelina's claim against Brad, but they are quite good now..."



Number  63
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““So it just makes it look as if I’ve had, like, 6,000 boyfriends!” Meanwhile, Robert recently called off his engagement to longtime girlfriend FKA twigs.”
““It’s difficult in my dating life because anyone I get photographed with is automatically my boyfriend,” she said.”
“GoldenGlobes While Emma has not spoken out about her new romance she has been very open about dating in the past...”
“My reaction when Emma Watson and Robert Pattinson presented together GoldenGlobes pic twitter com 7PO0uqhmvS Arely Del Toro Mu5icGam3s January 8 2018 Harry Potter Vibes with Emma Watson and Robert Pattinson one fan wrote before another added Anyone else geek out over EmmaWatson Robert Pattinson s HarryPotter reunion at the...”
“As expected, viewers were beyond excited about seeing the pair together on the little screen.”
“They’ve always had chemistry, but the timing has never been right — until now.”The new couple seemingly went public at the 2018 Golden Globes, where they presented the award for Best TV Movie or Limited Series, which went to HBO’s Big Little Lies.”
““They share the same sense of humor and have so much in common.”
““They’ve been texting and enjoying secret dinners together in LA and London,” a source told In Touch exclusively, explaining that Emma, 27, and Robert, 31, have been friends since they filmed 2005’s Harry Potter and the Goblet of Fire.”
“But she’s already moved on — with Robert Pattinson.”
“It’s been less than two months since news broke that Emma Watson split from tech entrepreneur William “Mack” Knight.”


"So it makes me look like I have 6000 boyfriends! Meanwhile, Robert recently cancelled his engagement to his girlfriend, verka Tevez
"It's very difficult in my dating life because people who take pictures with me automatically become my boyfriends," she said
"Although Emma didn't talk about her new relationship in public, she was very open to past dates..."
"My reaction is that when Emma Watson and Robert Pattinson tweeted" Harry Potter "with Emma Watson and Robert Pattinson on January 8, 2018, one fan wrote before another that someone had joined other geeks at Emma Watson and Robert Pattinson's Harry Potter party..."
"As expected, the audience was thrilled to see them together on the small screen."
"There has been a chemical reaction between them, but the timing has never been right - until now." The couple appear to have made a public appearance at the 2018 Golden Globe, where they presented the best TV movie or limited edition series award to HBO's little lies
"They have the same sense of humor and a lot in common."
"They've been texting and having secret dinners together in Los Angeles and London," a source told contact exclusive, explaining that Emma, 27, and Robert, 31, have been friends since shooting Harry Potter and goblet of fire in 2005
"But she's already with Robert Pattinson."
"It's less than two months since Emma Watson broke up with technology entrepreneur William McKnight."



Number  64
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“TMZ reports Siya was prepared to testify against the Spice Girls singer refuting claims that Belafonte abused her throughout their marriage and share information regarding the sexual relationship Gilles said she had with Mel B and Belafonte.”
“News has reached out to Mel B's legal representatives.”
“E!”
“Siya's manager had no further comment.”
“A LAPD spokesperson tells us the alleged threats were made via text message and that the case is ongoing.”
“News can confirm that rapper Siya filed a police report of witness intimidation on Monday claiming Mel B sent her messages associated with restraining order cases against Gilles and Belafonte.”
“________The Los Angeles Police Department is looking into claims that Mel B tampered with a witness allegedly involved in her legal battles against ex-husband Stephen Belafonte and their former nanny, Lorraine Gilles.”
“The Los Angeles County District Attorney's office tells us they "declined to move forward because the statements are vague and cannot clearly be interpreted as threats."”
“News has learned Mel B will not be prosecuted for the alleged witness intimidation.”


"TMZ reports that thea is preparing to testify against the spice girl singer, refute bellafant's abuse of her during her marriage, and share what Giles said about her sexual relationship with Mel B and bellafant."
"The message has reached Mel B's legal representative."
“E！”
"Siya's manager didn't comment further."
"A LAPD spokesman told us that the so-called threat was sent by text message and the case is under trial."
"News can confirm that rapper thea submitted a witness threat report to police on Monday, claiming that Mel B had sent her information about the injunction case against Jill and Belafonte."
"LAPD is investigating charges that Mel B has tampered with a witness who is alleged to have been involved in a legal battle with her ex husband, Stephen bellafonte, and her former nanny, Lorraine gills."
"The Los Angeles County District Attorney's office told us that they" refused to move forward because the statement was vague and could not be clearly interpreted as a threat. "
"It is said that Mel B will not be charged for intimidating witnesses."



Number  65
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““I wonder if it was his way of saying to [Kris] what I think she was saying to him when she married me: a big f— you,” she wrote.”
“Caitlyn went on to speculate whether part of Robert’s motivation behind defending Simpson was to obtain some form of revenge against his ex-wife Kris Jenner, who was close friends with Brown Simpson.”
“Kim and Kourtney Kardashian travel to Cleveland to visit Khloé Kardashian who spends much of time there with her boyfriend Cavaliers player Tristan Thompson but they re interrupted by a news alert about Caitlyn s then unreleased memoir The Secrets of My Life...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““It says in Caitlyn’s book Robert Kardashian knew O.J.”
“Simpson was guilty, but joined the defense team to get back at his re-married ex,” reads Kim, 36.”
““Robert told Caitlyn in secret after the O.J.”
“...murder trial that he believed his friend was guilty.”“That’s not true!” interrupts Khloé, 33.”
““Like, what?”“Like, to sell a book, you’re gonna make something up?” says Kourtney, 37.”
““Dad so believed in him,” Kim says.”


"I don't know if that's the way he said to [Chris], as I think she said to him when she married me: a big f-you," she wrote
"Caitlin goes on to speculate whether one of Robert's motives in defending Simpson is to take some form of revenge on his ex-wife, Kris Jenner, who is a close friend of brown Simpson."
"Kim and kurtany Kardashian went to Cleveland to visit heloe Kardashian. Kardashian and her boyfriend, Cavaliers player Tristan Thompson, spent a lot of time there, but they were interrupted by a news report about Caitlin's then unpublished memoir, the secret of my life..."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"Caitlin's book says Robert Kardashian knew O.J."
Kim, 36, said: "Simpson is guilty, but he joined the defense team in retaliation for his remarried ex-wife."
"After O.J., Robert told Caitlin in secret."
“… A murder trial in which he found his friend guilty. " "That's not true! "Interrupted khlo é, 33."
"For example, what? "For example, if you want to sell books, you have to make something up? Courtney, 37, said
"Dad trusted him very much," Kim said



Number  66
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“A post shared by Known As Camelton (@cameronsmoller) on Apr 30, 2017 at 12:39pm PDT”
“???”
“The songstress commented on the post with a heart emoji.”
“On April 30, Smoller shared a gorgeous snap of Steinfeld in his car, captioning the sweet snap with three rose emojis.”
“After going public with their romance in December, the duo have been sharing sweet snaps on social media ever since.”
“The Oscar nominee has been dating the 20-year-old since late last year.”
“We’ve been friends for years.”As previously reported by Us Weekly, Steinfeld is, in fact, still dating her boyfriend Cameron Smoller.”
““We’re friends.”
““I don’t know why people make such a big deal,” she said of the rumors.”
“The “Most Girls” singer — who was reported to be dating the Biebs after photos of them FaceTiming surfaced last month and they were seen together on Monday — confirmed that she’s not dating the “Love Yourself” singer.”


"A post shared by Camelton (@ cameronsmoller) on April 30, 2017 at 12:39 p.m. Pacific Daylight Time"
“???”
"The female singer commented on the post with a heart-shaped expression."
"On April 30, smaller shared a wonderful snapshot of Stanfield in his car and subtitled it with three rose emoticons."
"The two have been sharing sweet snapshots on social media since their public love affair last December."
"Oscar nominees have been dating this 20-year-old since the end of last year."
"We've been friends for years." As US Weekly reported earlier, Stanfield is actually dating her boyfriend, Cameron smoller
"We are friends."
"I don't know why people do such big things," she said of the rumors
According to reports, the "most female" singer dated the biebers last month after her photos with them were exposed. She was seen with them again on Monday and confirmed that she did not date the "love yourself" singer



Number  67
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Now that’s true love.”
“Some days she’s almost relieved because it’s shut the door and allowed her to move on.”
“We’ve got details on whether Selena Gomez would get in touch with Justin Bieber if things fall apart with fiancée Hailey Baldwin.”
“Justin Bieber officially put an end to the chance of a reconciliation with Selena Gomez by getting engaged to Hailey Baldwin, 21.”
“While the 26-year-old singer is out there living her best life as a single lady, she still gets Bieber on the brain from time to time.”
““Selena’s happy and very busy with her life, but there are moments she still misses Justin.”
“This is someone she has loved for so long, of course there are lingering feelings.”
“But she is not going to reach out to him or try to interfere with his relationship while he is still with Hailey.”
“But if things fell apart, she would be the first to send him a text.”
“She will always have a place in her heart for her first love,” a source close to the “Wolves” singer tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”


"This is true love."
"For a few days she was almost relieved because it closed the door and allowed her to move on."
"We have the details of whether Serena Gomez will get in touch with Justin Bieber if her relationship with her fiancee Haley Baldwin breaks down."
"Justin Bieber's engagement to 21-year-old Haley Baldwin officially ended his chance to reconcile with Selena Gomez."
"Although the 26 year old singer has her best single life out there, she still makes Bieber interested from time to time."
"Serena is happy and busy, but sometimes she still misses Justin."
"This is the person she has loved for so long. Of course, she has lingering feelings."
"But when he's still with Haley, she won't take the initiative to contact him or try to interfere in his relationship."
"But if things go wrong, she'll be the first to text him."
"She will always have a place in her heart for her first love," a source close to the "wolf" singer told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life



Number  68
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“But in reality, both of us were put against each other,” he said at the time.”
“They wanted angry black guy, they wanted this little white girl.”
““In the media — the media wanted black versus white.”
“Image zoom DeMario Jackson and Corinne Olympios in Octobe | Credit: Broadimage/REX/ShutterstockIn October, Jackson opened up about his friendship with Olympios.”
“The pair has been spotted out and about multiple times over the past few months, sharing a friendly embrace in late August, leaving TAO restaurant in Hollywood in late September, and most recently celebrating Halloween together in Los Angeles.”
“We have fun, and you know, that’s it.”Image zoom DeMario Jackson and Corinne Olympios | Credit: Photographer Group/Splash NewsDespite the BiP sex scandal that rocked season 4’s production last summer, Jackson and Olympios remain close.”
“Further clarifying, “We hang out.”
“We’re really good friends, and you know, we just enjoy each other’s company and we like to take things slow,” Jackson added.”
““Just for the fact that – you know, we’re homies.”
““I can’t wait for tonight,” he said.”


"But in fact, we are both antagonistic," he said at the time
"They want angry black people, they want this little white girl."
"In the media - the media wants black versus white."
"Group photo of demario Jackson and Corinne Olympus in October | photo source: broadimage / Rex / shutterstock in October, Jackson announced his friendship with Olympus."
"In the past few months, the couple have been found out and have been out several times. In late August, they hugged each other in a friendly way. In late September, they left the pottery restaurant in Hollywood and recently celebrated Halloween together in Los Angeles."
"We had a good time, you know, that's it." Zooming in and out of images: Mario Jackson and Corinne Olympus
"Further clarification," we said together
"We are really good friends, you know, we just like each other's company, we like to take our time," Jackson added
"Just because - you know, we're brothers."
"I can't wait for tonight," he said



Number  69
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Photo Credit: FameFlynet...”
“Tell us your thoughts in the comments below!”
“Do you think it’s true?”
“We have heard that Ellen is really difficult to deal with outside of work.”
“Do you think that things are as tense between Portia and Ellen as we have been hearing or is it just the press looking for drama?”
“After 5 years of marriage Portia is starting to reassess her life and she’s quickly realizing that this controlling relationship may have an expiration date on it.”
“After Ellen left for the studio Portia was photographed out walking her dogs, ringless.”
“On this occasion not only did Portia not back down, but she took off her wedding ring.”
“Reportedly Ellen freaked out and insisted that Portia was completely unsupportive.”
“There was no real reason other than the fact that Portia wanted to get some stuff done for the couple.”


"Image source: fameflynet..."
"Please let us know what you think in the comments below!"
"Do you think it's true?"
"We heard that Ellen is really hard to get along with outside of work."
"Do you think the relationship between Portia and Alan is as tense as we've heard? Or is the media just looking for drama
"After five years of marriage, Portia began to reassess her life, and soon realized that there might be an expiration date for this control relationship."
"After Alan went to the studio, Portia was photographed walking her dog outside without a ring."
"On this occasion, Portia not only didn't flinch, but also took off her wedding ring."
"According to reports, Allen was terrified and insisted that Portia didn't support it at all."
"There's no real reason other than Portia wants to do something for the couple."



**Something goes wrong**
“‘She barely recovered the first time and she fears it will destroy her for good if Brad leaves her for another woman.’For the full story see this weeks issue of New Idea - out now!”
“It was very calm and there was no big fight, but Jen was firm with Neri and told her to stay away from Brad and not come between them,’ the insider continued.”
“‘Jen is going to fight for Brad, plain and simple,’ says a friend close to the actress.”
“‘When Ange stole Brad from her, Jen feels she just sat back and did nothing, and pretty much gave in straight away.”
“She didn’t fight for her marriage last time – but that’s not going to happen this time around.’According to recent reports, after meeting one another at an event, Brad and Neri ‘got romantically involved almost straight away’ and were ‘very much a couple’.”
“Jen also very much ‘hates the fact that Neri reminds her so much of Angelina Jolie.'”
“Brad has denied the claims and told Jen that they’re just good friends, but Jen is less naive now and is determined not to let another woman come between them.”
“‘She’s older and stronger now, she’s not going to let Neri stop her from finally having her happily ever after with Brad.”
“She’s determined that nothing will get in the way of her happiness,’ the source added.”
“Before, sources told New Idea that Jen was ‘keeping her distance’ from Brad, but now the Friends star is making it clear to Neri she has to back off.”


"She hardly recovered for the first time. She worried that if Brad left her for another woman, she would destroy her forever."! "
"It was very calm and there was no big fight, but Jennifer was adamant about Nelly and told her to stay away from Brad and stay out of their business," the person familiar with the matter continued
"Jennifer will fight for Brad, plain and simple," said a close friend
"When Angie stole Brad from her, Jan felt that she just stood by and did nothing. She almost gave in."
"She didn't fight for her marriage last time, but not this time. According to a recent report, after Brad and Neri met at an event, they "fell in love almost immediately" and were "a perfect match."
"Jane is also very" disgusted with Neri and reminds her of Angelina Jolie. "
"Brad denied that and told Jane that they were just good friends, but Jane is not so naive now and is determined not to let another woman get involved in them."
"She's old and strong now, and she won't let Nelly stop her from finally living happily with Brad."
"She is determined that nothing will hinder her happiness," the source added
"In the past, it was said that Jennifer and Brad kept a distance, but now the friends star has made it clear that she has to step back."



**Something goes wrong**
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Do you have a story for RadarOnline.com?”
“We pay for juicy info!”
“Sound off in the comment section below.”
“”Do you think that Kim Kardashian is a traitor?”
““Kanye is in the driver seat now.”
““Kim is being obedient to Kanye now and the power shift has changed dramatically,” the source told Radar.”
“...a rift in their friendship with pals John Legend and Chrissy Teigen as well as death threats Kardashian has continued to stand by her man...”
“Kim s family were all invited and many of them were planning on going before Kim s meeting with Trump the insider said adding The worst part is that Kim has no idea her sisters and furious But even after West s pro Trump Twitter tirade last month having caused...”
“However, it seems that Kardashian’s meeting and subsequent open dialogue with Trump has caused a huge rift between her and her family, who did not attend West’s album listening party last night in Wyoming.”


"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Do you have a story to tell RadarOnline.com ？”
"We pay for interesting information!"
"Please make a sound in the comments section below."
"Do you think Kim Kardashian is a traitor?"
"Kanye is in the driver's seat now."
"Kim Jong Un is now obeying kenye, and the transfer of power has changed dramatically," the source told the radar
“…… The friendship between them and their good friends, John Legan and Chris tegan, is split, and there is a threat of death. Kardashian continues to support her man.... "
"Kim's family has been invited, and many of them plan to go before Kim meets trump. The worst thing is that Kim Jong Il doesn't know his sisters and is very angry, people familiar with the matter said. But even last month, Western Pro trump tweets caused.... "
"However, Kardashian's meeting and subsequent public dialogue with trump seem to have created a huge rift between her and her family, who did not attend West's album listening party in Wyoming last night."



Number  72
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Check out Romper's new video series, Romper's Doula Diaries:Watch full episodes of Romper's Doula Diaries on Facebook Watch.”
“Thankfully, Jay-Z has walked the red carpet yet either, so it's most likely that the duo are just planning some form of a grand entrance.”
“Now fans are excited to see how she'll wow the crowd this year.”
“Last year, Beyoncé stunned the crowd with her gorgeous red dress that beautifully showed off her pregnancy bump.”
“Beyoncé fans (or stans, really) are losing it wondering when she'll arrive and what she'll be wearing.”
“Still, all these facts hasn't made the Beyhive feel anymore assured.”
“Why wouldn't he wanted to come and celebrate such a big night?”
“Either way, it'd be shocking if Beyoncé and Jay-Z didn't show, especially because Jay-Z received the most Grammy nominations this year.”
“Or they're just running late.”
“Fans are desperate for answers.”


Take a look at Romper's new video series, Romper's doula diary: watch the full collection of Romper's doula diaries on Facebook watch. "
"Thankfully, Jay-Z is on the red carpet, too, so they're probably just planning some kind of grand entrance."
"Now fans are excited to see how she's going to amaze the audience this year."
"Last year, Beyonce dazzled the audience with her gorgeous red dress, showing her pregnancy bulge beautifully."
"Beyonce's fans (or Stan, really) don't know when she's coming or what she's wearing."
"Nevertheless, all these facts do not reassure besief."
"Why doesn't he come to celebrate such a big night?"
"In any case, it would be shocking if Beyonce and Jay-Z didn't show up, especially since Jay-Z won the most Grammy nominations this year."
"Or they're just late."
"Fans want answers."



Number  73
Source test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Brad Pitt, Margot Robbie NOT in "new scandal," despite reportAnna Faris "not over" Chris Pratt is false claim...”
“More on Gossip Cop:Ben Affleck, Lindsay Shookus getting marrie, starting a family?”
“Gossip Cop can exclusively debunk the story.”
“A rep for the singer tells us it's "ridiculous."”
“Gregory Pace/REX/ShutterstockAccording to RadarOnline, Simpson has become so lazy that she can't be bothered to leave her house to go grocery shopping, so she instead has every meal delivered.”
“An alleged insider tells the blog that the singer has decided to let herself go because she "feels like her acting career over, she's aged out of Hollywood, and too fat."”
“From there, the site drags in Simpson's husband Eric Johnson, saying he's equally slothful and sits around all day "eating and drinking" with his wife.”
“"Their Postmates bill has been $100,000 in one month," adds the supposed source.”
“"They rarely leave their huge mansion.”
“And have everything delivered, no matter what it is!"”


"Brad Pitt and Margot Robbie are not in the new scandal, although Anna Faris is wrong to say that" it's not over "Chris Platt
"More about gossip police: Ben Affleck Lindsay shookus getting married and married?"
"The gossip police can completely expose this story."
"A representative of the singer told us it was ridiculous."
"Gregory pace / Rex / shutterstock according to radaronline, Simpson has become so lazy that she doesn't have to leave home to go shopping at the grocery store, so she gives every meal."
One accused insider told the blog that the singer decided to let go because she "felt like her acting career was over, she was out of Hollywood, she was too fat."
Since then, Eric Johnson, Simpson's husband, has appeared on the website, saying that he is also lazy and sits there all day "eating and drinking" with his wife
"Their postage bill reached $100000 in a month," the source added
"They rarely leave their mansion."
"Send everything, whatever it is!"



Number  74
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The Shade Room reported they later returned together again early the next morning on Sunday and then the woman was seen leaving the hotel later that night with a large tote and without Thompson.”
“According to the outlet, they entered the hotel together and emerged together with Thompson in a different outfit.”
“Then, The Shade Room published photos and video of Tristan entering his hotel with a woman.”
“The person who filmed the video told The Daily Mail that "he was on the table right next to us with a group of friends and some girl who he was obviously making out with all night."”
“However, with his hood up in the pictures, it is difficult to confirm it is him or see what exactly happened between the two.”
“The events unfolded shockingly quickly: to start, The Daily Mail published photos and video that purported to show the NBA pro kissing a woman in a New York City rooftop bar, PH-D Lounge, on Saturday before a game in the Big Apple the following Monday.”
“Some of the the 27-year-old Cleveland Cavaliers player's alleged indiscretions surfaced in several videos purportedly of the basketballer and various women.”
“Tristan Thompson, Khloe Kardashian's boyfriend and baby daddy to be, is facing heavy scrutiny and backlash after emerging as the main subject of reports late Tuesday amid claims he has been kissing and otherwise intimately engaging with women who are not his reality star girlfriend.”


"The shade room reported that they came back together again early on Sunday morning, and then the woman was seen leaving the hotel later that day with a large handbag and no Thompson."
"According to the store, they went into the hotel together and showed up in different clothes with Thompson."
"Then, the sunshade released photos and videos of Tristan entering the hotel with a woman."
"The person who made the video told the Daily Mail:" he's on the table next to us, with a group of friends and a girl, and obviously he's been making out with them all night. "
"However, his turban is covered in the photo, so it's hard to identify him, and it's hard to see what happened between them."
"It's going surprisingly fast: first, the daily mail has published photos and videos that purportedly show the NBA professional kissing a woman at a rooftop bar called ph-d lounge in New York City on Saturday, followed by a game at the big apple Stadium on Monday."
"Some alleged misconduct by the 27 year old Cleveland Cavaliers player surfaced in several videos of alleged basketball players and various women."
"Tristan Thompson, Khloe Kardashian's boyfriend and father to be, became the main target of the report late on Tuesday. He is said to have been kissing and other ways of intimate contact with women who are not his real girl friends and is now facing severe censorship and strong opposition."



Number  75
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“"In summer, you can strip down only so much," she says.”
“Ingram liked being able to layer.”
“I was able to organize my home, get the baby's space ready, and sort through my other children's things to make more room.”
“"I got a lot of stuff done.”
“"The weather fit with my nesting instincts," says the mom to Joel, 8, Olivia, 6, and Lucy, 3.”
“The Cool News: Yes, the cold and snow may keep you indoors more often, but Jenny Ingram, of Poulsbo, Washington, considered that a plus in her third pregnancy.”
“Winter Worry: I'll go crazy from cabin fever!”
“Staying Indoors Will Drive Me Crazy!”
“I slept so well."”
“But when I was pregnant in the winter, I could bundle under the covers and just get comfy.”


"In the summer, you can only strip so much," she said
"Ingram likes layering."
"I can organize my home, get the children's space ready, organize other children's things, and make more space."
"I did a lot of things."
"The weather suits my nesting instinct," mom said to Joel, 8, Olivia, 6, and Lucy, 3
"Good news: Yes, the cold and snow may make you stay at home more often, but Jenny Ingram of Portsmouth, Washington, thinks it's good news for her third pregnancy."
"Winter's troubles: I'll go crazy because of the heat in the cabin!"
"Staying at home will drive me crazy!"
"I sleep well."
"But when I'm pregnant in winter, I can wrap myself in a quilt and feel comfortable."



Number  76
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She's so smart and such a great girl and she'll figure it out."”
“"I'm not in that relationship or in that situation, so I really trust Khloe.”
“"I think you just have to be there for your kid and follow their lead," she added, when asked again about the Tristan situation.”
“When asked if she is a fan of the NBA player, if they get along and if he blends in with the Kardashian-Jenner family, Kris said, "Tristan's, yeah, he's great."”
“News and other outlets at the Moschino Spring/Summer 19 Menswear and Women's Resort Collection fashion show, sponsored by Fiji Water, in Burbank, California on Friday.”
“Kris talked about Tristan while speaking to E!”
“Several weeks ago, another insider said Khloe's family members are very angry with Tristan, are "having a hard time coming to terms with Khloe trying to forgive him" and "don't trust him and feel he won't change."”
“News that Khloe "is still trying to regain trust with Tristan and figure out how to keep the family together."”
“A source recently told E!”
“Neither Khloe nor Tristan commented on the scandal.”


"She's smart. She's a great girl. She'll find out."
"I'm not that kind of relationship or that kind of situation, so I really trust Khloe."
"I think you just need to be there for your children and follow their leaders," she added, when asked again about Tristan
"Asked if she's a fan of the NBA player, if they get along well, and if he's integrated into Kardashian Jenner's family, Chris said," Tristan's, yes, he's great. “
News and other media at Friday's MOSCHINO spring summer 19 men's and women's resort fashion show sponsored by Fijian water in Burbank, California
"Chris talked about Tristan while talking to e!"
"A few weeks ago, another person familiar with the matter said that Khloe's family was very angry with Tristan. They" had a hard time accepting Khloe's attempt to forgive him "and" don't believe him, think he won't change. "
"It is said that Chloe is still trying to regain Tristan's trust and try to reunite his family."
"A source recently told e!"
"Neither Khloe nor Tristan commented on the scandal."



Number  77
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MGJR, STBRRelated: Miley Cyrus and Liam Hemsworth Wore Wedding Bands to Visit the Place Where They First MetCheck this out:”
“For such a photographed couple, however, we kind of love the prospect that they call each other husband and wife and the public is none the wiser.”
“Both the 24-year-old singer and her 27-year-old beau are still sporting rings on THAT finger, further leading to speculation that the pair have secretly said their vows.”
“She kicked her look up a notch with classic black Dr. Martens (which you can buy here).”
“Though it’s unclear whether she was sporting some shorts underneath, they would have to be pretty micro-mini, as there was no hint of anything peeking out of the bottom of her already short tunic top.”
“For the morning coffee date (where they were met by Miley’s mom, Trish), Miley chose an oversized pullover that made her look totally pants-less.”
“The rumor mill has recently been claiming that the pair secretly wed in a private ceremony nearly seven months ago and simply never made an announcement to the public.”
“Miley Cyrus was spotted—totally pants-less—in Savana, Georgia on a coffee run with fiancé (or husband, as many suspect), Liam Hemsworth.”


Millie Cyrus and Liam Hemsworth went to the place where they met for the first time with their wedding rings to see this:
"However, for such a couple who have been photographed, we kind of like the prospect that they call each other husband and wife, and the public is not wise about it."
"The 24-year-old singer and her 27 year old boyfriend are still wearing rings on their fingers, which further leads to speculation that they have secretly made their vows."
"She took her image to the next level with the classic black Dr. Martin (which you can buy here)
"It's not clear if she's wearing some shorts, but they have to be very mini, because there's no sign of anything at the bottom of her already short tunic."
"On the morning coffee date (where Tracy, Miley's mother, met them), Miley chose an oversized pullover to make her look like she had no pants at all."
"The rumor factory has been claiming recently that they had a secret wedding nearly seven months ago, but it was never announced to the public."
"When Millie Cyrus was drinking coffee with her fiance, Liam Hemsworth, in Savannah, Georgia, she was found to have no pants at all."



Number  78
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He has to pass the time somehow…HollywoodLifers, do you think Kylie would ever take Tyga back?”
“In fact, on the same day Kylie gave birth, Tyga was spotted leaving a nightclub with a brunette woman who definitely resembled his 20-year-old ex.”
“He’s just playing a waiting game for now.”That’s not to say that he’s sitting around by himself during this waiting period, though.”
““He has faith that there’s no way it will last with Travis and that one day Kylie will come running back to him again.”
““Tyga truly believes deep down in his heart that they’re not over,” our source adds.”
“However, Tyga is convinced that there’s still hope for a reconciliation between himself and Kylie.”
“Just one month later, Kylie started dating Travis Scott, and on Feb. 1, she gave birth to his child.”
“...relationship but he probably didn t realize that the 2017 split would mean it was really over for good...”
“Obviously she was sexy and all but Tyga had a really strong connection with her that went far deeper than the physical side of things Tyga and Kylie broke up and got back together several times throughout their three year...”
““The thing with Kylie, though, is that it was about so much more than just what she looked like.”


"He has to kill time in some way Hollywood stars, do you think Kelly will take TEGA back? "
"In fact, on the same day Kelly gave birth, it was found that TEGA had left a nightclub with a brunette who looked like his 20-year-old ex girlfriend."
"He's just playing a wait game right now." However, this is not to say that he is sitting alone in this waiting period. "
"He firmly believes that Travis's life will not last long and that one day Kelly will come back to him again."
Our source added: "TEGA firmly believes in his heart that they are not over yet."
"However, TEGA is convinced that there is still hope of reconciliation between him and Kelly."
"Just a month later, Kelly started dating Travis Scott, and on February 1, she gave birth to his baby."
“… But he may not realize that the breakup in 2017 means it's really over forever... "
"It's obvious that she's sexy, and everyone else has a strong connection with her except TEGA, which is much deeper than the physical aspect of TEGA and Kelly breaking up and reuniting several times in their three years..."
"But the problem with Kelly is that it's not just her looks."



Number  79
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Drake has yet comment on the speculation.”
“Nicki s not judging though it s his business but she s damn sure relieved she s moved on and isn t still in the mix with him Nicki was in that mix with Drake for a while as the...”
“...trying to get some money...”
“Nicki Minaj, 35, is not entirely shocked to hear about the rumors that Drake, 31, may have a secret son with porn star Sophie Brussaux and even thinks it’s possible he could have other children out there.”
““Nicki’s not surprised by these rumors,” a source close to Nicki EXCLUSIVELY told HollywoodLife.”
““Not at all.”
“She actually wouldn’t be surprised if Drake’s got more than once secret love child out there.”
“He’s such a huge player and she knows he’s a target for these girls trying to get that baby mama money.”
“...two seemed to have an up and down relationship for many years...”
“...she s a pornstar let her be your world some of the lyrics to the track read...”


"Drake has not commented on this speculation."
"Nicky is not judging. Although it's his business, she's damned sure that she's gone. She's not still mixing with him. Nicky is mixing with Drake for a while as..."
“… I want to get some money... "
"Nicki Minaj, 35, was not completely shocked to hear that Drake, 31, might have a secret son with the porn star Sophie brussaux. He even thought he might have other children there."
"Nicky is not surprised by these rumors," a source close to Nicky told Hollywood life exclusively
"Not at all."
"Drake wouldn't be surprised if she had more than one crush on a child."
"He's a huge player and she knows that he's the target for these girls to get money from their baby mom."
“…… It seems that they have a relationship for many years... "
“… She's a porn star. Let her become a track reader of some lyrics in your world... "



Number  80
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That’s why his social media is littered withsillinessthat manages to make us all chuckle every now and again.”
“He’s a genuine goofballDearol’ Armie is never one to shy away from making a joke or letting his inner goofball run free.”
“Just look at the Hammer family’s 2017 Christmas card and tell me that’s not the cutest thing ever.”
“Hammer is constantly posting photos of Harper and Ford on his Instagram and honey, it will surely melt your heart.”
“Not only is he a dad, but he’s a very vocal and proud dad who clearly devotes lots of time to his children and makes them a priority in his life.”
“He might be the cutest dad in HollywoodAt 31 years old, Hammer is already the father of two very adorable youngsters: Harper and Ford.”
“2.”
“Because of Armand Hammer’s success, his future generations were able to live comfortably and continue the family business, which Armie went on to benefit from as well before pursuing acting.”
“But Hammer’s life was a rich tapestry filled with political intrigue, a profitable oil business, and the rubbing of shoulders with various elites, including Leonid Brezhnev (whom Hammer eulogized in People magazine in 1982).”
“The more senior Hammer was a bit of a jokester and reportedly sat on the board of the company Arm & Hammer despite having nothing to do with the company; he thought it was just a bit of a hoot.”


"That's why his social media is full of weird things that make us giggle from time to time."
"He's a real fool, and Dior Amie never avoids making jokes or letting his inner fool get away with it."
"Just look at the hammer's 2017 Christmas card and tell me it's not the cutest thing ever."
"Hammer keeps posting photos of Harper and Ford on his instagram and honey, which is sure to melt your heart."
"He is not only a father, but also a very vocal and proud father, who obviously spends a lot of time on his children and makes them a priority in his life."
"He's probably the cutest dad in Hollywood. At 31, he's the father of Harper and Ford."
“2.”
"Because of Armand hammer's success, his descendants were able to live a comfortable life and continue to engage in the family business, and Armand hammer also benefited from it before pursuing acting."
"But hammer's life is a colorful tapestry of political intrigue, a lucrative oil business, and confrontation with various elites, including Leonid Brezhnev (whom hammer praised in people magazine in 1982)
"The more senior Mr. hammer is a bit of a joke and is reported to be sitting on the board of arm & Hammer even though it has nothing to do with the company; he thinks it's just a joke."



Number  81
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Or do you think Travis will come through as a decent parent?”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Tyga would have made a better baby daddy for Kylie?”
“We’ve got EXCLUSIVE details on how she’s wishing she was having ex Tyga’s child instead of Travis Scott’s.”
“Uh oh!”
“As Kylie Jenner‘s due date approaches, her baby daddy Travis Scott, 25, is still pretty much absent from her life.”
“Unlike her ex Tyga, 28, who was always there catering to the reality star’s every whim.”
“Now she wondering if she picked the wrong guy to have a baby with.”
““Kylie is dealing with major regrets over her pregnancy as her due date quickly approaches.”
“She is second guessing the biggest decision in her life, having a baby with Travis.”
“As her relationship with her baby daddy is so rocky and uncertain Kylie is starting to think he she made the wrong decision by deciding to have a baby with someone who is no longer present much in her life a source close to the cosmetics queen tells HollywoodLife com...”


"Or do you think Travis will be a decent parent?"
"Hollywood stars, do you think TEGA will be a better father for Kelly?"
"We had an exclusive report on how she wanted to have a child from former TEGA instead of Travis Scott."
"Oh
"As Kelly Jenner's due date approaches, her 25-year-old father, Travis Scott, is still barely in her life."
"Unlike her 28 year old ex tiga, she's always there to cater to every whim of reality TV stars."
"Now she's wondering if she picked the wrong person."
"With the due date approaching, Kelly is dealing with the major regret of pregnancy."
"She's guessing about the biggest decision of her life, having a baby with Travis."
"Because the relationship between Kelly and her baby father is so unstable and uncertain, Kelly began to think that he was her wrong decision. She decided to have a child with a person who is not much in her life. A source close to the cosmetics queen told Hollywood Life..."



Number  82
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Jelena will last this time around?”
“However, Christmas may be a different story!”
“— Jelena are reportedly nesting together, while they search for their fairytale home!”
“And, they may soon be neighbors with a very famous family, according to a new report!”
“Justin Bieber, 23, and Selena Gomez, 25, aren’t wasting any time rekindling their longtime romance.”
“The newly reconciled pair are in search of their dream home together, according to In Touch Weekly.”
“Justin and Selena “want a fresh start together on neutral ground.”
“The only way they can do that is by buying a place that neither of them has lived in before,” the source admits.”
“Now, the pair are reportedly looking to purchase a home together in either Calabasas [aka Kardashian territory] or Hidden Hills, near LA.”
“Finding the perfect place takes a while the insider says adding So the plan is to live at Selena s until they find their dream home And it appears as though the couple couldn t wait to shack up together as the source says Justin s already living in Selena...”


"Holly bugs, do you think jellyna can hold on this time?"
"Christmas, however, could be a different story!"
"It's reported that Jenna is building a nest together and they're looking for a fairy tale home!"
"And, according to the latest report, they may soon become neighbors of a very famous family!"
"Justin Bieber, 23, and Serena Gomez, 25, didn't waste any time rekindling their long-term relationship."
According to in touch weekly, the couple are looking for their dream home together
"Justin and Selena" hope to have a new start in the neutral position
"The only way they can do that is to buy a place they haven't lived in," the source admitted
"Now, it's reported that the two are going to buy a house together in Calabasas or hidden hills near Los Angeles."
"It's going to take a while to find a perfect place," people familiar with the matter said, adding that so the plan is to live in Serena s until they find their dream home. It seems that the couple can't wait to live together because the source said Justin s already lives in Serena... "



Number  83
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Write to Cady Lang at cady.lang@timemagazine.com.”
“If you don't get the confirmation within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder.”
“Now, Will and Kate Middleton have announced what the baby boy’s name is.”
“The royal baby name is Louis Arthur Charles, Kensington Palace announced on Twitter Friday.”
“His royal title will be His Royal Highness Prince Louis of Cambridge.”
“While the royal baby name odds on Louis were 33/1 could make it appear to be a surprising choice, the names Louis, Arthur and Charles have significance within the royal family.”
“Louis was the name of Prince Phillip’s grandfather, Prince Louis Alexander of Battenberg, as well as Prince Charles’ great-uncle Earl Louis Mountbatten, who was assassinated by the IRA in 1979.”
“Louis is also a middle name for both Prince William and Prince George.”
“The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge and their newborn son.”
“Kirsty O'Connor - PA Images—PA Images via Getty ImagesAs for Prince Louis’ middle names, Arthur was a middle name of Queen Elizabeth’s late father King George VI and is a middle name to both William and Prince Charles.”


"To caddy langkady Lang @ time."
"If you are not confirmed within 10 minutes, please check your spam folder."
"Now, will and Kate Middleton have announced the baby boy's name."
Kensington Palace announced on twitter on Friday that the Royal baby's name is Louis Arthur Charles
"His royal title will be his Royal Highness Prince Louis of Cambridge."
"Although the chance of Louis' Royal baby name is 33 / 1, it seems to be a surprising choice. The names of Louis, Arthur and Charles are of great significance in the royal family."
"Louis is the name of Prince Philip's grandfather, Prince Louis Alexander of Battenberg, and Prince Charles's uncle count Louis montbarton, who was assassinated by the IRA in 1979."
"Louis is also the middle name between Prince William and Prince George."
"The Duchess of Cambridge and their new born son."
"Costy O'Connor PA images PA images" is the middle name of Prince Louis. Arthur is the middle name of Queen Elizabeth's late father King George VI, and is also the middle name of Prince William and Prince Charles



Number  84
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“This story has been updated.”
“Still, Affleck and Garner have continued to be seen in public together, attending church or taking the kids to school — though these joint appearances could simply be part of their vow to be hands-on co-parents.”
“But soon after, Affleck more or less went public with his romance with Lindsay Shookus, a “Saturday Night Live” producer whom he may have started seeing when he was still married to Garner.”
“But three years after that initial 2015 announcement, Affleck and Garner, both 45, have yet to finalize their divorce, raising the question: What’s taking so long?”
“A new report by Us Weekly cites sources who say that the “Batman v. Superman” actor is dragging his feet because he would like to get back together with Garner, with whom he has three children.”
“If this description of Affleck is close to accurate, he could be the Oscar-winning, movie star version of “Bachelor” star Arie Luyendyk Jr., who angered Bachelor Nation and the rest of America by vacillating between two women in the show’s final episodes.”
“For her part, Garner really tried to make things work with Affleck — despite his reported struggles with alcohol addiction, gambling and monogamy, according to Us Weekly.”
“This fall, Affleck also had a dark cloud hanging over him following news about multiple sexual misconduct allegations against his regular producing collaborator Harvey Weinstein.”
“In the wake of the Weinstein allegations and the launch of the #MeToo movement, Affleck was accused of groping two women and of being complicit in a Hollywood culture that allows sexually predatory men to stay in power.”
“After Garner and Affleck first announced their split in 2015, the “Alias” actress “put her heart and soul into fixing the relationship and wanted so desperately to turn things around for the children’s sake as well as theirs,” a source told Us Weekly.”


"The story has been updated."
"Despite this, Affleck and Ghana continue to appear in public, go to church together or take their children to school together - although these co-occurrence may be just part of their vows to be co parents who do it themselves."
But before long, Affleck more or less made public his love affair with Lindsay shokus, a "Saturday night live" producer who may have started dating Ghana when he married her
"But three years after the first divorce was announced in 2015, the 45 year old Affleck and Ghana have yet to finalize a divorce agreement, which raises the question: Why did it take so long?"
A new US weekly report quoted sources as saying that the reason why the leading actor of Batman and Superman procrastinates is that he wants to make up with Ghana, who has three children with him
"If the description of Affleck is close to accurate, he may be the Oscar winner and star of the movie star version of the bachelor, Arie luyendyk Jr., who swings between two women in the last few episodes of the play, angering the bachelor country and the rest of the United States."
For Ghana, she really tried to make things go smoothly for Affleck, despite reported difficulties with alcohol addiction, gambling and monogamy, US Weekly reported
In the fall, a dark cloud hung over him, too, after news that Harvey Weinstein, his regular production partner, had been accused of multiple sexual misconduct
"After Weinstein's accusation and the launch of the Mayo movement, Affleck was accused of touching two women and participating in Hollywood culture, which allows sexually abusive men to stay in power."
A source told us weekly: "after Ghana and Affleck first announced their separation in 2015, the" pseudonym "actress" devoted herself to repairing the relationship. For the sake of the children and their children, she really wanted to turn the situation around. "



Number  85
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““She doesn’t want to wait because she knows he’s her soul mate.”For more on this, pick up the latest issue of In Touch — and for more exclusive content sign up for our newsletter!”
““Alex is always on top of his finances, so a prenup is very important to him, too.”“She really wants to marry Alex by the end of the year,” the insider continued.”
““Jennifer not only wants to protect her money, she wants to make sure her kids [twins Max and Emme] are taken care of,” a source previously told In Touch.”
“We already know that Jen’s whirlwind romance with the MLB star is reaching new heights, and they have even spoken about a prenuptial agreement for when they get married.”
“...with his former flame...”
“She loves him and thinks she might be ready to go down that path EXCLUSIVE Find out Who Jesse Williams Is Dating After Splitting From Aryn Drake Lee It sounds like Ben who split from his wife Jennifer Garner back in 2015 will need to try much harder to reunite...”
““Alex has told Jennifer that he sees a future with her.”
“He always wants what hecan’t have.”“She genuinely cares for Alex and she’s happy,” the source continues.”
“...help but be wary of his intentions...”
“Ben s been reaching out to her in hopes that they can reconnect says an insider adding he s been trying to convince Jennifer that Alex is trouble While our source explains that this may have been something the Shades of Blue star wanted at one point she can t...”


"She didn't want to wait because she knew he was her soul mate." For more information, please click on the latest issue of in touch - for more exclusive content, please visit our newsletters! "
"Alex is always in control of his financial situation, so the prenuptial agreement is also very important to him." "She really wants to marry Alex by the end of the year," the person familiar with the matter continued
"Not only does Jennifer want to protect her money, she also wants to make sure her children (twins Max and Amy) are taken care of," a source said earlier in contact magazine
"We already know that Jennifer's affair with the Major League stars has reached a new level, and they even talked about a prenuptial agreement."
“… And his ex lover... "
"She loves him and thinks she may be ready to go this way and find out who Jesse Williams is after a date split from Arlene Drake Lee sounds like Ben, who split back from his wife Jennifer Garner in 2015, will need to work harder to reunite..."
"Alex told Jennifer that he saw and her future."
"He always wanted what he couldn't have." "She really cares about Alex and she's happy," the source continued
“…… But beware of his intentions... "
"Burns has been contacting her, hoping they can get back in touch," said an insider, who has been trying to convince Jennifer that Alex is a problem, and our source explained that it could be the shadow of the blue star, hoping that at some point, she can't... "



Number  86
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Singles “Barbie Tingz” and “Chun-Li” are already out, the latter of which she already performed last week on the season finale of Saturday Night Live.”
“Meanwhile, Minaj — who was last linked to Nas — has been busy, gearing up to release her fourth studio LP, Queen.”
“...a fan on Instagram that she and Eminem were dating but the whole thing was just a joke according to a new report...”
“Minaj, 35, rapped about Eminem on YG’s new single “Big Bank” (which also features Big Sean and 2 Chainz), saying that she had “met Slim Shady” and that “once he go black, he’ll be back again.”Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““I met Slim Shady.”
“Bagged a EM!!”
“!” she wrote on Instagram, captioning her video post.”
“It didn’t take long for a follower to ask Minaj, “You dating Eminem??”
“?” Minaj simply replied, “Yes.”Neither Minaj nor Eminem’s reps replied to PEOPLE’s request for comment.”
“But while fans wondered if she was serious sources close to Minaj told TMZ the rapper was only joking and that there s nothing romantic between the two Image zoom Nicky Minaj and Eminem Credit Kevin Mazur WireImage Gregory Pace BEI REX Shutterstock Want to keep up on the latest...”


"The singles Barbie dingee and Chunli have been released, the latter performed at the end of the season of Saturday night live last week."
"Meanwhile, Minagi - who was the last to link to North America - has been busy preparing to release her fourth studio album, Queen."
“… A fan on instagram said she was dating Eminem, but according to a new report, the whole thing was just a joke... "
Minaji, 35, talks about Eminem in YG's new single big bank, saying she "met slim shady" and "will come back once he gets dark." Get news, feature, etc
"I met slim shady."
"Packed an em!"
"!" she wrote her own video post on instagram. "
Before long, a follower asked Minagi, "are you dating Eminem?"
"Minaj just replied," yes. " Representatives of Minaj and Eminem did not respond to requests for comment
"But when fans doubt whether she's serious, a source close to minaji tells TMZ that the rapper is just joking. There's nothing wrong between the zoom of the two photos Nicky Minaj and Eminem credit Kevin Mazur WireImage grey pace Bei Rex shutterstock. They want to keep up with the latest..."



Number  87
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“You go, girl!”
“With the criticism she’s received about having too many boyfriends in the past, it’s great to see her embracing her independence while being in love at the same time.”
“We’re so happy to hear that things are going well for these two and it’s good to know Taylor can stand on her own and be confident with or without her boyfriend by her side!”
“...him and why their relationship is one of the healthiest she has ever had the source continued...”
“It can be really challenging to date Taylor as she s such a huge star but Joe isn t phased by it in the slightest he is very secure in himself and determined to succeed on his own terms it s one of the things Taylor loves the most about...”
“...too...”
“Taylor loves that Joe is so dedicated to his career and to making it big in his own name and their relationship is all the happier for it Despite the constant spotlight on Taylor Joe isn t letting it bother him and in fact he s giving her equal support...”
“Joe has been in Cannes where he was awarded the Chopard Trophy, which is a huge honor and recognizes Joe as one of the hottest up and coming actors of his generation.”
““Taylor is really supportive of Joe’s career, and totally understands why he doesn’t want to be a red carpet fixture with her.”
““Joe is determined to make it as an actor in his own right, and not to be known just as Taylor Swift’s boyfriend,” a source close to Joe EXCLUSIVELY told HollywoodLife.”


"Come on, girl!"
"In the past, many people criticized her for having too many boyfriends. It's great to see her embrace her independence while she's in love."
"We're glad to hear that both of them are in good condition. We're glad to know that Taylor can be independent and confident no matter whether she has a boyfriend or not."
“… Why is his relationship with them one of the healthiest sources she's ever had
"Dating Taylor is really challenging because she's a big star, but Joe doesn't like it at all. He has confidence in himself and is determined to succeed in his own way. This is one of Taylor's favorite things..."
“… Also... "
"Tyler likes Joe to be so focused on his career and make it bigger in his own name, which makes their relationship happier. Although people have been paying close attention to Tyler Joe, he didn't let it bother him. In fact, he gave her the same support..."
"It's a great honor for Joe to win the joppard trophy at Cannes and admit that Joe is one of the hottest future actors of his generation."
"Tyler really supports Joe's career and fully understands why he doesn't want to go down the red carpet with her."
"Joe is determined to be an actor in his own capacity, not as famous as Taylor Swift's boyfriend," a source close to Joe told Hollywood Life in an exclusive interview



Number  88
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“RELATED: Taylor Swift Made a Super-Brief Cameo in an Episode of 13 Reasons Why...”
““How could we?” Womp.”
“This is a photo of an oversize suitcase, and people think glossy pop icon goddess Taylor Swift could be inside.”
“That is, if you believe the caption that was posted to a paparazzi photo database (which was first spotted by radio station Spin1038).”
“"Taylor Swift being transported in a huge suitcase from her Tribeca apartment...almost a dozen of Taylor Swift['s] security guards were present to move this package carefully as Taylor Swift remains to be unseen for a long time," it reads.”
“Check it out for yourself, below:As you'd expect, people on Twitter have been rejoicing over this news.”
“But whether or not this story is true, it does hilariously highlight how weird it is to be a celebrity.”
“I mean, we live in a world where they sell their used tissues on eBay for $5,000.”
“And straight-up stop government elections because of their concerts.”
“Hell, they put leeches on their bodies — for health reasons!”


"Related reports: Taylor Swift guest starred in a super short scene in an episode of 13 reasons. Why..."
"How can we? "Woo woo."
"This is a picture of an oversized suitcase that people think might be the glamorous pop idol Taylor Swift inside."
"That's to say, if you believe the headlines in the paparazzi photo database (first discovered by radio spin1038),"
"Taylor Swift was transported from her Tribeca apartment in a huge suitcase Almost a dozen Taylor Swift security guards were present, carrying the package carefully, because Taylor Swift had not been seen for a long time, "it read
"Look at it for yourself. Here's what you want. People on twitter are happy with the news
"But whether the story is true or not, it does comically highlight how strange it is to be famous."
"I mean, we live in a world where they sell used tissue paper for $5000 on eBay."
"Stop the government elections directly because of their concerts."
"Hell, they put leeches on them - for health!"



Number  89
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I think she’ll fight for it.””
“Jennifer, who’s endured three failed marriages, “was heartbroken to hear that Alex was talking to Lauren,” says the insider.”
“Within hours of each other on Jan 24 the former Yankee slugger posted a photo of a cryptic quote There s nothing wrong with making a mistake what s wrong is not making the effort to make it right and the Shades of Blue star shared a photo of a...”
“...gigantic bouquet of flowers Alex had sent her...”
“The next day, she uploaded a selfie and captioned the photo, “It’s all in God’s hands always,” along with the hashtag #letgoandletgod.”
“According to an insider, “That was aimed directly at Alex.”Hollywood’s hottest duo is on the verge of flaming out.”
“Jennifer 48 is privately questioning her relationship with her boyfriend of nearly a year after learning he s still in touch with former fling Lauren Hunter a fitness model who last year claimed in an interview that Alex 42 had been sexting her for months including while he was dating...”
“J Lo...”
“Recently, “someone went to Jennifer with new details that Alex was still texting with Lauren, and that’s what made Jennifer lose it,” the insider tells In Touch.”
““Of course, he said it wasn’t physical, and maybe it wasn’t, but in Jennifer’s book, that’s still cheating.”


"I think she will fight for it."
"Jennifer has been through three failed marriages and is sad to hear Alex talking to Lauren," the person said
"On January 24, the former Yankees batter posted a picture in a few hours with a mysterious quote on it. There is nothing wrong with making a mistake. The mistake is not to try to correct it. The shadow of blue star shared a picture with a
“…… Alex gave her a big bunch of flowers... "
The next day, she uploaded a self portrait with the title "everything is in God's hands" and the label "let go and let God"
"It's directed at Alex," according to one person familiar with the matter Hollywood's hottest duet is on the verge of a hit
"On the 48th, Jennifer privately questioned her relationship with her boyfriend who has been dating for nearly a year. She learned that her boyfriend is still in contact with former flying Lauren hunter, a fitness model. In an interview last year, she said that Alex 42 had sent her sex messages for several months, including during dating..."
"Jerome..."
"Recently," someone revealed some new details to Jennifer, saying that Alex is still texting Lauren, and that's why she lost contact, "a person familiar with the matter told contact
"Of course, he says it's not physical, maybe not, but in Jennifer's book, it's still cheating."



Number  90
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“9 15 October 15 2020 February 18 2021 2021 02 18 10 15 2021 TBA References edit...”
“March 24 2016 2016 03 24 5 15 June 9 2016 September 22 2016 2016 09 22 6 15 December 1 2016 March 30 2017 2017 03 30 7 20 June 15 2017 September 6 2018 2018 09 06 8 18 August 1 2019 December 12 2019 2019 12 12”
“...of seasons 9 No.”
“...of episodes 135 as of January 14 2021 Production Running time 30 minutes Production company Pie Town Productions Release Original network HGTV Original release April 16 2013 present Chronology Related shows Flip or Flop franchise External links Website Flip or Flop is a television series airing on HGTV hosted by...”
“...the formerly married couple Tarek El Moussa and Christina Haack...”
“[1] The program is the original show in the Flip or Flop franchise, debuting in 2013.”
“[2]The ninth season premiered on October 15, 2020[3]and on November 5, 2020, the series was renewed for 15 episodes of a tenth season which will premiere in 2021.”
“[4]Premise [ edit ]Christina Anstead and Tarek El Moussa were married real estate agents in Orange County, California.”
“After the real estate crash in 2008, they began flipping homes in the Orange County area.”
“In 2011, Tarek asked a friend to help him make an audition tape for HGTV, filming an entire episode of the process of house flipping from start to finish.”
“June 15 2017 September 6 2018 2018 09 06 8 18 August 1 2019 December 12 2019 2019 12 12 9 15 October 15 2020 February 18 2021 2021 02 18 10 15 2021 TBA References edit...”
“[7] The couple married in 2009, and their daughter Taylor Reese was born in 2010.”
“...of episodes 135 as of January 14 2021 Production Running time 30 minutes Production company Pie Town Productions Release Original network HGTV Original release April 16 2013 present Chronology Related shows Flip or Flop franchise External links Website Flip or...”
“Flop is a television series airing on HGTV hosted by the formerly married couple Tarek El Moussa and Christina Haack...”


"September 15 October 15 February 18, 2020 2021 2021 02 18 10 15 2021 TBA reference editor..."
"March 24, 2016 03 24 5 15 June 9, 2016 September 22, 2016 09 22 6 15 December 1, 2016 March 30, 2017 03 30 7 20 June 15, 2017 September 6, 2018 09 06 8 18 8 August 1, 2019 12 12"
“… Season 9
“… Episode 135 as of January 14, 2021, production time is 30 minutes, production company pie town productions released original network HGTV original release April 16, 2013 current chronology related programs flip or floor franchise external link website flip or floor is a TV series broadcast on HGTV, by... "
“… Former married couple Tariq Moussa and Christina Huck... "
"[1] this program is the original program of flip or floor series, which was premiered in 2013."
"[2] season 9 premieres on October 15, 2020 [3], and on November 5, 2020, 15 episodes of season 10 of the series sequel will premiere in 2021."
"[4] premise [editor] Christina ansteder and Tariq El Musa are married real estate agents in Orange County, California."
"After the real estate crash in 2008, they started speculating in Orange County."
"In 2011, Tariq asked a friend to help him make an audition video for HGTV, shooting a whole episode of flipping the house from the beginning to the end."
"June 15, 2017 September 6, 2018 September 06 8 18 August 1 December 12, 2019 December 12 9 15 October 15, 2020 February 18 2021 2021 02 18 10 15 2021 TBA reference editor..."
"The couple married in 2009 and their daughter, Tyler Reese, was born in 2010."
“… Episode 135 as of January 14, 2021 production time 30 minutes production company pie town productions released original network HGTV original release April 16, 2013 current chronology related programs flip or floor franchise external link website flip or... "
"Flop is a TV series on HGTV, hosted by former married couples Tarek El Moussa and Christina Haack..."



Number  91
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And the conservator must only take actions that are in the best interest of the conservatee.”
“An LPS conservator must have enough medical and social information before making decisions for the conservatee.”
“LPS conservatorships MUST be started by a local government agency, usually a county’s Public Guardian or Public Conservator.”
“LPS conservatorships last for only 1 year.”
“If they are needed longer than that, they must be restarted and the conservator must be reappointed by the court.”
“The government agency may recommend that a family member of the conservatee be appointed as LPS conservator, but this happens usually only after the first year.”
“These conservatorships are only for adults who are gravely disabled as a result of a mental illness listed in the Diagnostic and Statistical Manual of Mental Disorders (DSM).”
“The most common mental illnesses are serious, biological brain disorders, like:Schizophrenia,Bipolar disorder (manic depression),Schizo-affective disorder,Clinical depression, andObsessive-compulsive disorder.”
“LPS conservatorships are not for people with organic brain disorders, brain trauma, developmental disability, alcohol or drug addiction, or dementia, unless they also have one of the serious mental illnesses listed in the DSM.”
“Duties and Responsibilities of an LPS ConservatorAn LPS conservatorship gives legal authority to the conservator to make certain decisions for a conservatee who is unable to take care of himself or herself.”


"And the guardian must only act in the best interests of the ward."
"LPS protectors must have sufficient medical and social information before making decisions for them."
The LPS administrator position must start with the local government agency, usually the Public Guardian or public administrator of a county
"The protection period of LPS is only one year."
If it takes longer, it will have to start over and the court will have to reappoint the custodian
Government agencies can recommend that the family members of the ward be appointed as LPS guardians, but this usually happens only after the first year
"These guardianship rights only apply to adults who are severely disabled by mental illness listed in the diagnostic and Statistical Manual of mental illness (DSM)"
"The most common mental disorders are severe biological brain diseases, such as schizophrenia, bipolar disorder, schizophrenic affective disorder, clinical depression and obsessive-compulsive disorder
LPS guardianship does not apply to people with organic brain dysfunction, brain trauma, developmental disorders, alcohol or drug addiction or dementia, unless they also have one of the serious mental disorders listed in the DSM
"Duties and responsibilities of the LPS guardian. The identity of the LPS Guardian gives the guardian the legal power to make certain decisions for the guardian who is unable to take care of himself."



Number  92
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“However, Rihanna is still focused on her career at this time and has not even met the Toyota heir’s family just yet.”
“However, a separate source previously told the same news outlet that Rihanna hopes that the well-heeled Saudi Arabian can help her forget her dark past with Chris Brown.”
“Rihanna and Hassan Jameel made headlines in June 2017 when they were photographed making out in a pool at a private villa in Spain.”
“Fans believed at first that the guy was a Spanish footballer, but he turned out to be a Saudi billionaire.”
“He is the deputy president and vice chairman of Abdul Latif Jameel, one of the largest companies in the world.”
“The Barbadian singer was in an on-and-off relationship with Chris Brown, 28, and it looks like her new beau fears that the “With You” singer might win her back.”
“A source close to Rihanna, 29, recently told Hollywood Life that Jameel is worried that Brown keeps “lurking in her past” and is being unpredictable.”
“Although RiRi has opened up to her new beau about her past, the Toyota heir is still concerned that Breezy can still win her back.”
“He feels uncomfortable with the idea that the “Kiss Kiss” singer still loves her and might be able to take her back from him anytime.”
“Now, fans are convinced that she has moved on gracefully from Breezy.”


"However, Rihanna is still focused on her career at this time and has not even met the family of the successor to Toyota."
"However, another source told the same news agency earlier that Rihanna hoped that the rich Saudi Arabian would help her forget her dark past with Chris Brown."
"In June 2017, Rihanna and Hassan Jamil were photographed making out in the pool of a private villa in Spain, making headlines."
"The fans initially believed that this guy was a Spanish football player, but later it turned out that he was a Saudi billionaire."
He is the vice president and vice chairman of Abdel Latif Jamil, one of the largest companies in the world
The Barbados singer and 28 year old Chris Brown have been dating intermittently, and it seems her new boyfriend is worried that the "with you" singer may win her back
A source close to 29 years old Rihanna recently told Hollywood Life magazine that Jamie worried that Brown would continue to "lurk in her past" and become unpredictable
"Although Reilly has confessed her past to her new boyfriend, the successor to Toyota is still worried that britz will still win her back."
"He felt uncomfortable with the idea that the" kiss kiss "singer still loved her and might be able to bring her back from him at any time."
"Now, fans believe that she has moved gracefully out of the breeze."



Number  93
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us know your thoughts in the comment section below.”
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Kanye got through to Travis?”
“Click here to see pics of celebs, including Kylie, who had the sexiest selfies of 2017.”
“Time will tell whether or not Kanye’s words had an effect on Travis and if the 25-year-old rapper quits hitting up the strip club for good.”
“We reported earlier how Kim Kardashian, 37, had asked Kanye to talk some sense into Travis, and while he was apparently reluctant to do so, it seems that Yeezy pulled through in a big way.”
““Kanye is protective of all of his family and wanted Travis to know that he better not let Kylie down in anyway once the baby arrives, ’cause Kanye will be watching.” And Travis certainly does not want to let Kanye down — especially considering the fact Kanye is his idol.”
““Kanye made it clear to Travis that he needs to step it up big time,” our source added.”
“Man up.”
“It was a beautiful, sweet moment between the two guys, but there was also an important point Kanye wanted to make to the younger rapper.”So, what were the wise words of advice and warning Kanye imparted to his younger protege?”
““It was an emotional conversation as Kanye explained to Travis how wonderful it is becoming a father for the first time, how his whole life is about to change for the better.”


"Please let us know what you think in the comments section below."
"Hollywood stars, do you think Kanye can get in touch with Travis?"
"Click here to see photos of celebrities, including Kelly, who has the sexiest self portrait of 2017."
"Time will tell us whether Kanye's words have an impact on Travis and whether the 25-year-old rapper will quit the strip club forever."
"We reported earlier on how Kim Kardashian, 37, got Kanye to reason with Travis. Although he obviously didn't want to, it seems that yezzi was successful."
"Kanye is protecting his family, hoping Travis knows that once the baby is born, he'd better not let Kelly lie in bed, because Kanye will watch." Travis certainly doesn't want to disappoint Kanye - especially given the fact that Kanye is his idol
"Kanye made it clear to Travis that he needs to do more," our source added
"Cheer up."
"It's a wonderful and sweet moment between the two, but Kanye also wants to say something important to the young rapper." So what wise advice and warning does Kanye have for his young students? "
"It was an emotional conversation, and Kanye explained to Travis how wonderful it was to be a father for the first time, that his whole life was about to get better."



Number  94
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“That’s something that is really annoying to them.’”
“‘While [the operation] was inevitable, they think her plan to do the nude spread is over the top.”
“Nevertheless, the family have been publicly supportive of her decision to transition, which was completed in January according leaked extracts from her memoir.”
“The headline-making ‘I am Cait’ shoot was said to have taken the Kardashian clan by surprise at the time and led to tension between Jenner and Kim, 36, as a result.”
“Jenner first announced her transition in an interview with Sawyer in April 2015 and revealed her new look in a Vanity Fair spread the following July.”
“Jenner's rep knew nothing about it.”
“DailyMail.com has approached representatives for Jenner and the Kardashians for comment.”
“‘But she says she will do everything in her power to stop the shoot if she can.'”
“‘She knew the surgery was inevitable and it was bound to happen,’ said the source.”
“Kardashian momager Kris, who is said to have known about Jenner’s surgery in advance, has vowed to stop the shoot from going ahead, according to the insider.”


"It's really annoying to them."
"Although (surgery) is inevitable, they think her plans to spread nude are excessive."
"Nevertheless, her family publicly supported her decision, which was completed in January, according to leaked extracts from her memoirs."
"It's said that the headlines of" I'm Cain "surprised the Kardashian family at that time, resulting in tension between Jenner and Kim, 36."
"Jenna first announced her transformation in an interview with Sawyer in April 2015, and exposed her new look in Vanity Fair magazine in July the following year."
"Jenner's representative knew nothing about it."
"The daily mail has contacted representatives of Jenna and Kardashian for advice."
"But she said she would do her best to stop the shooting."
"She knew surgery was inevitable, it was inevitable," the source said
"According to people familiar with the matter, Kardashian's mother, Chris, said she knew Jenna's operation in advance and vowed to stop the filming from continuing."



Number  95
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“IG | selenagomez via Stories: pic.twitter.com/Qa9aXeXTr9 — Selena Gomez News (@SelenaHQ) December 4, 2017HollywoodLifers, what do you think Selena’s latest Instagram Story means?”
“Or, possibly, something’s going on in her personal life that she wants to distance herself from momentarily.”
“The ‘Wolves’ singer looked upset in an Instagram story that said she needed ‘alone time.’ Is she sad about how things are going with Justin Bieber?”
“Selena Gomez, 25, has been living her best life lately.”
“From being named Billboard‘s Woman of the Year to her blonde makeover to her sweet reunion with Justin Bieber, 23, she’s proven that she’s doing things on her own terms — and it’s working.”
“But even the “Wolves” singer needs a break sometimes.”
“She recently posted a video on her Instagram story that shows herself frowning.”
““I need some alone time,” she captioned the short clip.”
“Is she alright?”
“There are a million reasons why the “Wolves” singer would need some space.”


"Ig | selenagomez through the story: pic.twitter.com/Qa9aXeXTr9 -Selena Gomez news (@ selenahq) December 4, 2017 Hollywood lifers, what do you think Selena's latest instagram report means? "
"Or maybe something happened in her personal life that she wanted to keep away from for a while."
In an instagram report, the "wolf" singer looked frustrated, saying she needed "time alone.". Is she upset about Justin Bieber? "
"Serena Gomez, 25, has been living her best life recently."
"From being named Billboard's woman of the year, to her blonde makeover, to her sweet reunion with 23-year-old Justin Bieber, she has proved that she does things her way - and that it works."
"But even wolf singers sometimes need a break."
"She recently posted a video on instagram that showed that she was sad."
"I need some time alone," she wrote in the title of the video
"How is she?"
"There are a million reasons why wolf singers need some space."



**Something goes wrong**
“It’s pretty obvious that she’s difficult to work with.”A rep for Ripa insisted, “This story is absolutely not true,” but declined to comment further.”
“It’s fair to say she has a lot of influence over him.”
“Multiple sources revealed on “Page Six TV” Wednesday that Ripa, 47, demanded her “Live!” co-host Ryan Seacrest cancel an appearance on ABC’s “Good Morning America” at the very last minute.”
““Ryan was scheduled to be on Wednesday’s show well in advance.”
“He’s been on the show rundown for a week.”
“Then yesterday, or maybe even as late as last night, Kelly threw a s–t fit and told him he couldn’t do ‘GMA,’ so he pulled his appearance,” a source told us.”
“Seacrest, 42, was supposed to appear on the show to promote ABC’s new “American Idol” season with judges Lionel Richie, Katy Perry and Luke Bryan.”
“Seacrest immediately pulled the plug in order to not upset Ripa — who famously had a meltdown, stormed off and took a week off when Strahan, 45, quit her show without giving her advance warning in 2016 — another source added.”
““It’s very clear that Ryan wants to stay on her good side.”
“She’s an executive producer on the show, so she has a lot of pull.”


"Obviously, it's hard to work with her." A representative of Ripa insisted, "this is absolutely not true," but declined to comment further
"It can be said that she has a great influence on him."
Multiple sources revealed that "page six TV" Wednesday, Ripa, 47, asked her to "live! Co host Ryan Seacrest canceled his last-minute appearance on ABC's Good Morning America
"Ryan has been scheduled for last Wednesday."
"He's been on the show for a week."
A source told us: "yesterday, maybe late last night, Kelly wore an S-T suit and told him that he couldn't attend the GMA, so he didn't show up."
Seacrest, 42, should have appeared on the show with judges Lionel Ritchie, Katie Perry and Luke Bryan to promote ABC's new season of "American Idol"
Another source added: "Seacrest immediately unplugged Ripa in order not to annoy her - Ripa is known to be in a low mood, and Strahan, 45, quit her show in 2016 without warning and left for a week's rest."
"Obviously, Ryan wants to be on her good side."
"She's the executive producer of the show, so it's very attractive."



**Something goes wrong**
“Or maybe Selena will finally meet her future “perfect boyfriend“.”
“That would be awesome.”
“Who knows — maybe she’ll link up with BFF Taylor Swift and they’ll have some fun together.”
“Anyway, we’re super excited for Selena’s birthday and can’t wait to see how she celebrates her big day!”
“Not only would be it disrespectful to Hailey, but it would just play with Selena’s emotions.”
“For the sake of everyone in this longstanding love triangle, we hope Justin respects Selena’s wishes and hold back from sending her anything on her birthday.”
“So the only thing Selena really wants from Justin for her birthday this year, is for him to be happy and not reach out in anyway,” our source adds.”
“But irregardless, “Selena totally respects Justin and his relationship with his new fiancee, Hailey [Baldwin] , so she feels it would be awkward and maybe even disrespectful to Hailey for Justin to wish Selena a happy birthday.”
“Considering Justin s now engaged to another woman we don t think Selena will have to worry about Justin sending her anything in the mail...”
“She is finally in a good place having really moved on from their relationship so Selena kinda hopes Justin does not stir anything up with her by sending her a gift flowers or even trying to reach out with a phone call or text a source close to Selena tells...”


Or will Serena finally meet her future "perfect boyfriend"
"That's great."
"Who knows - maybe she'll get in touch with her friend Taylor swift and they'll have a good time together."
"Anyway, we are so excited about Serena's birthday that we can't wait to see how she celebrates it!"
"It's not just disrespect for Haley, it's just playing with Serena's emotions."
"For everyone in this long love triangle, we hope Justin respects Serena's wishes and doesn't give her anything on her birthday."
"So the only thing Serena really wants Justin to do on her birthday this year is to make him happy and not help him anyway," our source added
"But anyway," Selena fully respects Justin and his relationship with his new fiancee, Haley (Baldwin), so she thinks it's embarrassing, maybe even disrespectful, for her to wish her a happy birthday. "
"Considering that Justin is engaged to another woman now, we don't think Selena has to worry about Justin sending her any mail..."
"She finally left their relationship in a good place, so Selena kind of hoped that Justin would not stir up anything about her, send her flowers as gifts, or even try to contact the source close to Selena by phone or text message to tell her..."



Number  98
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Tell us, HollywoodLifers — do you think Kim and Kanye’s baby’s birth will end up being filmed for TV?”
“Kim, on the other hand, is not having any of it.”
“Kim Kardashian, 37, has already admitted that having a surrogate carry her and Kanye West‘s, 40, third child is “so much harder” than personally being pregnant.”
“And it seems Kanye isn’t making things any easier for the reality star.”
“In fact, a new report from InTouch Weekly claims the couple has been fighting constantly in the weeks leading up to their daughter’s arrival, and it’s driving Kim nuts.”
“Their main source of tension?”
“The mag claims Kim wants to film their child’s birth for Keeping Up With The Kardashians, while Kanye is totally against it.”
“Click here to see adorable pics of the Kardashian kids.”
““They’re at loggerheads about the birth being filmed for Keeping Up With The Kardashians,” an insider for the publication told the mag.”
““Kanye’s made it clear that cameras are banned from the delivery room.” On top of that, Kanye reportedly doesn’t even want Kris Jenner, 62, to be there either — apparently he wants to keep things super private and intimate!”


"Tell us, Hollywood actresses - do you think the birth of Kim and Kanye's baby will eventually be made into a TV show?"
"Kim, on the other hand, didn't have any."
"Kim Kardashian, 37, has admitted that getting a surrogate mother to have her third child with Kanye West, 40, is" much more difficult "than getting pregnant herself
"It seems Kanye didn't make it easier for reality TV stars."
"In fact, a new report in touch weekly said the couple had been fighting for weeks before their daughter arrived, which drove Kim crazy."
"What is the main source of their nervousness?"
"The magazine claimed that in order to keep up with the kardashians, King wanted to film the birth of their child, while Kanye was totally against it."
"Click here to see lovely photos of Kardashian's children."
"In order to keep up with the kardashians, they had an argument during the filming of the birth," an insider told the magazine
"Kanye made it clear that cameras are not allowed in the delivery room." In addition, it is reported that Kanye doesn't even want Kris Jenner, 62, in the delivery room - obviously, he wants things to be very private and intimate! "



Number  99
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Hey, if the mere mention of Scott Disick doesn't bring to mind a bloodsucker who will spread disease to your nether regions, then you're not sufficiently wary of the Lord.”
“), Kourtney is pissed about the possibility of Jen and Scott hooking up.”
“So it's not surprising that J-Law might have a bit of a thing for Kourtney Kardashian sperm donor and bold innovator in the use of facial hair to camouflage booze bloat, Scott Disick.”
“On second thought, it is surprising, but only in the sense that we're shocked Scott is still alive.”
“Anyway, Jen revealed her love for the Lord in a recent interview with Oprah, in which she revealed that Scott would be one of her three ideal dinner guests.”
“(The other two were Luann DeLesseps and Bethenny Frankel, both of Bravo's Real Housewives franchise.”
“Jen ... we're concerned.)”
“Given that Jen chose Scott over any of the women in the Kardashian clan, it's not surprising that certain tabloids already have these two bedding down together.”
“It's also not surprising that some of these same publications are casting Kourtney in the role of the insane ex:According to the Australian version of OK!”
“...magazine (because why wouldn't news about three American celebs reach Sydney first?”


"Hey, if you don't think that a vampire will spread the disease to your underworld at the mention of Scott Disick, then you're not alert to God."
"), Courtney was angry about the possibility that Jen and Scott might hook up
"So it's no surprise that j-law may have a little interest in Kourtney Kardashian's sperm donor and bold innovator Scott disc."
"When you think about it, it's amazing, but we're just shocked that Scott is still alive."
"Anyway, Jennifer revealed her love for God in a recent interview with Oprah, in which she revealed that Scott would be one of her ideal three dinner guests."
"(the other two are Luan dreisepps and Bethany Frankel, both of whom are Bravo's Real Housewives series."
"Jane... We are worried.)
"Since Jane chose Scott over any woman in the Kardashian family, it's not surprising that some tabloids have put the two bedding together."
"It's not surprising that some of these same publications are in the role of casting coultney, crazy before: according to the Australian Version of OK!"
“… Magazine (because why don't the news of three American celebrities arrive in Sydney first? "



Number  100
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““She and Jamie are really in love.””
““Katie is past the point of caring about what Tom thinks about her private life,” an insider told Life & Style exclusively.”
“Jamie was spotted hanging out Suri, Katie’s 11-year-old daughter with Tom, before her first day of school last month, and Katie is ready to take their relationship to the next level.”
““She’s allowed to date, but she cannot do so in a public fashion, and she’s not supposed to let any boyfriend near their daughter Suri.”And the couple is getting serious.”
““Katie signed a clause in her quickie divorce settlement that prevents her from embarrassing Tom in various ways, like talking about him or Scientology, or publicly dating another man for five years after the divorce,” a source said.”
“According to reports, her divorce contained a clause that did not allow her to publicly date another man for five years after their split.”
“He feels betrayed by both of them.”The timing is no coincidence when it comes to Katie’s decision to publicize her romance.”
““Tom is shocked and upset that Katie is dating a costar he once considered a close friend.”
“While Katie and Jamie did their best to keep things a secret from the world, Tom is too well-connected and found out about them shortly after their romance began,” a source told Hollywood Life.”
““Tom has known about Katie and Jamie’s secret relationship since the beginning and it has always bothered him that they were hooking up.”


"She and Jamie are really in love."
"Katie no longer cares about Tom's view of his private life," one insider said in an exclusive interview with life and fashion
"Jamie was found with Katie's 11 year old daughter Suri on the first day of school last month, and Katie is ready to take their relationship to a new level."
"She's allowed to date, but she can't do it in public, and she shouldn't let any of her boyfriends get close to their daughter Suri." The couple are getting more and more serious
"Katie signed a clause in her express divorce agreement to prevent her from embarrassing Tom in various ways, such as talking about him or Scientology, or dating another man publicly for five years after the divorce," a source said
"It is reported that there is a provision in her divorce agreement that she is not allowed to date another man publicly for five years after the divorce."
"He felt betrayed by both of them." It's no coincidence that Katie decided to make her romance public
"Tom is shocked and upset. Katie is dating a partner he once thought was a close friend."
"Although Katie and Jamie did their best to keep secrets from the outside world, Tom was so close that he found them soon after their relationship started," a source told Hollywood life
"Tom knew the secret relationship between Katie and Jamie from the very beginning. They were colluding with each other and bothered him all the time."



Number  101
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[3]In North America, the film opened alongside The Hunger Games: Mockingjay – Part 2 and The Night Before on November 20, 2015.”
“[10]Reception [ edit ]Box office [ edit ]Secret in Their Eyes grossed $20.2 million in North America and $12 million in other territories for a worldwide total of $32.2 million, against a budget of $19.5 million.”
“Claire taunts Marzin, provoking him to expose himself and punch her, saying he's going to give Claire what Carolyn got.”
“Claire argues with Ray over his methods while seemingly defending Marzin, saying he wasn't capable of the crime.”
“Ray and Detective Bumpy Willis (Norris) track down and arrest Marzin at Dodger Stadium.”
“Ray forces Siefert to admit that he set up Ghazala as a patsy to protect Marzin.”
“Officer Reggie Siefert (Kelly) brings in a suspect named Aban Ghazala (Amir Malaklou), who Ray realizes is not the killer.”
“Martin Morales (Molina) is reluctant to go after Marzin, fearing it would compromise the terrorism investigation.”
“D.A.”
“Ray scans the photo and matches it to Anzor Marzin (Joe Cole), who is an informant in the terrorism probe.”


"[3] in North America, the film was released at the same time as" hunger game: mocking Jay - Part Two "and" hunger game "the night before, on November 20, 2015."
"[10] the box office in North America and other regions is US $20.2 million and US $12 million respectively, and the global total box office is US $32.2 million, while the budget is US $19.5 million."
Claire mocks Mazin, encourages him to expose himself and beat her, saying that he wants to give Claire what Caroline gets
"While defending Mazin, Claire argued with ray about his method, saying that he had no criminal ability."
"Ray and detective kampi Willis (Norris) track and arrest Mazin at dodge stadium."
"Ray forced sivert to admit that he made garzara an accomplice in protecting Mazin."
Sergeant Reggie Seafort (Kelly) brings a suspect named aban garzara (Amir malaku). Ray realizes that he is not the murderer
"Martin Morales (Molina) is not willing to pursue Mazin, worried that this will affect the investigation of terrorism."
"Prosecutor"
"Ray scanned the photo and compared it with anzol Mazin (Joe Cole), who is the informant of the terrorism investigation."



Number  102
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Stay tuned for the latest news and updates about Robert Pattinson!”
“Kristen Stewart’s former on-screen partner, Kylie Minogue, Bella Hadid, and Katy Perry have yet to comment on these dating rumors.”
“Many fans were shocked when it was first confirmed that Robert Pattinson ended his relationship with FKA Twigs after many years of dating.”
“Speculation about the former couple’s breakup sparked after the Twilight actor said that he was “kind of” engaged to the “Pendulum” singer during an appearance on The Howard Stern Show in July 2017.”
“New reports suggest that the former beau of Kristen Stewart is now ready to move on from the English musician.”
“Rumors have it that Robert Pattinson is exclusively seeing Kylie Minogue.”
“A mutual pal reportedly set up Kristen Stewart’s ex-boyfriend and the “Can’t Get You out of My Head” songstress in December 2017.”
“It was even claimed that Kylie brought the Twilight actor to her Melbourne flat.”
““They have a lot in common and seem to like each other a lot.”This is not the first time the Robert Pattinson and Kylie Minogue were rumored to be hitting on each other.”
“As a matter of fact, the two sparked dating rumors after the former fiance of FKA Twigs was sighted kissing the Aussie singer at Cannes Films Festival in May 2014.”


"Stay tuned for Robert Pattinson's latest news and updates!"
Kristen Stewart's former screen partners Kelly Milo, Bella Hadid and Katie Perry have yet to comment on the dating rumors
"Many fans were shocked when it was first confirmed that Robert Pattinson ended his relationship with FKA twigs after years of dating."
The twilight hero said he was engaged to the "pendulum" singer on Howard Stern's show in July 2017, sparking speculation that the former couple broke up
"New reports show that Kristen Stewart's ex boyfriend is now ready to leave the British musician."
"There's a rumor that Robert Pattinson only meets Kelly Minogue."
"It's reported that a mutual friend framed Kristen Stewart's ex boyfriend and" can't let you leave my head "female singer in December 2017."
"It's even said that Kelly brought the twilight cast to her apartment in Melbourne."
"They have a lot in common and seem to like each other very much." It's not the first time Robert Pattinson and Kelly Milo have been rumored to be dating
"In fact, in May 2014, FKA twigs' ex fiance was seen kissing the Australian singer at the Cannes Film Festival, which sparked rumors of a date."



Number  103
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“And these are her empowering bags that she made in collab with Coach.”
“For more Selena love, this is the super healthy way that Gomez starts her day.”
“Despite the intense emotional toll that this might take on someone, magine being in the public eye since the bright-eyed age of seven, wherein every part of your career and personal life become public fodder.”
“Despite the intense emotional toll that this might take on someone, Selena Gomez has managed to navigate a path with grace and has it figured out.”
“At a mere 25 years old the actress slash singer is pretty much a confident sage when it comes to body positivity especially since her life saving kidney transplant which she got earlier this year to help with her autoimmune...”
“...disease called lupus...”
““When I look at my body now, I just see life,” Gomez tells Billboard in a recent interview (oh yeah, she just won their ‘Woman of the Year’ award, NBD).”
““There are a million things I could do—lasers and creams and all that stuff—but I’m okay with it.”
“I don t have perfect abs but I feel like I m wonderfully made I don t have perfect abs but I feel like I m wonderfully made That s not to say this self confidence came easily especially as...”
“...she s facing a newly minted surgery scar which she admits was hard in the beginning...”


"This is a license pack she worked with coach on."
"For more Selena's love, it's a super healthy way for Gomez to start her day."
"Although it may bring a huge emotional loss to someone, magine has been in the public eye since the age of seven, and every part of your career and personal life has become the material of the public."
"Even though it may bring huge emotional loss to some people, Selena Gomez managed to walk gracefully along the road and find the answer."
"At the age of 25, the actress was a very confident saint, especially after she received a life-saving kidney transplant earlier this year to help treat autoimmune diseases..."
“… A disease called lupus... "
"When I look at my body now, all I see is life," Gomez told billboard in a recent interview
"I can do a lot of things, such as lasers, cream, and so on, but I can accept that."
"I don't have perfect ABS, but I think I'm doing well. I don't have perfect ABS, but I think I'm doing well. This doesn't mean that confidence is easy, especially when..."
“… She is facing a new surgical scar, which she admits was difficult in the beginning... "



Number  104
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Image Credit: FameFlynetWatch The Duke and Duchess of Cambridge and Prince Harry in conversation on mental health for @heads_together #oktosay pic.twitter.com/417gqyqzk0 — Kensington Palace (@KensingtonRoyal) April 21, 2017”
“Also, check back with CDL for all the latest news and updates on the royal family right here.”
“The Duchess of Cambridge has made it no secret that she’s unhappy with her current situation at home.”
“In a new Heads Together clip with Prince William and Prince Harry, Kate Middleton hints that she’s done having children.”
“She struggled so much after the birth of her first child, Prince George.”
“Kate recalled how she wasn’t prepared for all the life changes that come after having your first child.”
“During Kate’s heartfelt confession, William sat next to her in silence.”
““Having a child, particularly your first child, is such a life-changing moment,” Kate said in the clip.”
““Nothing can really prepare you for that.”
“Remember the first few days with little George, you have no idea what really you are doing, no matter how many books you read, nothing can prepare you for it.”Kate Middleton has made it no secret that she often feels lonely and isolated at home.”


Photo source: fameflynetwatch Duke and Duchess of Cambridge and Prince Harry have a conversation on mental health for @ heads ψ Ou together ψ oktosay pic.twitter.com/417gqyqzk0 -Kensington Palace (@ Kensington Royal) April 21, 2017 "
"In addition, please contact CDL here for all the latest news and news about the royal family."
"The Duchess of Cambridge made no secret of her dissatisfaction with her current situation at home."
Kate Middleton hinted in her latest photo with Prince William and Prince Harry that she no longer has children
"She has been struggling since the birth of her first child, Prince George."
"Kate recalled that after having her first child, she was not ready for all the changes in her life."
"In Kate's heartfelt confession, William sat next to her in silence."
"Having children, especially your first child, is such a life changing moment," Kate said in the clip
"Nothing can really prepare you."
"Remember the first few days with little George, you don't know what you're doing. No matter how many books you read, there's nothing you can prepare for." Kate Middleton has no secret that she often feels lonely and isolated at home



Number  105
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Even though I eat healthy most of the time, I think it’s really important to have something sweet,” she says of her go-to matcha chia seed pudding that she adds is “worth it.””
“And after that she fills up on whole grain oatmeal—but not the instant variety—made fresh on the stove.”
“Kourtney Kardashian is one fit mama!”
“Sure the38 year old reality star hits the gym regularly but it s her clean eating habits that help her stay on track I try to eat healthy and include as many organic whole foods as possible Kardashian writes in a new post on her website which details her current...”
“...meal plan Get push notifications with news features and more...”
“When the mom-of-three wakes up, before even thinking about food, she takes collagen supplements on an empty stomach followed by a glass of water mixed with one tablespoon of organic apple cider vinegar 20 minutes later.”
““Both of these habits have a ton of health benefits that affect everything from your skin to the way your body processes nutrients,” Kardashian explains.”
“The apple cider vinegar blend, known to help with weight loss, is in her daily regimen twice along with vegan probiotics shots—both before breakfast and dinner.”
“Before the star hits the gym for a good sweat, without fail, she enjoys her fresh avocado pudding.”
““It only takes a few minutes to make and it provides healthy fats to give me energy before a workout,” she says.”


"Although I eat healthily most of the time, I think it's really important to eat something sweet," she said of going to the Matcha pudding, adding, "it's worth it."
"After that, she ate whole grain oatmeal, not fresh ready to eat oatmeal on the stove."
"Courtney Kardashian is a healthy mother!"
"Of course, the 38 year old reality TV star often goes to the gym to exercise, but it's her clean eating habits that help her keep healthy. I try to eat healthy food and organic whole foods as much as possible," Kardashian wrote in a new article on her website, which details her current situation... "
“… Meal plans get push notifications with news features and more... "
"When the mother of three woke up, before she had time to think about food, she took collagen supplements on an empty stomach, and 20 minutes later she drank a glass of water and a teaspoon of organic apple vinegar."
"Both habits have great health benefits, from the skin to the way the body processes nutrients," Kardashian explained
"Apple vinegar mixture, known to help lose weight, is in her twice daily regimen, along with vegetarian probiotic injections before breakfast and dinner."
"Before the star goes to the gym and sweats, there's no doubt that she likes fresh avocado pudding."
"It only takes a few minutes to complete, and it provides healthy fat for me to gain energy before I exercise," she said



Number  106
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“(HL)”
“Rather, it appears the outlet has once again made it all up.”
“Now the site has manufactured a single made-up story involving all three superstars.”
“Gossip Cop can expose this blatant fabrication.”
“In the wake of Gomez making a surprise appearance at Swift’s concert this weekend, the site is pretending to have “exclusive” insight on their friendship.”
“The blog was seemingly inspired to concoct its narrative because Gomez celebrated her bond with Swift during an on stage speech in which she declared This person has never ever judged a single decision I ve made To capitalize on the comments HollywoodLife quotes a so called source as saying...”
“Selena meant every word she said about Taylor This supposed snitch goes on to assert Taylor was literally the only one of Selena s pals who never said anything bad about her getting back with Justin she s always just been there for Selena as a supportive and loving friend...”
“...no matter what While the sentiments are nice the problem is that they completely contradict what the website has been telling fans for years...”
“Throughout Gomez and Bieber’s years-long, on-and-off relationship, the outlet has repeatedly insisted that Swift objects to the romance.”
“The evidence is still available right on the site itself, and Gossip Cop has gathered some of the headlines in a screengrab below.”


“（HL）”
"On the contrary, it seems that the store has made up for it again."
"Now the website has made up a fictional story about all three superstars."
"The gossip police can expose this blatant fabrication."
"After Gomez unexpectedly appeared at Swift's concert this weekend, the website pretended to have an 'exclusive' view of their friendship."
"This blog seems to be inspired to make up stories, because Gomez celebrated her relationship with swift in a speech on stage, in which she declared that this person has never judged a decision I made by using Hollywood life to quote comments from a so-called source..."
"Serena said that every word Taylor said was what she meant. The so-called informant went on to say that Taylor was the only one of Serena's friends who had never said bad things about her and Justin's marriage. She had been there supporting Serena and was a loving friend..."
“… No matter what, although their mood is good, the problem is that they are totally against what websites have told fans for years... "
"Throughout the years of Gomez and Bieber's off and on relationship, outlets has repeatedly insisted that swift opposes it."
"The evidence can still be found on the website, and the gossip police collected some headlines in the screenshot below."



Number  107
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“That's why William and Kate shared their first kiss as a married couple on a balcony outside Buckingham Palace.”
“In fact, the Church of England actually forbids such acts in sacred places like Westminster Abbey.”
“Lewis Whyld/WPA Pool/ Getty ImagesWhen Queen Victoria got married to Prince Albert in February 1840, Albert's grandmother gifted the young bride-to-be a sprig of myrtle.”
“The bouquet, made of lily of the vallery, hyacinths, ivy and myrtle (which was grown from the bouquet of Queen Victoria), was featured in her wedding day, April 29, 2011, when she married Prince William, Duke of Cambridge.”
“A recreation of the Duchess of Cambridge's wedding bouquet is photographed before it goes on display at Buckingham Palace during the annual summer opening on July 20, 2011, in London.”
“Myrtle is viewed as an emblem of marriage and love, but its significance for the royals goes far deeper than that.”
“And it would be highly unusual if Meghan Markle didn't follow in their footsteps.”
“Kate did it.”
“Princess Diana did it.”
“Queen Elizabeth did it.”


"That's why William and Kate share their first wedding kiss on the balcony outside Buckingham Palace."
"In fact, the Anglican Church actually forbids such acts in holy places like Westminster Abbey."
In February 1840, when Queen Victoria married Prince Albert, Albert's grandmother gave the young bride a Myrtle
"When she married Prince William, Duke of Cambridge, on April 29, 2011, the bouquet was made of Valley lilies, hyacinths, ivy and myrtle (grown from Queen Victoria's bouquet)
The wedding bouquet of the Duchess of Cambridge is photographed at the opening ceremony of the annual summer wedding in London on July 20, 2011 in front of an exhibition at Buckingham Palace
"Myrtle is regarded as a symbol of marriage and love, but it means more to the royal family than that."
"It would be very unusual if Megan markel didn't follow in their footsteps."
"Kate did it."
"Princess Diana did it."
"Queen Elizabeth did it."



Number  108
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Of course, Stewart is a much more common name than Kardashian, so the analogy is not perfect.””
“It s also her daughter s last name and she wants to share a last name with her daughter FROM COINAGE The Most Expensive TV Shows of All Time Chyna s lawyer Walter Mosley told PEOPLE in December that of the many trademarks he s filed for her this is...”
“...presumed married name would be if she went ahead with her then engagement to their brother Rob Kardashian...”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“According to the documents filed in December, the sisters’ lawyers claimed they’ll “suffer damage including irreparable injury to their reputation and goodwill” if Chyna takes the Kardashian name.”
“The documents also said that Rob‘s on-again, off-again girlfriend — and mother of his 4-month-old daughter Dream Renée — is “deliberately seeking to profit from the goodwill and popularity” by changing her name.”
“However, a source close to Chyna previously told PEOPLE, “She’s not trying to do anything negative.”
“She wants to trademark the name because it will be her name when she gets married and she wants to protect it.”
“...the first one that s ever been opposed The Kardashians like Angela and my other clients are very protective of our marks I think for us this is going to be a clear case win because it s actually her name it s not a poaching he said...”
“If someone wants to register ‘Angela Stewart’ that might be okay.”


"Of course, Stewart is a more common name than Kardashian, so the metaphor is not perfect."
"This is also her daughter's surname. She wants to share a surname with her daughter. It's the most expensive TV show ever. Walter Mosley, ziner's lawyer, told people in December last year that among the many trademarks he applied for for for her, this is..."
“…… If she continues to be engaged to their brother rob Kardashian, suppose her married name is... "
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"According to the documents submitted in December last year, the sisters' lawyers claimed that if Gina took the name of Kardashian, they would" suffer losses, including irreparable damage to their reputation and goodwill. "
"The document also said Rob's up and down girlfriend, who is also the mother of his four month old daughter, Melanie, is" deliberately profiting from goodwill and popularity "by changing her name
However, a source close to chener told people earlier, "she's not trying to do anything negative."
"She wants to trademark the name because it will be her name after marriage, and she wants to protect it."
“… Kardashian, the first one to be opposed, like Angela and my other clients, are very protective of our trademark. I think it will be an obvious victory for us, because it's actually her name. It's not a poaching, he said
"If someone wants to sign up for Angela Stewart, it might be OK."



Number  109
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I think she’ll fight for it.””
“Jennifer, who’s endured three failed marriages, “was heartbroken to hear that Alex was talking to Lauren,” says the insider.”
“Within hours of each other on Jan 24 the former Yankee slugger posted a photo of a cryptic quote There s nothing wrong with making a mistake what s wrong is not making the effort to make it right and the Shades of Blue star shared a photo of a...”
“...gigantic bouquet of flowers Alex had sent her...”
“The next day, she uploaded a selfie and captioned the photo, “It’s all in God’s hands always,” along with the hashtag #letgoandletgod.”
“According to an insider, “That was aimed directly at Alex.”Hollywood’s hottest duo is on the verge of flaming out.”
“Jennifer 48 is privately questioning her relationship with her boyfriend of nearly a year after learning he s still in touch with former fling Lauren Hunter a fitness model who last year claimed in an interview that Alex 42 had been sexting her for months including while he was dating...”
“J Lo...”
“Recently, “someone went to Jennifer with new details that Alex was still texting with Lauren, and that’s what made Jennifer lose it,” the insider tells In Touch.”
““Of course, he said it wasn’t physical, and maybe it wasn’t, but in Jennifer’s book, that’s still cheating.”


"I think she will fight for it."
"Jennifer has been through three failed marriages and is sad to hear Alex talking to Lauren," the person said
"On January 24, the former Yankees batter posted a picture in a few hours with a mysterious quote on it. There is nothing wrong with making a mistake. The mistake is not to try to correct it. The shadow of blue star shared a picture with a
“…… Alex gave her a big bunch of flowers... "
The next day, she uploaded a self portrait with the title "everything is in God's hands" and the label "let go and let God"
"It's directed at Alex," according to one person familiar with the matter Hollywood's hottest duet is on the verge of a hit
"On the 48th, Jennifer privately questioned her relationship with her boyfriend who has been dating for nearly a year. She learned that her boyfriend is still in contact with former flying Lauren hunter, a fitness model. In an interview last year, she said that Alex 42 had sent her sex messages for several months, including during dating..."
"Jerome..."
"Recently," someone revealed some new details to Jennifer, saying that Alex is still texting Lauren, and that's why she lost contact, "a person familiar with the matter told contact
"Of course, he says it's not physical, maybe not, but in Jennifer's book, it's still cheating."



Number  110
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““He loved celebrating with Gwen and her kids, but it is not the same for him, there’s is still a big piece missing in his life.” Perhaps not for long!”
““He loves being close to Gwen and the bond he shares with her kids, but the day is a sad reminder to him that he never had kids of his own,” a source close to Blake told HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“As we previously reported, Blake had a hard time on Mother’s Day because he hasn’t had any children.”
“At 48, her friends feel it would be a miracle baby but they can only guess what’s really going on and hope for her to break the news soon!” So do we!”
“She has been also wearing baggier clothing lately and friends feel like she must be keeping a secret.”
““She has always wanted a girl and it’s clear to everyone Gwen really loves Blake a lot and they have always talked about having their own family together.”
““Those that see her daily are convinced she might finally be pregnant with Blake’s baby,” they added.”
“The source added that her clothes have also gotten baggier in recent days as well, leading to more heated speculation.”
“So exciting!”
““Her friends have not seen her touch a glass of wine or any alcohol in weeks and they think Gwen has been glowing lately.” OMG!”


"He likes to celebrate with Gwen and her children, but it's different for him. He's still missing a big part of his life." Maybe not for long! "
A source close to Blake told reporters: "he likes to be close to Gwen and share his feelings with Gwen's children, but this day is a sad reminder for him that he has never had his own children." Exclusive to Hollywood life
"As we reported earlier, Blake had a hard time on Mother's day because he had no children."
"At the age of 48, her friends thought it would be a miracle baby, but they could only guess what happened and hope that she would announce it soon! "So are we!"
"She's also wearing loose clothes recently, and friends think she must be keeping a secret."
"She's always wanted a girl, and everyone knows that Gwen really loves Blake. They've been talking about having a family together."
"Those who see her every day are convinced that she may eventually have black's baby," they added
"The source added that her clothes have also become more and more loose in recent days, which has led to more intense speculation."
"It's exciting!"
"Her friends haven't seen her touch a glass of wine or any alcohol for weeks, and they think Gwen has been shining lately." My God



Number  111
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you really think Kimye are splitting?”
“Despite Kim’s rep denying the divorce report, Life & Style still continues to report that the couple is struggling.”
“Kim has allegedly made the decision to file for divorce from Yeezy and is ‘ready to move on’ with her life, according to a new report.”
“UPDATE: A rep for Kim exclusively reveals to HollywoodLife.com that this report is “absolutely false.” — Original report: Kim Kardashian, 37, will allegedly be filing for divorce from Kanye West, 40, Life & Style reports, adding that “it’s officially over” between the power couple.”
““She is ready to move on with her life,” an insider tells the mag.”
“After Ye s 2016 hospitalization where reports claimed he suffered a mental breakdown the source says that things only got worse with his erratic behavior Upon his release from UCLA Medical Center back in Nov 2016 Kanye s felt spied on by Kim which has caused him to come distant...”
“...as reported by the mag...”
““Kanye will go days without talking to her.”
“He’s hot and he’s cold.”
“Even their sex life isn’t what it used to be.”The mag goes on to report that Kanye is hiding dark secrets, that only Kim knows about.”


"Holly worm, do you really think the golden leaf is going to split?"
"Although Kim's representative denied the divorce report, life and fashion continues to report that the couple are struggling."
According to a new report, Jin Yaner is said to have made a decision to divorce Yeats and is ready to continue her life
Update: a representative of King exclusively revealed that the report of Hollywood Life "is absolutely false." - original report: Kim Kardashian, 37, is said to be divorcing Kanye West, 40, and life & Style reports, adding that the "relationship between power couples" is officially over
"She's ready to move on with her life," one insider told the magazine
"After Ye was hospitalized in 2016, it was reported that he had a mental breakdown. The source said that after he was discharged from UCLA Medical Center in November 2016, the situation would only get worse, because his unstable behavior made Kanye feel monitored by Kim, which made him alienated..."
“… According to the magazine
"Kanye didn't talk to her for days."
"He's hot and cold."
"Even their sex life is not what it used to be." The magazine went on to report that Kanye had a secret that only Kim knew



Number  112
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“… It still works!””
“I guess I wanted to say, ‘This is my DNA.’ I’m just a girl from Anaheim, CA and I’ve never been anything else… And for a song to be relevant 20 years later?”
“But why?”
“— Check out her latest interview…Did Gwen Stefani, 48, just reveal that she’s quitting music after her Just a Girl Las Vegas residency?”
“Well, not quite.”
“But, she did admit that she’s nearing the end of her music journey, and she’s OK with that!”
““I always think it’s fine if I never do it again,” she told OK magazine about performing.”
““Then when I get on stage, I’m like, ‘Oh my gosh, I love this!’ I love my music, I love being up there.”
“It’s my gift — it’s what I’m here for.”
“I’m obviously at the end of my journey of being a musician,” she continued.”


“… Still valid! "
"I think I want to say, 'this is my DNA.' I'm just a girl from Anaheim, California, and I've never done anything else Does a song in 20 years make sense? "
"But why?"
"- look at her latest interview Has Gwen Stephanie, 48, revealed that she's quitting music after working as a girl's intern in Las Vegas? "
"Well, not exactly."
"But she does admit that her musical journey is coming to an end, and she has no problem with it!"
"I always thought it would be nice if I didn't do it again," she told OK magazine about acting
"When I'm on stage, I'll say, 'my God, I love this! "I love my music, I love being there."
"It's my gift - that's why I'm here."
"Obviously, my career as a musician has come to an end," she continued



Number  113
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“ — Sage Steele (@sagesteele) January 30, 2017”
“:) but the crazy thing is, we can talk about it like adults & agree to disagree!”
“Don't worry — we can arm wrestle over it this week in Houston — Sage Steele (@sagesteele) January 30, 2017@MikeSilver all good…not the first time we disagree!”
“Re-read my post.”
“Steele defended herself — and her post — on Twitter:@MikeSilver better, more effective ways to do it, Silver!”
“Many also resorted to using slurs to describe the ESPN personality, which is really just a reminder that social media can be terrible all around.”
“On Instagram, in an effort to stand up for the immigrants and refugees affected by the ban, many commentors criticized her for what they believed wasn’t seeing the bigger picture.”
“Brilliant.”
“Yes, immigrants were affected by this as well.”
“But it saddened me to see the joy on their faces knowing that they were successful in disrupting so many people’s travel plans.”


"- Sage Steele (@ sagesteele) 30 January 2017"
":) but the crazy thing is, we can talk about it like adults & agree or disagree!"
"Don't worry - we can have an arm wrestling in Houston this week - Sage Steele (@ sagesteele) January 30, 2017 @ Mike silver everything is OK It's not the first time we disagree! "
"Reread my post."
Steele defended himself and his position. Twitter: @ Mike silver better and more effective way, silver
"Many people also use stigma to describe ESPN's personality, which is actually just a reminder that social media can get really bad."
"On instagram, many critics criticized her for defending immigrants and refugees affected by the ban because they thought she didn't see the big picture."
"Great."
"Yes, immigrants have also been affected."
"But I'm sad to see the joy on their faces and know that they have successfully disrupted the travel plans of so many people."



Number  114
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...an ugly divorce...”
“The one that’s up on the site right now has been edited.”
“Each bit of information that reaches the media is being treated like a chess move in a big game of Who Gets to Keep Their Reputation.”
“Angelina Jolie filed for divorce after an alleged altercation between Brad Pitt and their son Maddox on a private plane.”
“The only info that we, the reading public had at first was that she cited irreconcilable differences, and was trying to get sole custody of their children.”
“Wanting sole custody seemed significant, even before reports of Pitt’s drinking began to surface.”
“Now that Marion Cotillard has denied any involvement in the separation, the media focus is more and more on how Pitt interacts with his children.”
“Is he a man who drinks and emotionally or physically abuses his family when intoxicated?”
“Or is Angelina Jolie exaggerating one family argument so she can get custody, then jet off to the U.N., as the Pitt camp alleges?”
“It all kind of hinges on some recorded evidence of the inciting incident that supposedly led to Jolie’s filing.”


“… Ugly divorce... "
"Now the one on the website has been edited."
"Every bit of information spread to the media is seen as a game of chess in a big game of who can keep his reputation."
"Angelina Jolie filed for divorce after Brad Pitt and their son Maddox had a fight on a private plane."
"The only message we readers got in the first place was that she listed irreconcilable differences and tried to get the sole custody of their children."
"It seems to be significant to want separate custody, even before reports of Pete's drinking began to surface."
"Since Marion godia denies the separation, the media is increasingly focused on how Pitt interacts with his children."
"Is he a drunk, mentally or physically abusive person?"
Or did Angelina Jolie, as the Pitt camp put it, exaggerate a family quarrel in order to get custody and fly to the United Nations? "
"It all depends on some documented evidence that could be evidence of the seditious events that led to Julie's prosecution."



Number  115
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““There have been rumors circulating for weeks that Brad has moved on with a new woman, but no one was ready to see him hand-in-hand with royalty from Monaco.”For more info on Brad’s holiday plans, pick up the current issue of Life & Style, on newsstands now!”
“If that means he won’t see the kids as much or at the holidays, he has made peace with it.”This attitude adjustment could be a result of the 53-year-old’s new social life.”
“But these days, he isn’t letting his ex’s antics get him down — and it may be due to the fact that he’s dating again!”
“As Life & Style previously reported, Angelina was making it hard for Brad to see his six children — Maddox, 16, Pax, 13, Zahara, 12, Shiloh, 11, and twins Vivienne and Knox, 9 — over the holidays.”
““Angie is using the kids as pawns against him,” an insider explains.”
““Brad knows he can’t count on scheduled days with the kids because Angie has changed the plans abruptly at the last minute multiple times.”Though the old Brad may have responded in a fit of rage, he calmly thanked her for keeping him informed.”
““There are two choices for Brad,” the insider notes.”
““Fight back and get angry every time she pulls a stunt, which would only impacts the kids, or handle it like a mature adult.”
“According to In Touch, Brad has become smitten with a 21-year-old British actress named Ella Purnell — who, interestingly enough, played a young Angelina in 2014’s Maleficent.”
““No one could believe it when we saw them together,” an alleged onlooker told the outlet.”


"There have been rumors for weeks that Brad has lived with a new woman, but no one wants to see him hand in hand with the royal family from Monaco." To learn more about Brad's holiday plans, check out the latest issue of life and fashion at the newsstand
"If that means he won't meet the children on holiday, he's calmed down." This attitude adjustment may be the result of his new social life at 53
"But these days, he hasn't let his predecessor's antics disappoint him - probably because of the fact that he's dating again!"
"As previously reported, Angelina made it hard for Brad to see his six children during the holiday - 16-year-old Maddox, 13-year-old parks, 12-year-old Zahara, 11 year-old Shiloh and nine year-old twins Vivian and Knox."
"Angie used the kids as pawns against him," one insider explained
"Brad knew he couldn't count on the days with the kids because Angie suddenly changed her plans several times at the last minute." Although Brad may respond in a huff, he calmly thanks her for keeping him informed
"Brad has two options," the person familiar with the matter said
"Every time she plays a stunt, she has to fight back and get angry, which only affects the children, or deal with it like an adult."
"According to in touch, Brad fell in love with a 21-year-old British actress named Ella Purnell who, interestingly, played a young Angelina in 2014's maleficent."
"When we see them together, no one can believe it," one accused bystander told the media



Number  116
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“You may be able to find more information about this and similar content at piano.io...”
“This content is created and maintained by a third party, and imported onto this page to help users provide their email addresses.”
“Considering Prince George just spent his fifth birthday on a private island, you might expect Meghan to have big, extravagant plans for her 37th.”
“But no.”
“Meghan will spend her first birthday as a member of the royal family being a responsible adult and a good partner, accompanying Prince Harry to a wedding as his plus one.”
“According to Hello!, Harry and Meghan will spend August 4 (her birthday) at the wedding of Harry's childhood friend, Charlie Van Straubenzee, and Daisy Jenks.”
“Harry and Charlie have been friends since they attended Ludgrove Prep School in Berkshire together as children and Charlie even asked Harry to serve as his best man.”
“Charlie and his older brother, Thomas van Straubenzee, were also reportedly part of Harry and Meghan's wedding party in May, as ushers.”
“Max Mumby/Indigo Getty ImagesHarry's commitment to Charlie's wedding happens to fall on August 4, the same day Meghan will turn 37.”
“Royal photographer Tim Rooke revealed that the wedding coincides with Meghan's birthday in a tweet explaining that he will not be shooting the event.”


"You can find more information about this and similar content at: piano.io..."
This content is created and maintained by a third party and imported to this page to help users provide their email address
"Considering that Prince George has just spent his fifth birthday on a private island, you might think Megan would make a big, extravagant plan for her 37th birthday."
"But not yet."
"Megan will spend her first birthday as a member of the royal family, accompany Prince Harry to a wedding as a responsible adult and good partner, and be his other half."
"According to you! Harry and Megan will attend the wedding of Harry's childhood friends, Charlie van straubenzie and Daisy Jenks, on August 4
"Harry and Charlie have been friends since they were children at the Rudd grove prep school in Berkshire. Charlie even asked Harry to be his best man."
"Charlie and his brother Thomas van straubenzie were also reported as ushers at Harry and Megan's wedding in May."
"Max Moby / indigo Getty Shirley's commitment to Charlie's wedding happened on August 4, the same day Megan turned 37."
"Tim Rooke, the Royal photographer, revealed on his microblog that the wedding was Megan's birthday and explained that he would not film the event."



Number  117
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“They say they have to pinch each other to make sure it's real," the source dished.”
“"Gwen and Blake really feel fate brought them together and continues to bless them with this promise of more kids.”
“The source explained that the "4 in the Morning" songstress was "dying to see [Blake] with little babies" and wanted the country crooner to father her three sons.”
“People are starting to put two and two together."”
“"And friends are saying she's been talking constantly about Beyonce's pregnancy and wanting to reach out to her for advice.”
“"Word is they run in [Gwen's] family, on her dad's side," a source revealed.”
“Prior to this, Gwen was believed to be pregnant with twins and wanted to ask Beyonce Knowles for advice.”
“At one point, Gwen could be seen cradling her growing belly.”
“They looked relaxed as they were walking down the street hand-in-hand.”
“She was accompanied by her youngest son Apollo, who looked adorable in a black T-shirt.”


"They said they had to pinch each other to make sure it was true," the source said
"Gwen and Blake really feel that fate has brought them together and continue to bless them with the promise of more children."
The source explained that the "4 a.m." female singer "really wants to see black with the baby" and hopes that the country singer can be a father to her three sons
"People started putting two and two together."
"Another friend said that she had been talking about Beyonce's pregnancy and wanted to ask her for advice."
"I heard they were at (Gwen's) house, running on her father's side," a source said
"Before that, Gwen was thought to be pregnant with twins and wanted to ask Beyonce Knowles for advice."
"Once, Gwen could be seen holding her growing stomach."
"They walk in the street hand in hand and look relaxed."
"She was accompanied by her little son Apollo, who looked lovely in a black T-shirt."



Number  118
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Now the question is, will it be a dance floor filler or a teary-eyed ballad.”
“(Image: INSTAGRAM)The Boyfriend singer told us: "She looks the happiest I have ever seen her.”
“Sign up today for the best stories straight to your inbox Sign up today!”
“Thank you for subscribing We have more newsletters Show me See our privacy notice Invalid Email(Image: INSTAGRAM)And now we have Cheryl and Justin.”
“It's the collaboration that's been on everyone's lips for years, and now the former child star has spoken out on the upcoming hit.”
“Chatting in Miami, Justin Bieber exclusively confirmed to Daily Star Online that he has been wanting to work with Cheryl for a long time.”
“(Image: WENN)He explained: "With our commitments we have never managed to make it work.”
“"Though I saw her a couple of weeks back, and now she has left her role on The X Factor, I think this year will finally be the year we are able to record together.”
“"It's something we both want to do."”
“Better get your groove on and make it Christmas no1, then.”


"The question now is whether it's a dance floor filler or a tearful ballad."
"She looks like the happiest I've ever seen," the boyfriend singer told us
"Sign up today, send the best stories to your in box, and sign up today!"
"Thank you for subscribing. We have more newsletters showing that I see our privacy notification invalid email (image: instagram). Now we have Cheryl and Justin."
"It's this kind of cooperation that has been talked about for many years, and now the former child star has made his stand on the upcoming blockbuster."
"While chatting in Miami, Justin Bieber exclusively confirmed to the Daily Star online that he wanted to work with Cheryl for a long time."
"Our commitment never made it work," he explained
"Although I met her a few weeks ago and now she has left the role of X factor, I think this year is finally the year we can record together."
"It's something we all want to do."
"Then you'd better put on your clothes and make it number one at Christmas."



Number  119
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She's back to her old self and it's great to watch.'”
“2013 but the pair subsequently spent years insisting that they were merely just good friends Katie and Jamie were romantically linked to each other for the first time back in 2013 but the pair subsequently spent years insisting that they were merely just good friends...”
“The 39-year-old actress was spotted out and about solo in New York City.”
“The mom-of-one rocked a casual look in jeans and black flats, with a navy and white striped tee.”
“Still together: Katie Holmes stepped out solo in NY on Friday while Jamie Foxx performed at Atlantic City on Thursday nightHours earlier, Foxx was performing at the opening of the Ocean Resort Casino in Atlantic City.”
“Wearing a green, red and white tracksuit, he surprised guests at the hotel's HQ2 nightclub with his renditions of covers, jumping from Prince and Michael Jackson.”
“The Oscar-winner seemed to be having a ball, singing amongst a rambunctious crowd and even posing for selfies.”
“Nope The 39 year old actress denied the day before the couple had split Chill The mom of one rocked a casual look in jeans and black flats with a navy and white striped tee Rumor Radar Online reported on Wednesday that the couple had called it quits claiming Katie...”
“...who has a 12 year old daughter called Suri with ex husband Tom Cruise had instigated the split Shot down But Katie s representative Leslie Sloane denied the claim telling People it is 100 percent untrue On Thursday a representative for Holmes denied she had split from Foxx...”
“Radar Online reported on Wednesday that the couple had called it quits, claiming Katie - who has a 12-year-old daughter called Suri with ex-husband Tom Cruise - had instigated the split.”


"She's back where she was, and she looks good."
"In 2013, they spent years insisting that they were just good friends. Katie and Jamie were romantically connected for the first time in 2013, but they spent years insisting that they were just good friends..."
"The 39 year old actress was found out alone in New York City."
"A child's mother looks casual in jeans and black flats, navy blue and white striped T-shirt."
"Still together: Katie Holmes sang solo in New York on Friday, Jamie fox performed in Atlantic City on Thursday night, and fox performed at the opening ceremony of the Ocean Resort Casino in Atlantic City."
Wearing green, red and white sportswear, he jumped off the prince and Michael Jackson and surprised them with the cover of his performance at the hotel's hq2 nightclub
"The Oscar winner seems to be having a dance, singing in the noisy crowd, and even posing as a selfie."
"No, the 39 year old actress denied it the day before the couple broke up. A child's mother wore jeans and black flats, navy blue and white striped T-shirt, a casual look. There were rumors on the Internet on Wednesday that the couple announced their separation, claiming that Katie
“…… She and her ex husband Tom Cruise have a 12-year-old daughter, Suri, who split up with Leslie Sloane, Katie's agent, but she denied that and told people on Thursday it was 100% untrue. An agent for Sherlock Holmes denied that she and fox broke up... "
"Radar Online reported on Wednesday that the couple had announced their breakup, claiming that Katie and her ex husband Tom Cruise had a 12-year-old daughter, Suri, who initiated the breakup."



**Something goes wrong**
“Khloe spends as much time in Cleveland as possible and has spies in every city his team plays in.”HollywoodLifers, do you think Khloe will listen to Iggy?”
““But she can’t help but worry sometimes.”
““She loves Tristan wholeheartedly and he’s been nothing but a stand-up, loving man,” another source told HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
“In fact, we’re told Khloe’s hired some private eyes to keep tabs on her dude.”
“She’s hoping French gets to her before it’s too late.”As HollywoodLife.com previously reported, it’s really hard for KoKo to ignore the rumors that TT and his baby mama, Jordy Craig, are still hooking up.”
““She’s sticking to the girl code and would hate for Khloe to experience the same type of pain she did.”
“...her and then on top of that got his baby mama pregnant again the source continued...”
“Iggy explained to French that these basketball players are no joke and don t care whose heart they break in their quest to bang every girl that breathes Iggy still feels some type of way after Nick Young cheated on...”
“...serious heartbreak with him a source close to Iggy told HollywoodLife com EXCLUSIVELY”
“Iggy s not trying to be salty or hate on Tristan but she s hit up French Montana and told her he needs to put Khloe up on game and warn her that she s putting herself at risk for...”


"Khloe spent as much time in Cleveland as he could, and his team had spies in every city." Hollywood lifers, do you think Khloe will listen to Iggy? "
"But sometimes she can't help worrying."
"She loves Tristan with all her heart and soul, and he is just a brave and loving man," another source told reporters Exclusive to Hollywood life
"In fact, we heard that Khloe hired some private detectives to spy on her playboy."
"She wants French to reach her before it's too late." Hollywood life has previously reported that it is difficult for Koko to ignore the rumors that TT and his mother Jordy Craig are still dating. "
"She sticks to the girl's code and doesn't want Khloe to experience the same pain as she does."
“… She, and then, most importantly, get her mother pregnant again, and the source goes on... "
"Yiji explained to the French that these basketball players are not joking, they don't care whose heart, their pursuit has broken every girl's breath, Yiji still feels some kind of way after Nick Young derailed..."
“… With his heartbreak, a source close to Yiji exclusively told Hollywood life
"Ejie didn't try to disgust Tristan, but she went to Montana, France, told her that he needed Chloe to play, and warned her that she was putting herself in danger..."



Number  121
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Whilst their outfits were critiqued to the nth degree, eyebrows suffered less scrutiny.”
“However it’s likely that Champagne was not in short supply when Hollywood’s elite were getting ready for the biggest night of the year.”
“Tinting?”
“Threading?”
“Pencilling in?”
“Plucking the strays?”
“Or perhaps nothing at all?”
“Well if you’re an A-lister with the eyes of the world watching, it seems no length is too extreme to ensure your brows are perfect.”
“Australian eyebrow-artist to the stars Sharon-Lee Hamilton was flown from Sydney to Los Angeles to tend to a select few celebrities’ brows before the 2017 Oscars.”
“We previously reported that Leonardo DiCaprio was one member of the Hollywood elite who flew Hamilton the 7,500 across the Pacific Ocean, but we have since learnt that this was incorrect.”


"Although their clothing has received N-level criticism, their eyebrows have received less scrutiny."
"However, as Hollywood's elite prepare for the biggest night of the year, there may not be a shortage of champagne."
"Dyeing?"
"Threading?"
"Pencil?"
"Arrest the lost?"
"Or nothing?"
"Well, if you're a first-line star that the world is watching, then it seems that no length can guarantee that your eyebrows are perfect."
"Before the 2017 Academy Awards ceremony, Australian beauty artist Sharon Lee Hamilton flew from Sydney to Los Angeles to beautify the eyebrows of some celebrities."
"We previously reported that Leonardo DiCaprio was one of the Hollywood elites who flew the Hamilton 7500 over the Pacific, but later we learned that this was not true."



Number  122
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...president Adam Stotsky told Variety, “What I can tell you is, it’s a very effective, collaborative working relationship that we have with them that we’re looking forward to continuing for the foreseeable future.””
“Speaking to Variety about the “KUWTK” 10-year anniversary recently, Kris Jenner admitted she has never had a discussion about ending the show, saying, “I think the show is an amazing foundation for everything else we do.”Last month, E!”
“The new extension was first reported by The Blast, though the site reports the Kardashians re-signed through 2019 for a whopping $150 million — our source says that number is far off, and says the family has actually renewed through 2020.”
“...last renewed the Kardashian family’s contract in February 2015.”
“We look forward to continuing our collaboration for years to come.”E!”
“...family.”
““We are incredibly proud of our partnership with the Kardashians and they remain an important part of the E!”
“...spokesperson tells Variety.”
“We have aired 13 wildly successful seasons of the franchise as well as 11 spinoffs, and Season 14 is off to a strong start,” an E!”
““We recently celebrated the milestone 10th anniversary of ‘Keeping Up With the Kardashians’ on E!”


“…… President Adam Stotsky told variety, "what I can tell you is that we have a very effective relationship with them and we look forward to continuing that relationship for the foreseeable future."
Recently, referring to the 10th anniversary of kuwtk, Kris Jenner admitted that she had never discussed ending the show. "I think the show is an amazing foundation for everything we do," he said
"The new contract extension was first reported by the bombings, but the website reported that the kardashians have extended their contract to 2019 for as much as $150 million - our source said that the number is far away, and that the family has actually extended their contract to 2020."
“…… The last time the Kardashian family renewed their contract was in February 2015. "
"We look forward to continuing our cooperation in the next few years."! "
“… Family. "
"We are very proud of our cooperation with Kardashian, they are still an important part of E!"
“…… The spokesman told variety. "
"We've aired 13 very successful seasons and 11 derivatives, and Season 14 is a good start," said Ann E
"We recently celebrated the 10th anniversary of 'keep up with Kardashian' on e-show!"



Number  123
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A post shared by @marioncotillard on Mar 6, 2017 at 3:10pm PSTA post shared by @marioncotillard on Mar 6, 2017 at 3:11pm PSTThe Hollywood Reporter has reached out to Cotillard's reps for comment.”
“The successive posts tie Rihanna's record of 18 selfies in a 24-hour period, which the singer had posted in celebration of the Crop Over festival in her native Barbados in 2015.”
“Cotillard, who is expecting a baby with partner Guillaume Canet (who also directed Rock'n Roll), utilized Instagram's new photo gallery feature so as not to flood fans' feeds.”
“A post shared by @marioncotillard on Mar 6, 2017 at 3:05pm PSTThe actress posted — count 'em — 18 selfies to give her fans a glimpse of every possible angle of the look, including several which showed off her cleavage.”
“However, though Cotillard made it clear that the get-up was for a role, and not a personal choice, she appeared to be feeling it.”
“...of Rose McGowan and Angelina Jolie...”
“It was the 41 year old s plump lips which she noted were for her role in the film Rock n Roll which was released last month in France that had her fans buzzing with many drawing comparisons to Kylie Jenner s infamous pout as well as the full puckers...”
“Marion Cotillard, the French actress and Dior ambassador known for her demure and ladylike style, showed off a new, um, look on Instagram on Monday — complete with a dark wavy wig and full pout — that had us wondering if she had found a long-lost Kardashian kousin.”
“Who's that girl?”
“Marion Cotillard Shows Off 'Rock'n Roll' Movie Makeover With 18 SelfiesIf you've got it, flaunt it.”


"Post shared by @ Marion catlard at 3:10 p.m. on March 6, 2017 post shared by @ Marion catlard at 3:11 p.m. on March 6, 2017 Hollywood Reporter has contacted the representative of godia for comments."
"A series of Posts links Rihanna's 18 self portraits in 24 hours, which Rihanna released to celebrate the crop festival in her hometown Barbados in 2015."
Godia and her partner, Guillaume carnett (who also directs rock music), are pregnant with a child and are using instagram's new photo gallery feature to keep fans away
"At 3:05 p.m. on March 6, 2017, @ Marion catllard shared a post in which the actress posted 18 self portraits, showing her fans every possible angle, including several pictures showing her cleavage."
"However, although godia made it clear that she got up for a role, not a personal choice, she seemed to feel it."
“… About Ross McGovern and Angelina Jolie... "
"In the French film rock n roll released last month, Kylie Jenner's plump lips attracted many fans, who compared her with Kylie Jenner's infamous pouting and pouting..."
"Marion cotillad, a French actress and Dior Ambassador known for her elegant style, showed a new look on instagram on Monday - a dark wavy wig with a big pout - which makes us wonder if she has found a long lost Kardashian kousin."
"Who is that girl?"
"Marian godia uses 18 self made films to show the 'rock' n 'roll film makeover. If you have one, show it off."



Number  124
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE : Jennifer Lawrence is an ‘a**hole friend’ as she trolls Emma Stone during Oscars 2018MORE : Jennifer Lawrence climbs over Oscars seats with her wine glass and it’s relatable AF”
“If you've got a celebrity story, video or pictures get in touch with the Metro.co.uk entertainment team by emailing us celebtips@metro.co.uk, calling 020 3615 2145 or by visiting our Submit Stuff page - we'd love to hear from you.”
“It goes without saying that one can’t simply break up with someone in Hollywood without endless speculation that you’re back together, so here we go again with Jennifer Lawrence and ex-boyfriend, Nicholas Hoult.”
“For the fifty millionth time, it’s been rumoured that the pair could be ready to rekindle their romance, following their original split back in 2014 after three years together.”
“It s reported that Nicholas and Jennifer are said to be taking things slowly Picture Splash JLaw and her X Men co star Nicholas have remained good friends since their relationship came to an end which probably explains why they ve reportedly been spending an awful lot of time together...”
“...while Jen has been in the UK”
“A source told The Sun on Sunday newspaper that Jennifer’s British press tour for hew new movie Red Sparrow has given her the perfect excuse to reconnect with Nicholas again.”
“AdvertisementAdvertisement‘They spent an awful lot of time together but are taking things slowly,’ an insider claimed.”
“In between promoting her new movie Red Sparrow, JLaw has been linked to another big Hollywood name (Picture: REUTERS/Mario Anzuoni)‘Jennifer is not keen to rush back into another relationship as she hasn’t fully got over Darren [Aronofsky].”
“But pals reckon it s only a matter of time before they decide to give things another go as they have always remained close Jen must be pretty busy at the moment as this rekindling with Nick comes just as she s also been romantically linked to her Red Sparrow...”


"More information: Jennifer Lawrence had a great time with Emma stone at the 2018 Oscars. She is a" good friend. ". More information: it makes a lot of sense for Jennifer Lawrence to climb up to Oscar's seat with her glass
"If you have celebrity stories, videos or pictures, please email us with Metro entertainment team at: celebtips@metro.co.uk , please call 020 3615 2145 or visit our submission page - we are glad to hear from you. "
"It goes without saying that one can't simply break up with someone in Hollywood without endlessly guessing that you're back together, so let's take a look at Jennifer Lawrence and ex boyfriend Nicholas Holt."
"This is the 50 million times, and there are rumors that the two may be ready to rekindle their romance after they parted in 2014 after three years together."
"It's reported that Nicholas and Jennifer are slowly taking pictures. Sparsh Jero and her X-Men co star. Nicholas has been a good friend since the end of their relationship, which may explain why they have been together so long..."
"When Jane was in England"
"A source told the sun on Sunday that Jennifer had given her an excellent excuse to meet Nicholas again for the British press tour of the new film" red sparrow. "
"They've been together for a long time, but progress is slow," said one insider
"Jlaw and another big Hollywood star (photo source: Reuters / Mario anzuoni)" Jennifer is not in a hurry to go back to another relationship because she hasn't completely forgotten Aronofsky. "
"But friends think it's only a matter of time before they decide to start over, because they've always kept close relationship. Jane must be very busy now, because this resurgence with Nick happens to have a romantic relationship with her red sparrow..."



**Something goes wrong**
“Is there a chance we'll get to see a behind the scenes of the meeting on the next season of Keeping Up With the Kardashians?”
“Kardashian hasn't made a public statement about the meeting yet, aside from tweeting the birthday message for Alice Marie Johnson.”
“...pic twitter com rjUseCYQvL Dani Bostick danibostick May 30 2018 This book by richardhine was published in June 2016 https t co ebyLPgViWC Daniel Radosh danielradosh May 30 2018 Apparently prison reform hits home for Kushner who has firsthand experience with an incarcerated family member after his father Charles was...”
“It’s like Veep meets The Purge.” pic.twitter.com/3EO9V87vAL — Molly Jong-Fast (@MollyJongFast) May 30, 2018I present the 10th circle of Dante's Inferno— Donald Trump meeting with Kim Kardashian about prison reform.”
“And then, here’s the kicker we have Kim Kardashian play his sassy but still incompetent Chief of staff.”
“It’s a fish out of water story but get this, he’s the president and we have Donald Trump play him.”
“— Denizcan James (@MrFilmkritik) May 30, 2018“So, here’s the pitch.”
“We truly live in the darkest timeline.”
“If you would’ve told me five years ago Donald Trump would be POTUS and Kim Kardashian would be in the Oval Office discussing prison reform with him I would have called you insane.”
“Today is for you ✨ — Kim Kardashian West (@KimKardashian) May 30, 2018But people on Twitter just couldn't believe that this was actually happening.”


"Do we have a chance to see a behind the scenes game against Kardashian next season?"
"Kardashian has not made a public statement on the meeting other than her twitter message for Alice Mary Johnson."
“… Pic twitter com rjusecyqvl Dani Bostick danibostock May 30, 2018 richardhine's book was published in June 2016. It is obvious that prison reform has sounded the alarm for Kushner, who had first-hand experience with a imprisoned family member after his father Charles died... "
"It's like VIP's meeting purification." pic.twitter.com/3EO9V87vAL -Molly jongfast (@ Molly jongfast) on May 30, 2018, I introduced Dante's 10th lap of the meeting between Donald Trump and Kim Kardashian on prison reform
"Then, we'll play Kim Kardashian as his rude but still incompetent chief of staff."
"It's a natural story, but I see. He's the president, and we'll let Donald Trump play him."
"- denizcan James (@ Mr filmkritik) May 30, 2018" so this is the stadium
"We really live in the darkest time line."
"If you told me five years ago that Donald Trump would be Portus and that Kim Kardashian would be in the Oval Office discussing prison reform with him, I would say you're crazy."
"Today is for you ✨  -Kim Kardashian West (@ Kim Kardashian) May 30, 2018, but people on twitter can't believe it really happened. "



**Something goes wrong**
“We have a suspicion that there's more than meets the eye when it comes to Kate Middleton and Meghan Markle's relationship.”
“Let's take a closer look at the royal women's bond, and figure out the truth about how these two duchesses really feel about one another.”
“After all, it's not exactly common to forge a friendship while leading lives in the spotlight and keeping up with royal traditions.”
“But how close are they really?”
“...royal events together and grown their respective families...”
“However Middleton and Markle had started getting to know one another back during the days of Markle and Harry s headline making engagement and they ve no doubt only continued to learn more about one another as they ve attended...”
“...to Prince William out of recent memory...”
“The Truth About Kate Middleton And Meghan Markle s Relationship Kate Middleton and Meghan Markle became sisters in law when the former Hollywood actress tied the knot with Prince Harry on May 19 2018 effectively bumping Middleton s 2011 wedding...”


"We suspect that there are different views on the relationship between Kate Middleton and Megan markel."
"Let's take a closer look at the ties between royal women and find out how the two Duchess really feel about each other."
"After all, living in the spotlight and keeping up with the royal tradition, building friendships is not common."
"But how close are they?"
“… The grand events of the royal family develop their respective families together... "
"However, Middleton and mark began to get to know each other on the day of mark and Harry's engagement. There is no doubt that they just continued to get to know each other when they joined..."
“… For the memory of Prince William... "
"The truth of the relationship between Kate Middleton and Megan markel Kate Middleton and Megan markel married Prince Harry on May 19, 2018, which has a strong impact on Middleton's wedding in 2011..."



Number  127
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Why can’t people accept the fact that these two people simply want to stay married to one another and let them live their lives?””
“Capisce.”“What’s the matter with two women sitting together and shooting the breeze,” Teresa continued.”
“Following fan speculation that the Real Housewives of New Jersey star, 45, was planning to split from husband Joe Giudice after she posted an Instagram photo with a divorce attorney, Teresa clarified that she was simply at dinner with a friend.”
“As previously reported, Teresa posted a photo to Instagram on Saturday, January 6, posing with New Jersey attorney Loren La Forge-Kyriakoulis.”
“The reality star originally captioned the photo Dinner with a great friend getting great advice before quickly changing it to Dinner with a great friend lots of laughs with the hashtag webothlovefood During Teresa s Wednesday January 10 appearance with sister in law Melissa Gorga on Watch What Happens Live...”
“With Andy Cohen a fan called in to ask Teresa if the photo indicated she and Joe were on the rocks which Teresa vehemently denied...”
““I was helping her.”
“Just in case – If anybody’s getting divorced, she’s a great divorce attorney to call,” she explained.”
““Get it?”
“I was helping her.”Gorga, 38, chimed in, “Oh, you’re saying you were publicizing her,” to which Teresa said, “Yes!”


"Why can't people accept the fact that these two people just want to stay married and let them live their own lives?"
"Kapis." "Two women sitting together chatting. What's the matter?" Teresa continued
"Fans speculated that the 45 year old New Jersey star's real housewife was planning to break up with her husband, Joe Judith, after taking a picture with a divorce lawyer on instagram. Theresa clarified that she was just having dinner with a friend."
"As mentioned earlier, Theresa posted a photo on instagram on January 6 (Saturday) with New Jersey attorney Loren Lafarge kiriakulis."
"The original title of the reality show star was a picture of dinner with a good friend, which was well advised. Then it was quickly changed to dinner with a good friend. Theresa made a lot of laughter with the label webothlovefood while watching what happened with her sister-in-law Melissa Gorga on Wednesday, January 10..."
"With Andy Cohen, a fan called to ask Theresa if the photo showed her and Joe on the rock. Theresa firmly denied that..."
"I'm helping her."
"Just in case - if someone wants a divorce, she's a good divorce lawyer," she explained
"Do you understand?"
"I'm helping her." Gorga, 38, echoed, "Oh, you mean you're promoting her," Teresa replied, "yes!"



Number  128
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE : Justin Bieber would love to marry Hailey Baldwin in a ‘small and intimate Canadian wedding’MORE : Which other celebrities attend Justin Bieber and Hailey Baldwin’s Hillsong churches?”
“He wrote: ‘Was gonna wait a while to say anything but word travels fast, listen plain and simple Hailey I am soooo in love with everything about you!”
“But it seems that Selena Gomez isn’t the slightest bit on the back foot when it comes to Justin Bieber’s engagement, as the star was in very high spirits as the news started to circulate.”
“While her ex was enjoying a romantic holiday with Hailey Baldwin, who was flashing a huge sparkler on her hand, the 25-year-old singer and actress was enjoying a break with friends and Caleb at a country cabin.”
“Having taken a break from the hustle and bustle of her day-to-day life, Selena looked to be absolutely loving life as she left the cabin in Upstate New York alongside the influencer (who is the younger brother of her pal Raquelle).”
“The 25 year old singer and actress didn t seem to have a care in the world as she went for a low key look in Upstate New York Picture TheImageDirect com Leaving the cabin Selena rocked a low key and comfy look sporting a band tee and track pants...”
“...complete with comfy slippers...”
“AdvertisementAdvertisementSipping on an iced drink as she headed to an SUV, the Back To You singer couldn’t help but smile – something which was emphasized by her tied back hair.”
“Caleb – who graduated high school last year and is thought to be 18-year-old – similarly went for a relaxed look, sporting shorts and a tee.”
“Despite being linked after a number of sightings together by eagle eyed fans romance rumours have been squashed with one adamant source telling Metro co uk They re just friends nothing else Caleb is the brother of her pal Raquelle though just last week a source refuted rumours of romance...”


"More: Justin Bieber wants to have a" small and intimate Canadian wedding "with Haley Baldwin. More: who else attended Justin Bieber and Haley Baldwin's folk song church? "
He wrote: "I had to wait for a while to talk about something, but the words spread too fast. Listen to the simple Haley, I love you so much!"
"But when it comes to Justin Bieber's engagement, Serena Gomez doesn't seem to be complacent at all, because as the news spreads, the star's mood is very high."
"The 25-year-old singer and actress was relaxing with friends and Kaleb at the country house while her ex boyfriend and Hailey Baldwin were enjoying a romantic holiday with a huge spark on their hands."
"Serena, freed from her busy daily life, left her cabin in upstate New York and left with the influencer (her friend, l'aquill's brother), she seemed absolutely in love with life."
"The 25-year-old singer and actress doesn't seem to care about the world as she leaves the cabin in a low-key exterior picture of the imagedirect com in upstate New York. Selena shakes a low-key and comfortable exterior sport, a band T-shirt and sweatpants..."
“… With comfortable slippers... "
"When she walks up to an SUV, sipping an iced drink, she can't help laughing with her back to your singer - which is emphasized in her tied hair."
Caleb graduated from high school last year and is 18 years old. He also likes relaxed styling, shorts and T-shirts
"Although rumors of romance have been linked after many eyewitness incidents by sharp eyed fans, a firm source told Metro co UK that they are just friends, nothing else. Caleb is the brother of her friend Raquelle, although just last week, a source refuted the rumors of romance..."



Number  129
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“I think she’ll fight for it.””
“Jennifer, who’s endured three failed marriages, “was heartbroken to hear that Alex was talking to Lauren,” says the insider.”
“Within hours of each other on Jan 24 the former Yankee slugger posted a photo of a cryptic quote There s nothing wrong with making a mistake what s wrong is not making the effort to make it right and the Shades of Blue star shared a photo of a...”
“...gigantic bouquet of flowers Alex had sent her...”
“The next day, she uploaded a selfie and captioned the photo, “It’s all in God’s hands always,” along with the hashtag #letgoandletgod.”
“According to an insider, “That was aimed directly at Alex.”Hollywood’s hottest duo is on the verge of flaming out.”
“Jennifer 48 is privately questioning her relationship with her boyfriend of nearly a year after learning he s still in touch with former fling Lauren Hunter a fitness model who last year claimed in an interview that Alex 42 had been sexting her for months including while he was dating...”
“J Lo...”
“Recently, “someone went to Jennifer with new details that Alex was still texting with Lauren, and that’s what made Jennifer lose it,” the insider tells In Touch.”
““Of course, he said it wasn’t physical, and maybe it wasn’t, but in Jennifer’s book, that’s still cheating.”


"I think she will fight for it."
"Jennifer has been through three failed marriages and is sad to hear Alex talking to Lauren," the person said
"On January 24, the former Yankees batter posted a picture in a few hours with a mysterious quote on it. There is nothing wrong with making a mistake. The mistake is not to try to correct it. The shadow of blue star shared a picture with a
“…… Alex gave her a big bunch of flowers... "
The next day, she uploaded a self portrait with the title "everything is in God's hands" and the label "let go and let God"
"It's directed at Alex," according to one person familiar with the matter Hollywood's hottest duet is on the verge of a hit
"On the 48th, Jennifer privately questioned her relationship with her boyfriend who has been dating for nearly a year. She learned that her boyfriend is still in contact with former flying Lauren hunter, a fitness model. In an interview last year, she said that Alex 42 had sent her sex messages for several months, including during dating..."
"Jerome..."
"Recently," someone revealed some new details to Jennifer, saying that Alex is still texting Lauren, and that's why she lost contact, "a person familiar with the matter told contact
"Of course, he says it's not physical, maybe not, but in Jennifer's book, it's still cheating."



Number  130
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Emotionally, it’s been a very difficult year.””
““Sometimes maybe it appears I am pulling it together, but really, I am just trying to get through my days,” she disclosed.”
“Despite reports, a source tells Us Weekly that Angelina Jolie is not off the market.”
““Angie isn’t dating a real estate agent.”
“She isn’t even dating at the moment,” the insider reveals.”
““Yes, she has hung out with a couple of guys over the last year, but it’s extremely low-key.”The Salt actress, 42, and estranged husband Brad Pitt officially called it quits in September 2016 after more than 10 years together and two years of marriage.”
“They are parents to Maddox, 16, Pax, 14, Zahara, 13, Shiloh, 11, and twins Vivienne and Knox, 9.”
““The divorce talks between Brad and Angie are ongoing,” the source adds, noting that Pitt, 54, is lonesome for their children, who live with their mom.”
““Brad wishes the kids would spend overnights at his house, but he is hopeful that over time, that will organically happen.”The Tomb Raider star and Pitt much of their marriage on the move, raising their family in various cities.”
“But since their split, Jolie and the kids have remained in L.A. “Angie is frustrated that Los Angeles has become the home base for the family,” the source says.”


"Emotionally, it's been a very difficult year."
"Sometimes, I seem to cheer up, but in fact, I'm just trying to get through my day," she revealed
"Despite the reports, a source told us weekly that Angelina Jolie was not delisted."
"Angie didn't date a real estate agent."
"She doesn't even have a date right now," the person familiar with the matter said
"Yes, she has dated several men in the past year, but it's very low-key." The 42 year old salt star and her separated husband Brad Pitt, who have been together for more than 10 years, officially broke up in September 2016 after two years of marriage
"They are the parents of 16-year-old Maddox, 14-year-old parks, 13-year-old Zahara, 11 year-old Shiloh and 9-year-old twins Vivian and Knox."
"Divorce negotiations between Brad and Angie are ongoing," the source added, adding that Pete, 54, is a lonely child who lives with their mother
"Brad wants the kids to spend the night at his house, but he wants it to happen organically over time." Most of the marriages between Tomb Raider star and Pete are moving, supporting their families in different cities
"But since they broke up, Julie and the kids have stayed in Los Angeles." "Angie is frustrated that Los Angeles has become a base for their family," the source said



Number  131
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Let us know here!”
“HollywoodLifers, what did you think of Scarlett’s speech about James?”
“In addition to Scarlett, high profile actresses such as Natalie Portman, 36, Eva Longoria, 42, and Alyssa Milano, 45, spoke out about their own personal stories at the Women’s March in LA and Atlanta.”
“Only time will tell with this situation but one thing remains in tact: women in the entertainment industry and beyond are fighting back hard to stand up for what they believe in!”
“James knows what’s in his heart, and he knows that he’s a good person.”With James claiming to have his own story about his past, there’s been high anticipation about where the accusations toward him will lead.”
““He’s a big supporter of the movement, and he’s really happy that women are finally being given a voice—if he has to take a hit, for something he swears he hasn’t done, then so be it.”
““James was horrified that he was branded as some kind of sexual aggressor—as far as he’s concerned that couldn’t be further from the truth,” the source continued.”
“Despite the claims, James has been supporting the Time’s Up movement and doesn’t want to be stereotyped from the recent headlines about him.”
“Check out some of the best pics from the 2018 Women’s March here!”
“...actor of alleged sexual misconduct since Ally Sheedy cryptically tweeted about him during the 2018 Golden Globe Awards he has denied the accusations...”


"Let us know here!"
"Miss Hollywood, what do you think of Scarlett's speech about James?"
"In addition to Scarlett, famous actresses such as 36 year old Natalie Portman, 42 year old Eva Longoria and 45 year old Alisa Milano also talked about their personal stories at the women's parades in Los Angeles and Atlanta."
"Only time can prove this, but one thing is commonplace: women inside and outside the entertainment industry are fighting back to defend their beliefs!"
"James knows what he's thinking. He knows he's a good man." As James claims to have his own story about his past, people place high hopes on where the charges against him will go
"He's a big supporter of this movement. He's really happy that if he has to do something, women will finally have a say, because he swears that what he hasn't done, let it be."
"James was branded as some kind of sex offender, which shocked him because he was worried that it didn't match the facts," the source continued
"Despite these claims, James has always supported time's upward movement and doesn't want to be stereotyped from recent headlines."
"Check out some of the best photos of the women's parade in 2018 here!"
“… The actor is suspected of sexual misconduct, and he has denied the charges since alihidi secretly mentioned him on twitter during the 2018 Golden Globe Awards... "



Number  132
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“— Lin-Manuel Miranda (@Lin_Manuel) January 1, 2017Click inside to read what lots of other celebs are saying in their messages…”
“Let's make new things.”
“I feel so lucky to have you in my life.”
“— Chris Evans (@ChrisEvans) December 31, 2016 Before #OldManMiranda falls asleep:Happy new year.”
“It's what unites us.”
“I know 2016 was full of ups and downs, but remember that underneath it all, love is our constant.”
“Happy New Years Eve!!”
“Read what celebs are saying to their fans in the posts below!”
“In some of their messages, stars like Khloe Kardashian included their “Instagram Best Nine” collage to look back at their awesome memories from the past year.”
“After all of the awful things that happened in 2016, everyone is hoping that 2017 will be a better year for everyone.”


"- Lin Manuel Miranda (@ Lin / u Manuel) on January 1, 2017, click" inside "to read what other celebrities said in their comments..."
"Let's create new things."
"I feel lucky to have you in my life."
"- Chris Evans (@ Chris Evans) falls asleep in front of Alderman Miranda falls on December 31, 2016: Happy New Year" one year. "
"It unites us."
"I know 2016 is full of ups and downs, but remember that behind all this, love is our constant."
"Happy New Year's Eve!"
"Look at what celebrities say to fans in the following post!"
"In some of their messages, stars like Khloe Kardashian put together their 'instagram best nine' collage to look back on their memories of the past year."
"After all the terrible things that happened in 2016, everyone hopes that 2017 will be a better year for everyone."



Number  133
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There were 500 girls that tried out!’ and I’ll send him videos.”Gwen Stefani’s upcoming Las Vegas residency, Just a Girl, begins June 27 at the Zappos Theater at Planet Hollywood Resort & Casino.”
“But it isn’t realistic.”“The Hollaback” girl confessed her career is winding down following the release of This Is What the Truth Feels Like in 2016, her first album in 10 years.”
“I ve always looked up to her Lopez in the sense that we re exactly the same age and I remember when No Doubt was first coming out and she hadn t done Jenny from The Block yet but she...”
“Two such names are Jennifer Lopez and Stefani’s boyfriend Blake Shelton.”
“...inspire and make her better...”
“It s going to be a way to express myself and do my whole catalogue of the music that defines every time period in my life all the crises and all the joys Stefani also dished on the artists that...”
““It’s perfect for me to be able to do a Vegas show because not only does it work for me as a mom, but it also works creatively.”
“...said...”
“RELATED Gwen Stefani Reveals Fun Fact About Blake Shelton s Ex Girlfriend I m obviously at the end of my journey of being a musician because of my age and I ve been doing it for thirty something years she...”
“It was so much fun for them, they loved it.”


"500 girls have tried! Gwen Stefani, a girl, will begin her internship in Las Vegas on June 27 at the Zappos theater at Planet Hollywood Resort & Casino
"But it's not realistic." "Hollaback" girl admits that her career is going downhill after the release of "this is the truth" in 2016, her first album in 10 years
"I've always respected her Lopez, because we are all of the same age. I remember there's no doubt that when she first came out, she didn't kill Jennie from the street, but she..."
"Two such names are Jennifer Lopez and Stephanie's boyfriend black Sheldon."
“… Inspire her, make her better... "
"It's going to be a way to express myself and complete all my music catalogues, which define every period of my life, all the crises and all the joys, Stefani also said to the artists..."
"It's perfect for me to be able to do a show in Vegas, because it's not only effective for my mother, but also very creative."
“… Say... "
"Gwen Stephanie revealed the interesting facts about Blake Sheldon's ex girlfriend. Obviously, because of my age, my music career has come to an end. I've been doing it for more than 30 years. She..."
"It's so interesting for them, they love it."



Number  134
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Harry is sporting a beard, despite reports he might shave it off in line with Army rules that ban facial hair, but as he is no longer a serving member of the forces, he is allowed to break with convention.”
“The uniforms are tailored at Dege & Skinner on Saville Row, and they also received permission from the Queen to wear their Army uniforms to the ceremony.”
“Both Princes are wearing black and gold uniforms of the Blues and Royals, similar to Harry’s outfit for William’s wedding to Kate Middleton in 2011.”
“...uniform wasn t the ideal fit...”
“The Prince was in relaxed mood as he said I m alright in a heartwarming exchange with his 35 year old brother as they entered the church who joked my trousers are too tight as he complained that his military...”
“Harry, 33, received loud cheers and a rapturous applause from the thousands of people outside St George’s Chapel in Windsor in the run up to his vows to Meghan.”
“Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”


"Harry has a beard, and although it has been reported that he may shave his beard in accordance with the army's ban on facial hair, he is allowed to break the rules because he is no longer in active service in the army."
The uniforms were custom-made at dege & Skinner in Saville street, and they were given permission from the queen to wear military uniforms for the wedding
"Both princes are wearing blue and Royal Black and gold uniforms, similar to Harry's at the 2011 wedding of Prince William and Kate Middleton."
“… The uniform is not the most suitable... "
"The prince was in a relaxed mood. He said I was OK. When his 35 year old brother walked into the church, he had a warm exchange with him. He joked that my trousers were too tight because he complained about his army..."
Harry, 33, received thousands of cheers and applause outside St. George's Church in Windsor before swearing in to Megan
"Sign up now and don't miss the top Royal stories any more."
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"Our privacy statement explains in detail how we use your data and your rights."
"Sometimes it includes suggestions for other relevant newsletters or services we provide."



Number  135
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““She’s really putting in a great performance!””
““She’s desperate to do the best job for Bradley — and her naysayers,” said the source.”
“And co-starring with three-time Oscar nominee Bradley Cooper brings added pressure.”
“The 31-year-old Gaga was mortified by her flabby belly at the Super Bowl.”
““Twice a week she survives solely on shots of cider vinegar — she’s basically starving herself.”Lady Gaga Caught In 3-Way Lesbian Romp!”
““Gaga’s determined to look her slimmest and strongest for this movie — so she’s trying all kinds of weird diet tricks,” the insider said.”
“A set spy told The National ENQUIRER the pop singer has made it clear she wants to be taken seriously as an actress.”
“Lady Gaga has found a most distasteful way to lose weight for her leading role in “A Star Is Born” — drinking apple cider vinegar to suppress her appetite!”


"What a wonderful performance she did!"
"She is eager to do the best for Bradley and her opponents," the source said
"Co starring with three time Oscar nominee Bradley Cooper also brought extra pressure."
"Gaga, 31, was embarrassed by her loose stomach in the super bowl
"Twice a week, she lives on apple vinegar - she's basically starving herself." Lady Gaga is in the middle of three lesbian parties! "
"Gaga is determined to look the slimiest and strongest in the movie - so she's trying all sorts of strange ways to lose weight," the person familiar with the matter said
"A set spy told the national inquirer that the pop singer has made it clear that she wants to be valued as an actress."
"Lady Gaga has found one of the most annoying ways to lose weight for her protagonist in" the birth of a star "- drinking apple vinegar to suppress her appetite!"



Number  136
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Tell us your opinions in the comments below!”
“HollywoodLifers, what do you think about Gwen’s feelings for Blake?”
“Their chemistry throughout the song is equal to if not stronger than their chemistry off-stage and we can’t get enough!”
“One memorable appearance the two had on the show happened recently when they teamed up together to sing the song “You Make it Feel Like Christmas,” a song off Gwen’s new Christmas album.”
“They’ve seen each other through ups and downs on the show and it’s certainly been a bonding experience!”
“The couple have been going strong for as long as we can remember and it’s no surprise Gwen feels the way she does about Blake and The Voice considering that’s where the duo got to know each other.”
“Gwen’s sentiments come at a time when Blake reportedly feels the same about his lady love and can’t wait to spend the holidays with her.”
“However, win or lose, Gwen is planning to indulge Blake with a romantic surprise after the show and spoil him in the bedroom.” Check out some of the sweetest photos of Gwen and Blake here!”
“Gwen has seen the countless hours Blake has dedicated to helping his artists and she feels confident that he will win yet again.”
““She feels confident in his chances of winning yet again this season.”


"Please let us know what you think in the comments below!"
"Hollywood stars, what do you think of Gwen's feelings for black?"
"If their chemical reaction in the whole song is not stronger than that in the stage, it's their chemical reaction. We can't get enough!"
"An unforgettable performance of the two took place recently. They jointly sang the song" you make it feel like Christmas "from Gwen's new Christmas album
"They went through ups and downs in the program, which is undoubtedly a close experience!"
"As far as we know, the couple have always had a good relationship, and Gwen's view of Blake and her voice is not surprising, because this is where they know each other."
"It's reported that Gwen's mood comes when Blake feels the same way about his lover and can't wait to spend a holiday with her."
"Win or lose, Gwen plans to give Blake a romantic surprise after the show and spoil him in his bedroom." Look at some of Gwen and black's sweetest photos
"Gwen has witnessed Blake's countless hours of dedicated efforts to help his artists, and she believes he will win again."
"She is confident that he will win again this season



Number  137
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“The babies are expected to be okay as well.”
“One source told us Beyonce also remains at the hospital, but as far as we know she's okay.”
“We do not know the nature of the issue.”
“We're told a "minor issue" surfaced, and as a result ... doctors do not feel comfortable releasing them.”
“Sources connected with the family tell us the twins were born Tuesday in a Los Angeles hospital.”
“Twins Still in the Hospital with 'Minor Issue'EXCLUSIVEBeyonce has given birth to a boy and a girl, but an issue surfaced that has kept them in the hospital for nearly a week ... TMZ has confirmed.”


"The children are expected to be OK, too."
"A source told us that Beyonce is still in the hospital, but as far as we know, she is OK."
"We don't know the nature of the problem."
"We were told that a" little problem "came to the surface and... The doctors are not willing to release them. "
"Sources related to the family told us that the twins were born in a Los Angeles hospital on Tuesday."
"The twins are still in the hospital with only 'minor problems'. Everyone gave birth to a man and a woman, but a problem came to the surface and left them in hospital for nearly a week... TMZ has confirmed. "



Number  138
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Most were loving Chicago's little scowl as she looked at the camera with a single curl of hair sticking out the top of her head.”
“"Wait she is the first to have a middle name and its your middle name omg so dope love it," observed one.”
“Some loyal fans even noticed the special meaning behind it.”
“(Image: Splash News)"Chi Noel," she captioned a selfie of them on Instagram, prompting one to reply, "she has your name as a middle name so cute!"”
“Earlier this week the reality star revealed Chicago's secret middle name.”
“(Image: Instagram) (Image: kimkardashian/Instagram)After keeping her third baby, who was born via a surrogate in January this year, away from social media, Kim has recently been sharing moments from their private family life.”
“He also says that his name is 'Dash' and he calls Kim 'Elastagirl,' from the Incredibles movies.”
“In the third clip, Kim revealed the nickname Saint already has for Chicago as he called her 'Jack Jack.'”
“(Image: Instagram) (Image: Instagram) (Image: Instagram)Next Saint wrapped his arms around his little sis and kissed her on the cheek.”
“In the first video, Chi, as she's affectionately called, sat on Kim's knee as the photogenic pair for the camera.”


"Most people like the little sad look in Chicago because she looks at the camera and has a lock of hair on her head."
"Wait a minute, she's the first person to have a middle name. That's your middle name, my God, so idiots like it," one said
"Some loyal fans have even noticed the special meaning behind it."
"(image: splash News)" Chi Noel, "she added a title to their self portrait on instagram, prompting one of them to reply," she uses your name as the middle name. It's so cute! "
"Earlier this week, reality TV stars revealed Chicago's Secret middle name."
"(photo source: instagram) (photo source: kimkardishian / instagram) Kim has recently been sharing moments of their private family life since her third child, born through a surrogate mother, was away from social media in January."
"He also said his name was" dash, "and he called" elastagirl, "the gold in the incredible movie."
"In the third clip, Kim reveals that the saint already has the nickname of Chicago. He calls her" Jack. "
"(instagram) (instagram) (instagram) next, the saint puts his arms around his little sister and kisses her on the cheek."
"In the first video, she, affectionately known as Chi, sits on Kim's knee as her camera partner."



Number  139
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“—With files from the Associated Press...”
“If he violates these terms, he faces jail time.”
“Julius Sandrock, 38, was wearing a mask and had a knife in his car when he was arrested outside of the home.”
“He was released from custody on Tuesday while police continued their investigation.”
“READ MORE: Man arrested for trespassing at Taylor Swift’s mansionPolice obtained a temporary restraining order preventing Sandrock from possessing guns.”
“According to the document, Sandrock was wearing a mask and rubber gloves when he was taken into custody.”
“He told police he had driven from his home in Broomfield, Colo., to see Swift.”
“He told the officers he owned three handguns and was on probation in Colorado for firing one, police said.”
“Story continues below advertisementREAD MORE: YouTube hack hits popular music videos, deletes ‘Despacito’ video with over 5 billion viewsA search of his car turned up a knife, rope, ammunition and more masks and gloves, according to the restraining order.”
“According to the document, prescription medications, including oxycodone, were also found, and Sandrock told the arresting officers that he had depression, bipolar disorder, obsessive-compulsive disorder and manic episodes.”


"- file from the Associated Press..."
"If he violates these terms, he will face imprisonment."
"Julius sandrock, 38, was arrested in front of his home wearing a mask and a knife in his car."
"He was released on Tuesday while the police continued their investigation."
"Introduction: a man arrested for breaking into Taylor Swift's apartment has been given a temporary injunction against sandrock from holding a gun."
"According to the documents, sandrock was detained wearing a mask and rubber gloves."
"He told the police he was driving to see swift from his home in Bloomfield, Colorado."
"He told police he had three pistols and was suspended in Colorado for firing one," police said
"The story continues to read more in the following ads: YouTube hackers click on pop music videos, delete 'despacito' videos, and more than 5 billion people search his car to find a knife, rope, ammunition and more masks and gloves, according to the restraining order."
"Prescription drugs, including oxycodone, were also found according to the documents, and sandrock told the arresting officers that he had depression, bipolar disorder, obsessive-compulsive disorder and manic episodes."



Number  140
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“"I mean I've joked a lot that I could be my sisters' manager better than my mom could be," Kim says.”
“Kris explains that she's working on a date for Kylie Jenner to fly to Australia for an event and Kim agrees to take over.”
“Kim asks.”
“"Do you want help with something?"”
“"I'm just tired," Kris tells Kim in the clip above.”
“On this Sunday's Keeping Up With the Kardashians, Kim is ready to take over as her sisters' manager for Kris, who is "exhausted" and not feeling well.”
“Watch : Kim Kardashian West Is a Manager in the MakingKim Kardashian wants Kris Jenner's 10 percent!”


"I mean, I made a lot of jokes that I could do better than my mom and be my sister's manager," Kim said
"Chris explained that she was arranging an appointment for Kylie Jenner to fly to Australia for the event, and Kim agreed to take over."
"Asked Kim
"Can I help you?"
"I'm just tired," Chris told Kim in the clip above
"Kim is ready to take over the management of his sisters in Sunday's game against the kardashians because Chris is" exhausted "and out of shape
"Watch: Kim Kardashian West is a manager who wants 10% of Chris Jenner!"



**Something goes wrong**
“Well, the more hopeful among us wanted to believe they truly had a shot at remaining real friends.”
“In reference to their decade-long romance?”
“But in a post-conscious uncoupling world when delivered by Anna Faris and Chris Pratt, the living embodiment of #goals thanks to their sweet selfies and general likability?”
“Nor are we super eager to commit to spending more time with an ex and having the reminder of what we once had staring us in the face.”
“Perhaps because for most of us, when we end any sort of romantic entanglement we're not feeling quite so charitable or entirely all that ready to praise the person that's left us feeling gutted.”
“But each time they come across as just a wee bit hollow.”
“Those carefully chosen words—or the other similar sentiments that tend to make up the celebrity breakup statement—have been used before and will be used again.”
“"We still have love for each other, will always cherish our time together and continue to have the deepest respect for one another."”


"Well, the more hopeful of us want to believe that they really have a chance to make real friends."
"About their ten-year relationship?"
"But in a post consciousness uncoupled world, when Anna Faris and Chris Pratt give speeches, their sweet selves and universal likability are the living incarnations of" goal "
"We're not in a hurry to commit to spending more time with ex girlfriends to remind them of what we used to be."
"Maybe it's because for most of us, when we end any form of romance, we don't feel so kind, or completely unprepared to praise the person who makes us feel frustrated."
"But every time they feel a bit empty."
"Well chosen words or other similar emotions often make up celebrity breakup statements that have been used before and will be used later."
"We still love each other, will always cherish our time together, and continue to have the deepest respect for each other."



Number  142
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“HollywoodLifers, do you think Nicki is really pregnant?”
“HollywoodLife.com reached out to reps for Nicki & Nas and they have not responded.”
“A new report claims that Nicki Minaj is pregnant and Nas is the father!”
“Whoa!”
“Nicki Minaj isn’t a stranger to pregnancy rumors, but this new report by Media Takeout is claiming the “Anaconda” rapper is definitely expecting this time around!”
“According to the site, “[Nicki] found out she was pregnant during Thanksgiving and supposedly she’s supposed to announce her bundle of joy around the Grammys.” They added that Nas, Nicki’s current beau, is the father, but pointed out that there may be trouble in paradise.”
“While Nicki s been quieter than usual on social media since breaking the internet with her Paper Magazine cover she tweeted Have you ever noticed how confused people act when you start treating them EXACTLY how they ve been treating you MTO s report says this is a direct reference...”
“...to Nas being stubborn and moody...”
“Hmm!”
“They also claim that Nas told his ex Kelis that he and Nicki were expecting and Kelis is jealous about not being Nas ONLY baby s mother so she s messing with their custody arrangement This report claiming Nicki is pregnant comes just a month and a half after she...”


"Holly bug, do you think Nicky is really pregnant?"
"Hollywood Life contacted representatives of Nicki & NAS, but they didn't respond."
"A new report claims that Nikki Minagi is pregnant and that NASS is his father!"
"Wow
"Nicky Minagi is no stranger to the rumor of pregnancy, but the new media report on takeout claims that the python rapper must be looking forward to it this time!"
"According to the website," Nicky found out she was pregnant during Thanksgiving and should have announced her happiness at the Grammy Awards. " They added that Nikki's current boyfriend, NASS, is a father, but pointed out that there might be trouble in heaven. "
"Since breaking the Internet with paper magazine covers, Niki has been much quieter than usual on social media. She tweeted," have you noticed how confused people's behaviors are when you start to treat them accurately, and how they have been treating you all the time? MTO reports that this is a direct reference... "
“… For those who are stubborn and moody... "
"Well!"
"They also claim that NAS told his former Kelis that he and Nicki were pregnant, and Kelis was not the only mother of NAS's baby, so she disrupted their custody arrangements. The report, which claims Nicki is pregnant, was released one and a half months after she was pregnant... "



Number  143
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“If this song is any indication of what to expect from Selena’s upcoming album, we’re in for a treat!”
“The song is rumored to be about Justin and with lyrics such as, “I wanna hold you when I’m not supposed to” and “I know I’d go back to you”, we can see why!”
“The talented singer recently made headlines for releasing the official music video for her song “Back to You” from the season 2 soundtrack of 13 Reasons Why.”
“If any of her past albums are an indication, we’re sure Selena will opt to open up about her rough moments to help inspire her fans and we’re all for it!”
“We can’t help but wonder if her experience with that will be included on the album as well.”
“She is anxious to get the album released and hopes for fans to hear it as soon as possible.”In addition to Selena’s dating situations, she of course went through her lifesaving kidney surgery after a struggle with lupus.”
“She will Include some subtle, and some more obvious, references to both Justin and The Weeknd.”
“She has been working hard on the album, writing everything from the heart, and alludes to everything and everyone in her life.”
“She loves all of her new songs, and can’t wait for her fans to hear her new music.”
““She had hoped it would have been out by now, but she is constantly reworking tracks and adding new music and collabs, so it may not be ready to drop until the fall.”


"If this song shows what Selena's upcoming album is looking forward to, let's treat it!"
It's rumored that this song is about Justin. The lyrics are "I want to hold you when I shouldn't" and "I know I'll come back to you". We know why! "
The talented singer recently made headlines with the release of the official music video of the soundtrack "back to you" for the second season of "Thirteen reasons."
"If her past album is a sign, we believe Serena will choose to open her hard times to help motivate her fans, and we all support it!"
"We can't help wondering if her experience will be included in the album as well."
"She's eager to release an album, hoping fans can hear it as soon as possible." in addition to Serena's date, she also experienced life-saving kidney surgery after fighting against lupus
"She will include some subtle, more obvious, references to Justin and the weekend."
"She has been working hard to create albums, writing down everything from her heart and alluding to everything and everyone in her life."
"She loves all her new songs and can't wait for her fans to hear her new songs."
"She had hoped it would be out by now, but she has been revising the repertoire, adding new music and cooperation, so it may not be available until autumn."



Number  144
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“[h/t:BuzzFeed]”
“Are you kidding me?”
“The cast of the teen drama recently reunited to celebrate the show's 20th anniversary for a special edition of Entertainment Weekly.”
“After reviewing the flawless photoshoot one thing stood out: Katie Holmes and Joshua Jackson looking truly, madly, and deeply in love.”
“Holmes and Jackson played Joey and Pacey, respectively, one of the show's greatest ships, so to see them lovingly touching each other like time had damn near frozen in 2003 was A LOT to handle.”
“Perceptive fans immediately picked up on the chemistry between the two actors and it was as if the rest of the cast wasn't even there.”
“I still love them  #DawsonsCreekShe's touching him  pic.twitter.com/YQVpx1pIth — Erica ღ (@Swish_AndFlick) March 28, 2018I mean, look at Holmes resting her hands on Jackson's shoulders.”
“And then Jackson RESTED HIS HEAD on Holmes' shoulder and put his hand on her back.”
“I thought I was over my high school obsession with #DawsonsCreek ... then I saw this GIF of Pacey & Joey and my heart — Bianca Posterli  (@Bincerli) March 28, 2018They even wore the same hat and it was all just very overwhelming, okay?!!”
“Everything.”


“[h/t:BuzzFeed]”
"Are you kidding?"
"The cast of the teen drama recently reunited to celebrate the 20th anniversary of the show for entertainment weekly special edition."
"After looking back at this perfect picture, one thing stands out: Katie Holmes and Joshua Jackson look really, madly, deeply in love."
Sherlock Holmes and Jackson play Joey and Percy respectively, which is one of the greatest spaceships in the play, so it's hard to see them touch each other affectionately as time almost freezes in 2003
"Keen fans immediately detect the chemical reaction between the two actors as if none of the other actors were present."
"I still love them," screamed Dawson, as she touched him pic.twitter.com/YQVpx1pIth -Erica (@ swish)_ And flick) March 28, 2018, I mean, look at Holmes putting his hand on Jackson's shoulder. "
"Then Jackson put his head on Holmes' shoulder and put his hand on her back."
"I thought I was over my high school obsession with Dawson scream... Then I saw the GIF of "pacey & Joey and my heart" -- Bianca posterli (@ bincerli) on March 28, 2018. They even wore the same hat. It's unbearable, OK? "
"Everything."



Number  145
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Details about the hosts for the third “GMA” hour were reported previously by Page Six.”
“Josh Elliott and Lara Spencer co-anchored a short run of “Good Afternoon America” between July and September of 2012 in a separate bid to test expansion of the franchise.”
“A person familiar with the program confirmed details about its hosts and disclosed the show’s start date.”
“ABC News, which produces the program, declined to make executives available for comment.”
“Launch of the show will extend the presence of GMA to the network s daytme schedule from its early morning grid and allow ABC to create bigger packages for advertisers as NBC does with four hours of Today The idea should also boost affiliates as ABC can promote the extension...”
“...during the main GMA broadcast that airs between 7 a m and 9 a m...”
“The new hour is expected to be taped, not presented live, and run at 1 p.m. on weekdays.”
“One scenario that has been discussed for the new hour would involve making use of the live, in-studio audience assembled each morning for the 8 a.m. hour of the flagship show.”
“ABC said earlier this year it would replace “The Chew” with the new “GMA” hour.”
““Good Morning America” enjoyed an afternoon presence in the not-too-distant past.”


"Details of the hosts for the third" GMA "hour have been reported before page 6."
"Josh Elliott and Laura Spencer co hosted a good afternoon America skit between July and September 2012 to test franchise expansion."
"A person familiar with the show confirmed the details of the host and revealed the start date of the show."
ABC News, which produced the show, declined to let executives comment
"The launch of the show will expand GMA's program from its morning schedule to the station's daily schedule, and allow ABC to make bigger packages for advertisers, just as NBC did in four hours today. This idea will also promote the development of LianBo company, because ABC can promote this expansion... "
“… In the GMA main broadcast between 7am and 9am... "
"The new hour is expected to be recorded, not live. It starts at 1 p.m. on weekdays."
"One of the scenes discussed in the new hour is to use the studio audience who live broadcast the flagship show at 8 a.m. every day."
ABC said earlier this year that it would replace "the chew" with a new "GMA" program
Good Morning America enjoyed an afternoon's existence in the near past



Number  146
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Do you think they’ll really settle down and start a family?”
“However, she’s always dreamed of having a daughter as well.”
“HL learned exclusively she wants marriage AND a baby!”
“It’s been over a year since Britney Spears, 36, and Sam Asghari, 23, were first romantically linked, and it’s safe to say they’re head-over-heels for each other!”
“So much so in fact, that the pop princess apparently has marriage on the brain — AND babies!”
“Despite her and Sam’s age difference, she reportedly would “love” to settle down with him, and we have to admit, the two ARE super cute together.”
“Click here to see adorable pics of celeb moms with their kids.”
““Britney is a hopeless romantic and would love to get married again,” a source close to Britney shared with HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““She loves her man, Sam, and has even thought about having more kids with him.” Brit already has two adorable sons, Sean Federline, 12, and Jayden James Federline, 11, whom she shares with ex-husband Kevin Federline, 39.”
““Britney would love to have a girl and has always wanted to give her sons a baby sister,” our insider added.”


"Do you think they will really settle down and start a family?"
"But she has always dreamed of having a daughter."
"She wants marriage and children!"
"It's been more than a year since Britney Spears, 36, and Sam asgali, 23, first fell in love, and it's safe to say they're made for each other!"
"In fact, pop princess obviously has marriage and children in her mind!"
"Although she and Sam are quite different in age, it is reported that she will be" very willing "to settle down with him. We have to admit that they are super lovely together."
"Click here to see the lovely photos of star mothers with their children."
"Britney Spears is a hopeless romanticist and wants to get married again," a source close to Britney told reporters
"She loves her man Sam and even wants to have more children with him." Britt has two lovely sons, Sean Federline, 12, and Jaden James Federline, 11, who live with her ex husband, Kevin Federline, 39
"Britney would love to have a girl and always wanted to give her son a little sister," our insider added



Number  147
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“I wish I could have kept my d*** in my pants.”Last year's Khloe best pal Malika Haqq appeared on the reality series but refrained from telling secrets about The Kardashians.”
““That wasn’t the stand-up thing to do.”
“The former NBA player, 38, was lined up to star in the reality show that has a retribution theme this year – after he confessed to having “multiple affairs” behind ex-wife Khloe’s back.”
“5 Lamar Odom has turned down a massive payday to appear on the upcoming series of Celebrity Big BrotherA TV source said: “Bosses were really keen on signing Lamar as their star contestant for this year’s line-up.”
““The upcoming series is all about celebrities facing their demons and there’s no better character than Lamar in terms of someone who’s gone through a journey of redemption.”
““He had a massively successful career as a sportsman and a beautiful wife but it all came crashing down due to his infidelities and drug and drink addictions.”
“Lamar was offered a huge fee to take part in the series but eventually turned down the opportunity Khloe Kardashian makes Snapchat debut with Lamar Odom 5 Bosses were keen to sign the ex husband of Khloe Kardashian for their...”
“...redemption themed series but he turned down the offer 5 The ex basketball player was offered a lump sum to star in the show and follow in the footsteps of Khloe s best pal Malika Haqq In 2015 Lamar came...”
“...close to death after he was found unconscious at a brothel following a drugs binge...”
“Khloe, who divorced Lamar in 2016, said making medical decisions for her ex while he was in a coma was the most emotionally stressful time of her life.”


"I wish I could hide my d * * in my pants." Last year, Khloe's best friend Malika haqq appeared in the reality TV series, but did not reveal the secrets of Kardashian's family
"It's not about standing up."
The 38 year old former NBA player will appear on a revenge themed reality show this year after admitting to "multiple relationships" behind his ex-wife Khloe
"5 Lamar Odom rejected the huge reward for the upcoming big brother TV series, and the source said:" the owners really want to sign Lamar as the star player of the year. "
"The upcoming series are all about celebrities facing their demons. For those who have experienced the journey of salvation, there is no better character than Lamar."
"As an athlete and a beautiful wife, his career was very successful, but everything collapsed because of his infidelity and drug and alcohol abuse."
"Lamar was offered a huge amount of money to participate in the series, but eventually rejected the chance of Kardashian and Lamar Odom's snapchat debut. The five owners are eager to sign Kardashian's ex husband because of their..."
“… Redemption theme series, but he refused to offer 5 former basketball players a pay off starring show, and in 2015 followed in the footsteps of Khloe's best friend Malika Huck, Lamar came... "
“… After he was found unconscious after taking drugs in a brothel, he almost died... "
"Khloe divorced Lamar in 2016 and said that making medical decisions for her ex boyfriend during his coma was the most stressful period of her life."



Number  148
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE : Britney Spears slips back into her booty shorts and Miley Cyrus – and us – are living for itMORE : Paris Hilton loses $2 million engagement ring in stranger’s ice bucket...”
“However it looks like their differences have been put aside as the two were photographed together at The Daily Front Row Fashion Awards on Sunday.”
“The 37-year-old posed the question to her 18 million followers on Monday, by uploading a poll onto her Twitter account.”
“She simply wrote: ‘Should #TheSimpleLife return?’ with a quick yes or no option for fans to divulge whether or not they would want to see the show back on their screens.”
“And who would have guessed that these five simple words were enough to send fans into meltdown as at the time of her poll, more than 80 per cent of the people who took part said yes.”
“The pair were reunited at The Daily Front Row Fashion Awards in L.A. on Sunday (Picture: Fox)One fan wrote: ‘I’d be so excited.”
“How funny were they together.’AdvertisementAdvertisementWhile another added: ‘Hell yessss!!”
“I still live for this programme and will forever be one of my faves!”
“A comeback would be EPIC.’Someone else replied: ‘IS THAT EVEN A QUESTION!!”
“OF COURSE.’Hilton starred in the reality show from 2003 to 2005 alongside her best bud Nicole Richie.”


"More: Britney Spears slides back to Her Booty Shorts and Miley Cyrus - and we - live for it more: Paris Hilton lost her $2 million engagement ring in a stranger's ice bucket..."
"However, it seems that their differences have been put on the back burner because they took pictures at the front row fashion awards ceremony on Sunday."
On Monday, the 37 year old uploaded a poll to her twitter account and asked the 18 million fans the question
She wrote simply: "should simple life return? "Fans can quickly choose yes or no to reveal whether they want to see the show on screen."
"Who would have thought that these five simple words would be enough to make her fans collapse when she voted, and more than 80% of the people who voted said yes."
"The two reunited at the daily fashion awards in Los Angeles on Sunday (photo source: Fox), and one fan wrote: 'I'll be excited.'
"How interesting they are together." The other added, "hell, yes!"
"I still live for this show and will always be one of my favorites!"
"Coming back will be epic." Another replied, "it's even a question!"
"Of course." Hilton starred with her best partner Nicole Richie on reality TV from 2003 to 2005



Number  149
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“Keough was only 5-years-old when her mom, Lisa […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“Gossip Cop, however, can set the record straight.”
“That’s the claim in one of this week’s new tabloids, which also says the actress was never impressed by the iconic singer.”
“Did Riley Keough really sell all of the gifts bought for her by late stepfather Michael Jackson ?”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
"When KIO was only five years old, her mother, Lisa ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"However, the gossip police can clarify the facts."
"That's what a new tabloid said on Monday, adding that the actress has never been moved by the idol singer."
"Did Riley KIO really sell all the gifts that her late stepfather Michael Jackson gave her?"



Number  150
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Play slideshow Getty 1 of 65 Meghan Markle style: The Duchess of Sussex's best looks...”
“The Royal Family was reportedly 'offended' after Mr Markle staged a series of paparazzi photosMeghan Markle's best fashion moments in pictures Sat, July 28, 2018 Meghan Markle style: The Duchess of Sussex's best looks in pictures.”
“SUBSCRIBE Invalid email Sign up fornow and never miss the top Royal stories again.”
“When you subscribe we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters.”
“Sometimes they'll include recommendations for other related newsletters or services we offer.”
“Our Privacy Notice explains more about how we use your data, and your rights.”
“You can unsubscribe at any time.”
“The retired television lighting director stated he had no way of contacting his daughter after Royal aides cut off all telephone links in the wake of previous comments he made to the media regarding the Royal Family.”
“Speaking to the Mail on Sunday, Mr Markle said: “I’m really hurt that she’s cut me off completely.”
“I used to have a phone number and text number for her personal aides at the Palace but after I said a few critical words about the Royal Family changing Meghan they cut me off He expressed his sadness over...”


"Slide show Getty 1 of 65 Megan Markle style: The Duchess of Sussex's best looks..."
"It is reported that the British royal family has been" offended "after Mr. markel staged a series of paparazzi photos" best fashion moment photo album of Megan markel ". On July 28, 2018, Megan markel style: best looks photo album of the Duchess of Sussex."
"Subscribe to invalid email registrations now and never miss the top Royal stories again."
"When you subscribe, we will use the information you provide to send you these newsletters."
"Sometimes it includes suggestions for other relevant newsletters or services we provide."
"Our privacy statement explains in detail how we use your data and your rights."
"You can unsubscribe at any time."
"The retired director of television lighting said that after he had previously made remarks about the royal family to the media, Royal aides cut off all telephone contacts, he had no way to contact his daughter."
"I'm really sad that she completely cut me off," markel told the daily mail on Sunday
"I used to have her personal assistant's phone number and text number in the palace, but after I said a few words of criticism about the Royal replacement of Megan, they interrupted me and he expressed his support for "I'm sorry."



Number  151
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Sound off in the comments!”
“Source: BACKGRIDWhat do you think is the cause for Selena’s weight issues?”
“Or that The Weeknd is creating a rift between Selena and her loved ones?”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyCould this stress be due to her ex Justin Bieber trying to get back into her life?”
“Is her boyfriend The Weeknd doing anything to stop this insanity?”
“Source: Getty"It’s typical of her addictive personality, once she gets onto a cycle like this she’s unable to stop,” continues the source.”
“"She loves looking skinny but says she’s not reached her goal yet and is continuing to diet the whole time,” the source reveals.”
“Article continues below advertisementSource: GettyEven though she enjoys how she looks, she seems far from done in her quest for being super thin.”
“"She barely touches her meals and works out like a fiend every day, often fitting two or three sessions into one day,” says the source.”
““Her waist is teeny and she’s dropped at least two dress sizes recently, everyone’s worried.”Source: BACKGRIDHer focus seems to be on not eating that much and putting way too much energy into her fitness.”


"Please leave a message in the comments!"
Background: what do you think is the cause of Selena's weight problem? "
"Or did this weekend create a rift between Serena and her loved ones?"
The article continues in the following ad source: "get this pressure because her former Justin Bieber is trying to get back to her life?"
"What was her boyfriend doing that week to stop this crazy behavior?"
"Source: Getty" this is her typical addictive personality, once she enters such a cycle, she can't stop, "continued source
"She likes to look thin, but she says she hasn't reached her goal and has been dieting," the source said
Although she likes her appearance, she seems to be far from completing her pursuit of ultra-thin
"She hardly touches her own food and exercises like a devil every day, often two or three times a day," the source said
"Her waistline is very small. She has lost at least two sizes recently. Everyone is worried." Source: backgrid her focus seems to be not eating so much and putting too much energy into fitness



Number  152
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“AFP”
“Story continues below advertisementThe movie, which has also seen Italian director Gabriele Muccino exit at the 11th hour, is a remake of the French film Un petit jeu sans conséquence, based on a play by Jean Dell and Gérald Sibleyras.”
“Filming had been set to start this month, the report said.”
“Diaz and Carrey had been due to appear on screen for the first time since starring in 1994's The Mask, but pulled out because of unhappiness with the storyline, The Hollywood Reporter and Variety said.”
“Cameron Diaz and Jim Carrey have scrapped plans to reunite in the romantic comedy A Little Game just a few weeks before shooting was due to start, movie industry press reported Tuesday.”


"AFP"
The story continues under the advertisement. The film, which Italian director Gabriel Mucino also left at 11 o'clock, is a remake of the French film disordered youth, adapted from the scripts of Jean Dell and Gerard cibilas
"Filming was originally scheduled to start this month," the report said
"Diaz and Kerry were supposed to be on the screen for the first time since they starred in mask in 1994, but dropped out because of dissatisfaction with the plot," Hollywood Reporter and variety magazine said
"Cameron Diaz and Jim Carey have canceled plans to reunite in the upcoming romantic comedy" little games, "the film industry Press reported on Tuesday



Number  153
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Embed Code RestartRelated Gallery...”
“"I don't need everyone on Instagram pointing out that I don't look the same way I did when I was 20.”
“On Friday, the 51-year-old supermodel posted a video of herself coming out of the pool in a teeny blue bikini by Melissa Odabash.”
“"Morning dip," she captioned the playful GIF.”
“Crawford and her husband, Rande Gerber, are clearly good at vacation.”
“While the mother of two was sharing pool pics, the 55-year-old Casamigos mogul posted a photo of the beautiful view.”
“"Mornings like this with coffee and croissants," he wrote.”
“Gerber also appears to be quite good with a mango ...or is it a football?”
“While Crawford's vacation pics are pretty flawless, she told New Beauty that she's seen a change in her looks over the years.”
“I know that," she said.”


"Embedded code restart related libraries..."
"I don't need everyone on instagram to point out that I look different from when I was 20."
"On Friday, the 51 year old supermodel released a video of her walking out of the pool in a small blue bikini designed by Melissa ODABASH."
"Morning bubble," she headline with a witty GIF
"Crawford and her husband, Rand Gerber, are obviously very good at vacationing."
"When the mothers of two shared photos of the pool, the 55 year old casamigos tycoon posted a picture of the beautiful scenery."
"Coffee and croissants on mornings like this," he wrote
"Gerber also seems to be good at eating Mangoes Or football? "
"Although Crawford's holiday photos are perfect, she told new beauty that her looks have changed over the years."
"I know," she said



Number  154
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...is conceivable that after a major breakup Garner is looking for answers where she can find them...”
“That is not her style.”
“After living apart for two years, Affleck and Garner decided to go their separate ways.”
“The actors were married for 12 years and have three children together – 11-year-old Violet, Seraphina, 8, and Samuel, 5.”
“Very rapidly, Affleck revealed to the world that he was in a serious relationship with Lindsay Shookus.”
“Rumors are claiming the movie maker and his new lady secretly started dating in 2012.”
“Affleck has been seen on romantic dinner dates with the Saturday Night Live producer, and the pair has moved into a home together.”
“A source has come out to say; Garner is feeling lonely and abandoned by the father of her children who has found a new love.”
“A friend explained: “Jen is hurt and humiliated by Ben’s very public romance.”The chatty insider added: “Jen has never been about getting retribution.”
“But Ben’s insensitive actions have changed her.”


“…… It can be imagined that after a major breakup, Ghana is looking for the answer, where she can find the answer... "
"That's not her style."
"After living apart for two years, Affleck and Ghana decided to go their separate ways."
The two actors have been married for 12 years and have three children - violet, 11, Serafina, 8 and Samuel, 5
"Soon, Affleck revealed to the world that he had a serious relationship with Lindsay schokus."
"There are rumors that the filmmaker and his new girlfriend started dating secretly in 2012."
"Someone saw Affleck and the producer of" Saturday night live "moving into a house together on a romantic dinner date."
"There is news that Ghana feels lonely and abandoned by the father of the child who has found a new love."
"Ben's public love affair has hurt and humiliated Jen," a friend explained The talkative insider added: "Jen has never thought of retribution."
"But Ben's insensitive behavior changed her."



Number  155
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It's just very, very jarring for the kids, to suddenly have their family ripped apart."”
“And fortunately my partner in this agrees.”
“I just refuse.”
“And it seems to be true, you spend a year just focused on building a case to prove your point and why you're right and why they're wrong, and it's just an investment in vitriolic hatred.”
“I heard one lawyer say, 'No one wins in court—it's just a matter of who gets hurt worse.'”
“We're both doing our best.”
“"And you know, after that, we've been able to work together to sort this out.”
“"I was really on my back and chained to a system when Child Services was called," he noted to the mag.”
“He also seemed intent to move forward with the least amount of strife inflicted on his offspring.”
“And I haven't been great at it."”


"It's very disharmonious for children to suddenly break up their families."
"Fortunately, my partner agreed."
"I just refused."
"It seems to be true that you spent a year focusing only on building a case to prove your point of view, why you are right, why they are wrong, it's just an investment in mean hatred."
"I heard a lawyer say," no one wins in court. It's just a matter of who is more seriously injured. "
"We did our best."
"You know, after that, we can solve the problem together."
"When the children's service center got the call, I was really busy and tied to a system," he told the magazine
"He also seems to want to move on with the least amount of conflict."
"I've never been good at it."



Number  156
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Details about the hosts for the third “GMA” hour were reported previously by Page Six.”
“Josh Elliott and Lara Spencer co-anchored a short run of “Good Afternoon America” between July and September of 2012 in a separate bid to test expansion of the franchise.”
“A person familiar with the program confirmed details about its hosts and disclosed the show’s start date.”
“ABC News, which produces the program, declined to make executives available for comment.”
“Launch of the show will extend the presence of GMA to the network s daytme schedule from its early morning grid and allow ABC to create bigger packages for advertisers as NBC does with four hours of Today The idea should also boost affiliates as ABC can promote the extension...”
“...during the main GMA broadcast that airs between 7 a m and 9 a m...”
“The new hour is expected to be taped, not presented live, and run at 1 p.m. on weekdays.”
“One scenario that has been discussed for the new hour would involve making use of the live, in-studio audience assembled each morning for the 8 a.m. hour of the flagship show.”
“ABC said earlier this year it would replace “The Chew” with the new “GMA” hour.”
““Good Morning America” enjoyed an afternoon presence in the not-too-distant past.”


"Details of the hosts for the third" GMA "hour have been reported before page 6."
"Josh Elliott and Laura Spencer co hosted a good afternoon America skit between July and September 2012 to test franchise expansion."
"A person familiar with the show confirmed the details of the host and revealed the start date of the show."
ABC News, which produced the show, declined to let executives comment
"The launch of the show will expand GMA's program from its morning schedule to the station's daily schedule, and allow ABC to make bigger packages for advertisers, just as NBC did in four hours today. This idea will also promote the development of LianBo company, because ABC can promote this expansion... "
“… In the GMA main broadcast between 7am and 9am... "
"The new hour is expected to be recorded, not live. It starts at 1 p.m. on weekdays."
"One of the scenes discussed in the new hour is to use the studio audience who live broadcast the flagship show at 8 a.m. every day."
ABC said earlier this year that it would replace "the chew" with a new "GMA" program
Good Morning America enjoyed an afternoon's existence in the near past



Number  157
Source test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
““Kids, friends and work are hard, but John is the easiest part of everything.””
“You are why I need 50000 chargers on my rider.”
“The supermodel took to Twitter to roast John Legend for stealing all ― yes, all ― of her phone chargers.”
““Yes @johnlegend I buy and leave all the phone chargers all around the house just so you can unplug them all and take them to work with you.”
“...all of them!” Teigen wrote on Wednesday, her words dripping with sarcasm.”
““I love that you love chargers!”
“...they’re all for you!”
“I just love you that’s why I buy them.”
“...because you love them The Lip Sync Battle commentator tweeted then that she was going to purchase a unicorn charger so Legend might avoid taking it johnlegend take this one u thief christine teigen chrissyteigen February 8 2018 As one Twitter user put it the two are facing a power...”
“...struggle It sounds like the two of you are facing a bit of a power struggle...”


"Children, friends and work are hard, but John is the easiest."
"That's why my driver needs 50000 chargers."
The supermodel tweeted that John Legend had stolen all her cell phone chargers
"Yes @ johnlegend, I bought all the phone chargers and left them at home, so you can unplug them all and take them to work."
“… all! 'There's a lot of irony in her words, 'tegan wrote on Wednesday
"I love you, I love charger!"
“… It's all for you
"I just love you, that's why I bought it."
“… Because you love them, the mouth fight commentator tweeted at that time that she would buy a unicorn charger, so legend can avoid using it. John Legan, take this American thief Christina tigan Christina tigan on February 8, 2018. As one twitter user said, both of them are facing a power... "
“… It sounds like you two are facing a power struggle... "



**Something goes wrong**
“They are dating, but not necessarily putting a label on it,” the source continued.”
“They both love traveling and are trying to share as many fun trips as possible.”
“The American Idol judge kicked off the Asian leg of her Witness World Tour in Tokyo, Japan, on Tuesday night, and she had a very special supporter make the trip with her: on-again beau Orlando Bloom.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“During the show, the 33-year-old singer told fans while introducing her song that she “felt very loved.”
“And this next song is about being so loved and so seen that you never ever have felt this feeling before.”
“This feeling of love.”She added, “This is ‘For Me You See,’ for Bubba Doo,” seeming to reveal her pet name for Bloom, whom fans spotted in the audience.”
“The nickname means, “One whom you adore, such as a (male) child or husband,” according to Urban Dictionary.”
“Bloom, 41, made no attempts to hide that he was also in Japan, sharing a selfie with the country’s famous cherry blossoms to Instagram.”
““cherry blossoms bloom ❤,” he captioned the photo, tagged in Tokyo.”


"They're dating, but they don't have to be labeled," the source continued
"They all like to travel and try to share as much fun as possible."
"The American Idol judges kicked off her world tour asia with a very special supporter in Tokyo on Tuesday night: Orlando Bloom again."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
During the performance, the 33 year old singer, introducing her song, told fans that she "feels very loved."
"The next song is about being loved and seen so much that you've never felt it before."
"This feeling of love," she added, "is' for me, you see, 'for bubbado," seems to reveal her nickname for bloom, and fans find her in the audience. "
According to the city dictionary, the nickname means "someone you admire, such as a (male) child or husband."
"Bloom, 41, made no secret that he was also in Japan, taking a picture with famous Japanese cherry blossom on instagram."
"The cherry blossoms are blooming ❤ "He added a title to this picture that was tagged in Tokyo."



**Something goes wrong**
““So it just makes it look as if I’ve had, like, 6,000 boyfriends!” Meanwhile, Robert recently called off his engagement to longtime girlfriend FKA twigs.”
““It’s difficult in my dating life because anyone I get photographed with is automatically my boyfriend,” she said.”
“GoldenGlobes While Emma has not spoken out about her new romance she has been very open about dating in the past...”
“My reaction when Emma Watson and Robert Pattinson presented together GoldenGlobes pic twitter com 7PO0uqhmvS Arely Del Toro Mu5icGam3s January 8 2018 Harry Potter Vibes with Emma Watson and Robert Pattinson one fan wrote before another added Anyone else geek out over EmmaWatson Robert Pattinson s HarryPotter reunion at the...”
“As expected, viewers were beyond excited about seeing the pair together on the little screen.”
“They’ve always had chemistry, but the timing has never been right — until now.”The new couple seemingly went public at the 2018 Golden Globes, where they presented the award for Best TV Movie or Limited Series, which went to HBO’s Big Little Lies.”
““They share the same sense of humor and have so much in common.”
““They’ve been texting and enjoying secret dinners together in LA and London,” a source told In Touch exclusively, explaining that Emma, 27, and Robert, 31, have been friends since they filmed 2005’s Harry Potter and the Goblet of Fire.”
“But she’s already moved on — with Robert Pattinson.”
“It’s been less than two months since news broke that Emma Watson split from tech entrepreneur William “Mack” Knight.”


"So it makes me look like I have 6000 boyfriends! Meanwhile, Robert recently cancelled his engagement to his girlfriend, verka Tevez
"It's very difficult in my dating life because people who take pictures with me automatically become my boyfriends," she said
"Although Emma didn't talk about her new relationship in public, she was very open to past dates..."
"My reaction is that when Emma Watson and Robert Pattinson tweeted" Harry Potter "with Emma Watson and Robert Pattinson on January 8, 2018, one fan wrote before another that someone had joined other geeks at Emma Watson and Robert Pattinson's Harry Potter party..."
"As expected, the audience was thrilled to see them together on the small screen."
"There has been a chemical reaction between them, but the timing has never been right - until now." The couple appear to have made a public appearance at the 2018 Golden Globe, where they presented the best TV movie or limited edition series award to HBO's little lies
"They have the same sense of humor and a lot in common."
"They've been texting and having secret dinners together in Los Angeles and London," a source told contact exclusive, explaining that Emma, 27, and Robert, 31, have been friends since shooting Harry Potter and goblet of fire in 2005
"But she's already with Robert Pattinson."
"It's less than two months since Emma Watson broke up with technology entrepreneur William McKnight."



**Something goes wrong**
“Meanwhile Jennifer has been in a relationship with Justin Theroux for five years, and they celebrated their first wedding anniversary in August.”
“...this would be a bad idea...”
“But according to Andy Cohen, the iciness between the actress, 47, and the singer, 39, still hasn't thawed.”
“According to an excerpt from his new book Superficial, which was obtained by Radar Online, the pair had an extremely 'awkward' run-in earlier this year.”
“'Awkward': Andy Cohen has revealed that exes John Mayer and Jennifer Aniston had a run-in earlier this year.”
“They are seen here in 2009 at the hotel where they bumped into each other Andy revealed that he was meeting his close friend John for a drink at the popular Sunset Tower hotel in West Hollywood and found Jennifer sitting with her Friends co stars Lisa Kudrow and Courteney...”
“Cox at the only other table there...”
“The 48-year-old said he 'began asking John when was the last time he saw Aniston, how awkward this was, and if there were ways I could make it more awkward'.”
“Andy added: 'We realized they had to walk by our table to leave and that would be a "moment."”
“We wondered if it was more fun at our table or theirs.'”


Meanwhile, Jennifer and Justin Cyrus have been dating for five years, and they celebrate their first wedding anniversary in August
“… It's a bad idea... "
But according to Andy Cohen, the indifference between the 47 year old actress and the 39 year old singer has not been removed
"According to an excerpt from his new book, surface, which was acquired by radar online, the two had an extremely 'embarrassing' run in earlier this year."
"Embarrassing: Andy Cohen revealed that former boyfriends John Mayer and Jennifer Aniston had a break in earlier this year."
"In 2009, they met in a hotel. Andy revealed that he met his good friend John for a drink at the popular Sunset Tower Hotel in West Hollywood, and found that Jennifer was sitting with her friends Lisa Kudrow and Courtney..."
"Cox is on the only table over there..."
"The 48 year old said he" began to ask John when he last saw Aniston, how embarrassing it was, and whether there was any way to make things more embarrassing. "
Andy added: "we realized that they had to pass our table to leave, and that would be a 'moment'
"We don't know if it's more fun on our table or on their table."



**Something goes wrong**
“FL American Airlines Arena...”
“On the Dance Again World Tour in 2012, J.Lo outdid herself with an impressively choreographed production featuring her greatest hits.”
“From her origins as a Fly Girl dancer on In Living Color in the ‘90s to her 13th No.”
“1 single in 2012, J.Lo’s provocative style and floor-friendly anthems have made her a dance chart staple with a record ten consecutive No.”
“1’s.”
“With the 2012 release of Dance Again… the Hits, J.Lo once again landed atop the charts with the album’s Pitbull-featured title track, thrilling fans by embarking on her long-anticipated first world tour.”
“J.Lo began her career as an actress before successfully venturing into music – the simultaneous success of her sophomore album J.Lo and film The Wedding Planner in 2001 made her the first person in history to have a No.”
“1 film and album in the same week.”
“Ticket buyers rave about her energy and stage presence while looking forward to the upcoming release of her eighth studio album.”
“Garden Tuesday July 16 Mansfield MA Xfinity Center Wednesday July 17 Washington DC Capital One Arena Friday July 19 Newark NJ Prudential Center Saturday July 20 Philadelphia PA Wells Fargo Center Monday July 22 Atlanta GA State Farm Arena Tuesday July 23 Orlando FL Amway Center Thursday July 25 Miami...”


"American Airlines Arena..."
"At the 2012 world tour of dance again, J. lo, featuring her most successful works, surpassed herself with impressive choreography."
"From her birth as a live color dancing girl in the 1990s to her No. 13."
"In 2012, a single, J. Lo's provocative style and friendly praise for the dance floor made her the main figure in the dance charts, and won the championship for ten consecutive times."
"1's"
"With the release of dance in 2012 The hit, J. Lo with the album "Bulldog" hit song once again on the top of the charts, began her long-awaited first world tour, fans excited
"Before her successful involvement in music, J.Lo began her acting career - in 2001, her sophomore album" J.Lo "and the film" wedding planner "were both successful, which made her the first person in history to have no
"There's a movie and an album in the same week."
"Ticket buyers are full of praise for her vitality and stage performance, and are looking forward to her upcoming eighth studio album."
"Garden Tuesday July 16 Mansfield Ma xfinity center Wednesday July 17 Washington, D.C. an arena Friday July 19 Newark Prudential Center New Jersey Saturday July 20 Philadelphia Pennsylvania Wells Fargo center Monday July 22 Atlanta Georgia State Farm arena Tuesday July 23 Orlando Amway Center Florida Thursday July 25 Miami..."



Number  162
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Journalism', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Scroll down to see the complete timeline of Jenner and Scott’s relationship.”
“Even during their time apart, the Kylie Cosmetics founder and Grammy nominee remained close and were committed to working together to raise their daughter.”
“Kylie Jenner and Travis Scott have had their fair share of ups and downs throughout their relationship, but they always seem to find their way back to each other.”
“The Keeping Up With the Kardashians star and the rapper went public with their romance at Coachella in April 2017, just weeks after she split from her boyfriend of four years, Tyga.”
“The pair welcomed their daughter, Stormi, in February 2018.”
“After more than two years together, Us Weekly confirmed that the couple was taking a break from their romance.”
““Kylie and Travis have been on and off at various times throughout their relationship,” a source explained in October 2019, shortly after news broke of their split.”
““Kylie still loves Travis and this isn’t considered a full breakup to either of them.”A second insider told Us at the time that the pair had never had a “traditional relationship” but were “very much in love” before deciding to take a break.”
“The couple made such a great team that even their close friends were rallying for them to reconcile and could see them getting back together at some point in the future Jenner gushed over the strong coparenting relationship she had with the Butterfly Effect rapper during an interview with Harper...”
“Entertainment Tonight reported that the reality TV personality and her former flame had been seeing each other for about a month, while a source told In Touch that they were taking things slow due to Jenner’s trust issues.”


"Scroll down to see the full timeline of Jenner Scott relationship."
Even during their separation, the founder of Kelly cosmetics and the Grammy nominees remained close and committed to raising their daughter together
"Kelly Jenner and Travis Scott have gone through quite a lot of ups and downs in their relationship, but they always seem to find each other's home."
"Kardashian and rapper follow Kardashian disclosed their love affair in cochella in April 2017, just a few weeks after she broke up with her boyfriend TEGA of four years."
"The two met their daughter, Tommy, in February 2018."
"After more than two years together, US weekly confirmed that the couple are coming out of romance."
In October 2019, a source explained shortly after the news that Kelly and Travis broke up: "Kelly and Travis are on and off in their relationship."
"Kelly is still in love with Travis, which is not a complete break-up for both of them." A second person familiar with the matter told us at the time that they had never had a "traditional relationship", but they were "very in love" before they decided to break up
"The couple have formed such a great team that even their close friends are uniting for their reconciliation and can see them reunite at some time in the future. Jenna talks endlessly about her strong co parenting relationship with the butterfly effect singer in an interview with Harper."
Entertainment Tonight reported that the reality star and her ex lover had known each other for about a month, while a source in contact magazine said they were slow to make progress because of Jenna's trust



Number  163
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But at least for now, we're enjoying a more honest, wide-ranging conversation about a figure who's been coddled for far too long.”
“...self branding that she s a musical genius that this scion of a multi generational banking fortune is as the New York Times said of her not long ago some kind of underdog...”
“The Guardian has called Swift's response to Minaj -- she blamed it on men -- "faux-feminist" and "tone deaf."”
“But the superstar's Twitter incident with Nicki Minaj -- spurred by MTV's Video Music Awards snubbing Minaj's "Anaconda" video -- has opened up a broader discussion about Swift's privilege and preening and phoniness, and it's about time.”
“Our job is simply to obey.”
“She's like the prom queen who drives the brand-new Mercedes to school, whose parents buy everyone cookies: If you defy her you are some kind of envious grouch or killjoy.”
“But these critical voices have been marginalized.”
“Advertisement:Despite this weird worship of wealth and power that's grown up in post-Great Recession America -- which has helped Swift immensely -- not everyone loves Swift or her oddly lifeless, machine-made music.”
“It s because of the weird consensus that s shaped up around her in the last year or two That she s a brave young woman who s earned it all herself that she s just like us that she should be lionized for her success at the game of...”
“(Minaj was complaining about the way black musician often get overlooked.)”


"But for the moment at least, we are enjoying a more candid, broader conversation about a person who has been spoiled for too long."
“…… She boasts that she is a musical genius. She is a successor to banking wealth for many generations. As the New York Times said not long ago, she is a failure... "
The guardian said Swift's response to Minagi was "pseudo feminist" and "deaf"
"But the superstar's Twitter affair with Nicky minaji - spurred by the MTV Video Music Award for snubbing minaji's" water boa "video - has led to a broader discussion of Swift's privileges, makeup and hypocrisy, and it's time."
"Our job is to obey."
"She's like a prom queen, driving a brand new Mercedes to school, and her parents buy biscuits for everyone: if you disobey her, you're a jealous whiner or prank."
"But these criticisms have been marginalized."
"Even so, in the United States after the great depression, people's worship of wealth and power is growing. Not everyone likes swift or her lifeless machine music
"It is precisely because in the past year or two, s has formed a strange consensus around her, she is a brave young woman, she has won everything, she is like us, she should be worshipped, because of her success in the competition..."
"(Minagi complains about the way black musicians are often ignored.)



Number  164
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“'””
“I love my wife and it made me realize what a f king idiot I ve been The Osbournes who married in July 1982 briefly split earlier this year on the heels of the rocker s affair with hairstylist Michelle...”
““It’s a rock ‘n’ roll thing — you rock and you roll.”
“You take the good with the bad,” the Black Sabbath vocalist, 68, told Rolling Stone in a profile published on Thursday, September 14.”
““You take the good with the bad.”
“When I was a crazy f–ker, I’m lucky she didn’t walk out.”
“Now I’m coming on five years clean and sober, and I’ve realized what a f–king idiot I was.”
“I mean, I’m still nuts, but in control of it a bit more.”Ozzy then backtracked on his earlier joke.”
““When I said, ‘Don’t get caught by your missus,’ I’m not proud of all that s–t,” he explained.”
““I upset my wife and I upset my family and I made a lot of shock and shame.”


“'””
"I love my wife, which makes me realize what a stupid Osborne couple I am. I got married in July 1982 and broke up earlier this year because of the scandal between rock singer and hairdresser Michelle..."
"It's a rock thing - you rock, you rock."
"You take the good side and look at the bad side," the 68 year old black sabbath singer told rolling stone in a profile released on Thursday, September 14
"You put the good and the bad together."
"When I was a lunatic, I was lucky she didn't go out."
"Now that I've lived a clean and sober life for five years, I realize what a stupid fool I am."
"I mean, I'm still crazy, but I can control more." Oz went back to his previous jokes
"When I say 'don't get caught by your wife', I'm not proud of those s-ts," he explained
"I made my wife and family very sad, and I created a lot of shock and shame."



Number  165
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In the latest episode of the New Idea Royals podcast, Frances Sheen and royal expert Angela Mollard take you behind the scenes of the big day - from the bride's stunning dresses to the surprise guest list - and talk through all the highlights that kept us all riveted.”
“The Duke and Duchess of Sussex's twin joy may have been the help of his genetics.”
“'It's amazing...just incredible,' a friend gushed to the Enquirer.”
“'But they won't announce for some time, or until the end of the first trimester, as is the American custom.'”
“Another insider reportedly told the US publication, 'All the signs have been there for months now.”
“'It's wonderful news to be sure - but it shouldn't come as a shock to anyone.'”
“The Enquirer's shocking report claims 36-year-old Meghan secretly visited fertility doctors before her May 19 wedding to Prince Harry, who is sixth in line to the British throne.”
“'Harry and Meghan want to get pregnant as quickly as possible after their wedding,' a friend tells.”
“'They both know that as Meghan gets older, it can get increasingly harder to conceive - and they are both keenly aware of her vulnerability to health complications and the chance of miscarriage the older she gets.'”
“Along with fertility check-ups, Meghan also visited London-based nutritionist Melanie Brown at Kensington Palace, insiders told the Enquirer.”


"In the latest episode of the New Creative Royal podcast, Frances sheen and royal expert Angela mollard will take you behind the scenes of the big day - from the bride's amazing dress to the surprise guest list - and talk about all the highlights that keep us focused."
"The happiness of the Duke and Duchess of Sussex twins may be his genetic help."
"It's amazing It's incredible, "a friend gushed to the questioner
"But they don't announce it for a period of time, or until the end of the first three months of pregnancy, which is American custom."
"It is reported that another insider told the US media that all the signs have existed for several months."
"It's really good news, but it shouldn't shock anyone."
According to the shocking report of the inquirer, Megan, 36, secretly visited a fertility doctor before her wedding to Prince Harry, the sixth in line to the throne, on May 19
"Harry and Megan want to get pregnant as soon as possible after the wedding," a friend told reporters
"They all know that it's going to be harder and harder to get pregnant as Megan gets older - and they're acutely aware that the older Megan gets, the more likely she is to have health complications and miscarriage."
People familiar with the matter told inquirer that while checking her fertility, Megan also visited Melanie brown, a nutritionist at Kensington Palace in London



Number  166
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Share your thoughts with us!”
““They wanted something quiet and intimate, with just the children present,” the source told the mag.”
“We were devastated when Jen Garner and Ben Affleck split in June 2015, but after months of hints that they may be working on their relationship, a new report claims that they’ve renewed their vows!”
“We have all the details, right here.”
“This is going to make you feel warm and fuzzy just in time for the holidays!”
“Ben Affleck, 44, and Jen Garner, 44, have had a rough year.”
“From a shocking split to cheating rumors and accusations of hard-partying, these two seem to have taken hit after hit in their relationship.”
“However, it may all be over now because they’ve re-made the ultimate commitment to stand by each others’ side through thick and thin, according to a new report.”
“That’s right, Star Magazine reports that Jen and Ben have recently renewed their vows as rumors swirled of a fourth child being in the works.”
““Jen wore a sweet, simple dress and Ben put on a pair of slacks and a nice shirt.”It sounds like the whole event was cathartic, romantic and wonderfully personal to both of them.”


"Share your thoughts with us!"
"They want something quiet and intimate, with only the children present," the source told the magazine
"We were shocked when Jan Garner and Ben Affleck broke up in June 2015, but after months of hinting that they might be trying to improve their relationship, a new report says they have taken the oath again!"
"We have all the details, right here."
"It will make you feel warm and fuzzy, just in time for the holiday!"
"Ben Affleck, 44, and Jan Garner, 44, have had a tough year."
"From the shocking breakup to the accusations of deceptive rumors and party revelry, their relationship seems to have been hit again and again."
"However, according to a new report, it may be all over now, because they have made the final commitment to be on each other's side anyway."
"Yes, according to star magazine, Jennifer and Ben recently took the oath again because there are rumors that a fourth child is in the making."
"Jane is wearing a sweet and plain skirt, and Ben is wearing a pair of slacks and a beautiful shirt." It sounds like the whole event is a cathartic, romantic and wonderful personality for both of them. "



Number  167
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The singer has since canceled the rest of her “Tell Me You Love Me Tour,” to seek treatment.”
“Demi was on tour amidst her overdose.”
“Now, we have the real scoop and you’ve got to hear this!”
“Did Demi Lovato‘s overdose really make Wilmer Valderrama, 38, realize that he wants to marry her?”
“— The answer is NO, despite a report which has claimed otherwise.”
““Marriage with Demi at one point in Wilmer’s life was something that was talked about while they were dating,” a source tells HollywoodLife.com EXCLUSIVELY.”
““There were many occasions where he almost popped the question.” However, that was then and this is now.”
““Wilmer has been broken up with Demi for a while, and even though she is going through a tough time, it’s not giving him thoughts on getting back together with her or to marry her,” the insider says.”
“There is absolutely no bad blood, the source reveals, noting that Wilmer paid Demi multiple visits in the hospital during her recovery.”
“Ultimately, he just wants the best for his ex, especially in terms of her health.”


Since then, the singer has cancelled the rest of the "tell me you love me Tour" and sought treatment
"Demi's overdose. She's on tour."
"Now that we have a real scoop, you have to hear it!"
"Did Demi Lovato's Overdose really make Wilmer waldrama, 38, realize he wanted to marry her?"
"The answer is no, despite a report to the contrary."
"In Wilmer's life, their marriage to Demi used to be a topic of conversation when they dated," a source told reporters exclusive to Hollywood life
"A lot of times, he almost asked the question." However, that was then, this is now
"It's been a while since Wilmer and Demi broke up, and although Demi is going through a difficult period, it doesn't make him think of reuniting with Demi or marrying her," the person familiar with the matter said
Sources said: "there is absolutely no bad blood. Wilmer visited Demi in the hospital many times during his recovery."
"At the end of the day, he just wanted to give his predecessor the best, especially in terms of her health."



Number  168
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Oh well it s a black musician he took drugs what do we expect anyway...”
“...to understand how this movie can run into these racist ideas and we have to be attentive to the fact that this might allow people to dismiss the idea that domestic violence is in fact a larger societal problem because...”
“One of the things that conveys is These are black celebrities and there s a white spectator on screen going Oh my God look at what these black people are doing to each other As an audience we should want...”
““There’s a scene where Ike abuses Tina in a diner — the cake scene — and there’s a white mother with her kids and they have this horrified look on their faces.”
““I think that movie is really complex in terms of race and class,” said Shoos.”


"Oh, it's a black musician. He's on drugs. What else can we expect..."
“…… To understand how the film encounters these racist ideas, we must pay attention to the fact that it may lead people to ignore the idea that domestic violence is actually a bigger social problem, because... "
"One of the messages is that these are black celebrities, there is a white audience on the screen, oh my God, look at what these black people, as the audience we should want, have done to each other..."
"There's a scene where Ike is abusing Tina in the dining car - the scene of the cake - and a white mother with her children, all of whom have this horrible look on their faces."
"I think the film is very complicated in terms of race and class," Shaw said



**Something goes wrong**
“This causes no conflict for Scientologists.”Cruise’s rep had no comment.”
“At the time an insider told Us Holmes didn t want her daughter raised in Scientology and homeschooled by church teachers She wanted Suri to go to a normal school with regular kids In the years since NYC based Holmes and Suri have since been excommunicated from Cruise s life...”
“Multiple sources reveal in the new issue of Us Weekly that Tom Cruise has had essentially “no contact” with the 10-year-old daughter he shares with ex-wife Katie Holmes.”
““Tom hasn’t seen or even called Suri in about three years,” claims a family source.”
“Alleges another insider, “Tom has no relationship with Suri.”In fact, the last time Cruise, 54, and his youngest daughter were photographed publicly was in August 2012, when he took her to Disney’s Typhoon Lagoon Water Park in Lake Buena Vista, Florida.”
“(Cruise has two older children, Connor, 21, and Isabella, 23, with his second ex-wife, Nicole Kidman.)”
“Holmes, 37, and Cruise, a devout Scientologist, began dating in the spring of 2005 and announced their engagement that June.”
“They welcomed Suri the following April, and tied the knot in front of more than 150 guests at a lavish wedding at the 15th-century Odescalchi Castle in Bracciano, Italy, on November 18, 2006.”
“Six years later, in June 2012, Holmes filed for divorce.”
“...because of his religion according to the family source...”


"It won't cause conflict in Scientology." A representative of cruise did not comment
"At that time, an insider told us that Holmes didn't want her daughter to grow up in Scientology and receive the education of church teachers at home. She wanted Suri to go to normal school with ordinary children in the years after Holmes and Suri were expelled from the cruise Church in New York..."
According to a number of sources in the new issue of us weekly, Tom Cruise's 10-year-old daughter shared with his ex-wife Katie Holmes has basically "no contact"
"Tom hasn't seen Suri for three years and hasn't even called her," a family source said
Another person familiar with the matter said, "Tom has nothing to do with Suri." In fact, the last time cruise, 54, and his little daughter were photographed in public was in August 2012, when he took her to Disney Typhoon Lagoon Water Park in Lake Buena Vista, Florida
(cruise has two older children, Connor, 21, Isabella, 23, and his second ex-wife, Nicole Kidman.)
Sherlock Holmes, 37, and a devout Scientologist, cruise, began dating in the spring of 2005 and announced their engagement in June
They met Suri in April of the next year, and on November 18, 2006, they held a grand wedding in the 15th century odescacci castle in Bracciano, Italy, and married in front of more than 150 guests
"Six years later, in June 2012, Holmes filed for divorce."
“… Because his religion is based on family origin... "



Number  170
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Stewart told that the tabloid’s adoption claim is 100 percent “not true.””
“The actress and model have been dating for less than five months, but according to OK!, the two are already planning to wed.”
“Considering Kristen’s melodramatic love life in 2016.”
“It was thought Kristen Stewart, Stella Maxwell could have their relationship to only Spring.”
“As Stella was considered as Winter-to-Spring Girlfriend.”
“It was thought Kristen would have someone new by the summer.”
“But look!”
“They’re still together.”
“Kristen Stewart, Stella Maxwell NOT In Toxic RelationshipKristen Stewart and Stella Maxwell do NOT have a toxic relationship, despite a false tabloid report.”
“Gossip Cop can exclusively correct this claim.”


Stewart said the tabloid's adoption statement was 100 percent "untrue"
"The date between the actress and the model is less than five months, but according to OK! They have planned to get married
"Considering Christine's dramatic love life in 2016."
"People think that Kristen Stewart and Stella Maxwell may only have something to do with spring."
"Stella is considered a girlfriend from winter to spring."
"Some people think Christine will have a new man in the summer."
"But look!"
"They're still together."
"Kristen Stewart, Stella Maxwell has no toxic relationship. Kristen Stewart and Stella Maxwell have no toxic relationship, despite a false tabloid report."
"The gossip police can completely correct this statement."



Number  171
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Jenner, who voted for President Trump, has previously said that though she backs the GOP, she will “come after” anyone who does not support LGBT rights.”
“Thank you," he added.”
“"Our military must be focused on decisive and overwhelming victory and cannot be burdened with the tremendous medical costs and disruption that transgender in the military would entail.”
““After consultation with my Generals and military experts, please be advised that the United States Government will not accept or allow Transgender individuals to serve in any capacity in the U.S. Military," Trump tweeted.”
“He said he made the decision after consulting with “generals and military experts.”Last year, the Obama administration lifted the previous ban, allowing transgender troops to serve openly.”
“...https://t.co/WzjypVC8Sr — Caitlyn Jenner (@Caitlyn_Jenner) July 26, 2017ADVERTISEMENTTrump on Wednesday tweeted that he would ban transgender people from any military service.”
“What happened to your promise to fight for them?”
“Jenner quoted a June 2016 Trump tweet where he thanked the LGBT community and said he will “fight for you while Hillary brings in more people that will threaten your freedoms and beliefs.”There are 15,000 patriotic transgender Americans in the US military fighting for all of us.”
“What happened to your promise to fight for them?” Jenner tweeted.”
““There are 15,000 patriotic transgender Americans in the US military fighting for all of us.”


"Jenna voted for president trump, and she had previously said that although she supported the Republican Party, she would" pursue "anyone who did not support LGBT rights."
"Thank you," he added
"Our army must focus on decisive and overwhelming victory, and cannot afford the huge medical costs and damage caused by transsexuals in the army."
"After consulting with my general and military experts, please note that the U.S. government will not accept or allow transsexuals to serve in the U.S. military in any capacity," trump tweeted
He said he made the decision after consulting "generals and military experts.". Last year, the Obama administration lifted the previous ban, allowing transgender soldiers to serve openly
“... https://t.co/WzjypVC8Sr- Caitlin Jenner (@ Caitlyn)_ On Wednesday, trump tweeted that he would ban transgender people from doing any military service. "
"What happened to your promise to fight for them?"
"Jenner quoted a tweet from Trump in June 2016, in which he expressed his gratitude to the LGBT community and said that he would" fight for you, and Hillary would bring more people to threaten your freedom and faith. " There are 15000 patriotic transgender Americans in the U.S. military fighting for all of us. "
"What happened to your promise to fight for them? "Jenner tweeted."
"There are 15000 patriotic transgender Americans in the U.S. military fighting for all of us."



Number  172
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“It wasn’t until June 2018, that they decided to rekindle their romance.”
“While JB and Hailey haven’t been hiding from cameras since their engagement, this is the first time we’re seeing her without the rock JB proposed with on July 7.”
“Are Justin Bieber and Hailey Baldwin already married just 3 weeks after getting engaged?”
“Is that a wedding band?”
“— See the photo that has fans going wild!”
“Could it be true?”
“— Are Justin Bieber, 24, and Hailey Baldwin, 21, really married just three weeks after getting engaged?”
“While nothing has been confirmed, the proof could be in this picture of JB and Hailey, where she appears to be wearing a diamond wedding band instead of her massive engagement ring.”
“The singer and model were spotted out in New York City on Monday, July 30, when fans noticed she was wasn’t wearing the custom-oval diamond JB proposed with just weeks ago.”
“The pair put on a PDA show when they stepped out in NYC, however, fans flocked to Hailey’s ring finger.”


"It wasn't until June 2018 that they decided to rekindle the relationship."
"Although JB and Hailey haven't dodged the camera since they got engaged, this is the first time we've seen her without the rock music that JB proposed on July 7."
"Did Justin Bieber and Haley Baldwin get married three weeks after their engagement?"
"Is that a wedding ring?"
"- look at that picture that drives fans crazy!"
"Is that true?"
Did Justin Bieber, 24, and Haley Baldwin, 21, really get married three weeks after their engagement? "
"It hasn't been confirmed yet, but the evidence may be in this picture of JB and Haley, who seems to be wearing a diamond wedding ring instead of her huge engagement ring."
"Fans found the singer and model in New York on Monday, July 30, when they found out she wasn't wearing the custom OVAL DIAMOND proposed by JB a few weeks ago."
"They had a handheld show in New York, but fans flocked to Haley's ring finger."



Number  173
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“The 25-year-old says the song was written with her hit TV drama 13 Reasons Why in mind.”
“She gave fans a taste of her new music by dropping Back to you on May 10, and quickly cleared up speculation suggesting the song is about her on-off romance with former boyfriend Justin Bieber.”
“The singer is currently in the process of “finishing up” the third album and is yet to decide its release date.”
“I wanted it to be great, and had I not waited a good year or two, I wouldn’t have had the best songs I’ve ever had,” said Gomez.”
“So I waited.”
““I was really happy with Revival, but at the same time, I was terrified of doing another record because, for me, it could be like it was a step down or I needed to beat that record, and I think every artist kind of struggles with that.”
““This has been building for maybe two years,” she said during a chat on Apple Music’s Beats 1.”
“The Come & Get It hitmaker’s second solo album was released in 2015 and the star admits she’s found it harder than ever to complete the follow-up, reports aceshowbiz.com.”
“Singer Selena Gomez has delayed her third album as she fears recording a flop in the shadow of her hit track Revival.”


"The 25-year-old said the song was written with her hit TV series 13 whys."
"She came back to you on May 10 to let fans appreciate her new music and quickly clarified the speculation that the song was about her off and on relationship with her ex boyfriend Justin Bieber."
"The singer is currently" finishing "her third album and has not yet decided on a release date."
"I hope it's a great song and I wouldn't have the best song if I hadn't waited a year or two," Gomez said
"So I wait."
"I'm really happy with Renaissance, but at the same time, I'm afraid to make another record, because to me, it may be like a step back, or I need to break that record, and I think every artist will fight for it."
"It's been around for about two years," she said in a chat with beats1, an apple music company
According to reports, "come & get it hitmaker's second solo album was released in 2015, and the star admitted that she found it more difficult than ever to complete the follow-up work aceshowbiz.com Website. "
"Singer Serena Gomez delayed her third album because she was worried about failing to record in the shadow of her revival of hit songs."



Number  174
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Written by Mark Fleetwood...”
“Only with the help of Reggie, an older neighborhood friend with whom Jim "picked up a game" now and then, is he able to begin the long journey back to sanity.”
“He can't go home and his only escape from the reality of the streets is heroin for which he steals, robs and prostitutes himself.”
“Soon, the dark streets of New York become a refuge from his mother's mounting concern for her son.”
“...dream of becoming a basketball star...”
“A best friend who is dying of leukemia a coach Swifty who takes unacceptable liberties with the boys on his team teenage sexual angst and an unhealthy appetite for heroin all of these begin to encroach on young Jim s...”
“As a member of a seemingly unbeatable high school basketball squad, Jim's life centers around the basketball court and the court becomes a metaphor for the world in his mind.”
“Film adaptation of street tough Jim Carroll's epistle about his kaleidoscopic free fall into the harrowing world of drug addiction.”


"By Mark Fleetwood..."
"It's only with Reggie's help that Jim can begin his long journey to sanity. Reggie is an old friend of his neighbor, and Jim "plays games" with him occasionally
"He can't go home. The only thing he can escape from the street is the heroin he stole, robbed and whored."
"Soon, the dark streets of New York became a refuge for his mother's growing concern for her son."
“… Dream of becoming a basketball star... "
"A good friend who died of leukemia, a quick decision coach who took an unacceptable attitude towards the team's children, teenagers' sexual anxiety and unhealthy appetite for heroin, all of which began to erode young Jim s."
"As a seemingly invincible member of the high school basketball team, Jim's life is centered on the basketball court, which has become a metaphor for the world in his mind."
"The film is adapted from the letter of the street tough Jim Carroll, about his kaleidoscope like freedom falling into the heartbreaking world of drug addiction."



Number  175
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Get extra saving money tips with The Sun Vouchers including discounts and voucher codes for PrettyLittleThing and other Fashion line retailers.”
“Justin appeared to confirm the rumours during an interview with The Bert Show that year.”
“Her ex is currently dating Sofia Richie, who she is now close to despite an alleged rocky start between them when the model first began seeing Scott.”
“Kourtney previously had an on-off relationship with Scott Disick, the father of her three children, which spanned from 2006-2015 and involved three break-ups.”
“They were first snapped together as they left a hotel in Paris in December 2016.”
“The pair made a rare appearance in public in May 2017 and reportedly started dating in October 2016.”
“Kourtney split from her boyfriend Younes Bendjima (a boxer and model from Algeria) in August 2018 following an 18 month romance.”
“Who is she dating now?”
“4 Kourtney is close to younger sisters Kim and Khloe Credit: Getty - ContributorWhen did Kourtney Kardashian split from Younes Bendjima?”
“In 2017, Kourtney launched her first solo fashion line as part of a collaboration with the site PrettyLittleThing.”


"Use sun coupons for additional savings tips, including discounts and coupon codes for prettylittle thing and other fashion brand retailers."
"Justin seemed to confirm these rumors in an interview with the Burt show."
"Her ex girlfriend is currently dating Sophia Ritchie, and although the relationship between the two was a little volatile when the model first met Scott, she is now very close to Sophia Ritchie."
"Courtney previously had an off and on relationship with the father of three, Scott disc, which involved three breakups from 2006 to 2015."
"They were photographed together for the first time when they left a hotel in Paris in December 2016."
"The two made a rare public appearance in May 2017 and are reported to have started dating in October 2016."
"Kurtni and her boyfriend younes benjima (a boxer and model from Algeria) broke up in August 2018 after 18 months of love."
"Who is she dating now?"
"4 Courtney and sister Kim and Chloe are close: when did Getty - funder Courtney Kardashian break up with yones bengima?"
"In 2017, Kourtney launched her first personal fashion collection as part of her collaboration with prettylittle thing."



Number  176
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“MORE : Sorry, guys – Kylie Jenner hasn’t gone into labourMORE : Kendall Jenner wants to become fashion designer while sister Kylie ‘prepares for baby’”
“It was thought that the Kylie had gone into labour on Saturday 13 January, sending fans wild over the idea that baby Jenner was about to enter the world.”
“The 20-year-old’s alleged due date is edging ever closer, and the star is said to be using her last few days of freedom to spend time with boyfriend and supposed baby daddy Travis.”
“This will no doubt be of some relief to fans of the pair, who were rumoured to be splitting at the end of last year.”
“Speaking to Radar Online, an insider claimed Travis Scott, 25, told Kylie he ‘can’t do this anymore’.”
“Kylie seems to be housebound due to her alleged pregnancy Picture Instagram The source added He finally plucked up the courage to tell Kylie he s done that he loves her and will always be around for the baby but they re not compatible as a couple Advertisement Advertisement But...”
“...now another source has come forward and said that not only are they still together but they re enjoying some well needed alone time together...”
“‘Travis has got a few weeks break from his tour right now, so she’s getting to spend some time with him which is great,’ the latest insider told Hollywood Life.”
“It s been super tough having him away throughout the pregnancy but she knows that s part and parcel of dating a musician Travis Scott is rumoured to be taking a break from his tour to spend time with Kylie Picture WireImage Well we bet it s not easy to...”
“...see your boyf when you literally can t leave the house because you re alleged baby bump is going to get papped...”


"More: sorry guys - Kelly Jenner hasn't entered the labor market yet. More: Kendall Jenner wants to be a fashion designer, while sister Kelly "prepares for the baby."
"People think Kelly gave birth on Saturday, January 13, which makes fans furious about the idea that baby Jenna is about to enter the world."
"The 20-year-old's due date is getting closer and closer, and it is said that the star will use her free time in her last few days to be with her boyfriend and so-called little dad Travis."
"It's going to be a relief for the fans of the two. There was a rumor at the end of last year that they were going to break up."
"One insider told radar online that Travis Scott, 25, told Kelly he" can't do this anymore. "
"Kelly seems to be trapped at home because of her so-called pregnancy photo instagram source added that he finally plucked up the courage to tell Kelly that he did, he loved her and would always be around the baby, but they were not suitable for advertising as a couple, but..."
“… Now another source has come forward and said that they are not only still together, but also enjoying some much-needed solitude together... "
"Travis has a few weeks off now, so it's good that she's going to spend some time with him," the latest insider told Hollywood life
"It's very difficult to get him to leave during pregnancy, but she knows it's part of a date with musician Travis Scott, who is said to be taking a break from the tour and spending time with Kelly shadow. We bet it's not easy... "
“… When you see your boyfriend, you really can't leave home because you're accused of getting slapped in the face of a baby lump... "



**Something goes wrong**
“"I love to cook.”
“Getty ImagesThey like the quiet lifeAside from the odd red carpet appearance, the couple, who live in New York, like to keep a low profile.”
“It came just six months after their relationship was first reported.”
“The relationship moved quicklyIn June 2011, it was confirmed that Craig and Weisz had married in New York with just four guests present, including his daughter and her son.”
“Despite rumours of their romance and a few paparazzi photographs of the co-stars together, both denied their relationship.”
“They made headlines in November that year when Weisz split from her partner of nine years, Darren Aronofsky.”
“They played a married couple, with tabloids reporting that there was a chemistry between the actors on set in Canada.”
“Getty ImagesTheir romance reportedly started on a film setIn 2010, the thriller Dream House brought the two together.”
“Rachel Weisz and Daniel Craig at a screening of ’Enduring Love’ in New York, September 2004.”
“Their son was born in 2006.”


"I love cooking."
"The image of Getty. They like quiet life. Apart from the strange red carpet appearance, the New York couple like to keep a low profile."
"Just six months after their relationship was first reported."
Craig and Witz married in New York in June 2011, when only four guests were present, including his daughter and son
"Despite rumors that they were in love and several paparazzi co stars, both denied the affair."
"In November of that year, Weiss broke up with his partner of nine years, Darren Aronofsky, and they made headlines."
"They play a married couple, and the tabloids report that there's a chemical reaction between actors on set in Canada."
According to reports, the love affair began with a 2010 film set, and the thriller "dream house" connects the two
"In September 2004, Rachel Weiss and Daniel Craig took part in the screening of lasting love in New York."
"Their son was born in 2006."



Number  178
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“...choice as she was on the verge of being expelled for her ethical lapses Pouw said...”
““It was a wedding of the century it was like, ‘where s Shelly?”
“...her three decades in Scientology and why she decided to leave...”
“Subscribe now for this exclusive interview full of explosive new details, only in PEOPLE!”
“Leah Remini says attending the wedding of Tom Cruise and Katie Holmes ended up not being a fairytale for the Kings of Queens actress.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
“In a revealing new interview, the actress spoke with 20/20 about her new tell-all book, Troublemaker: Surviving Hollywood and Scientology, in which she discusses her separation from Scientology.”
“Remini, 45, said that the Church of Scientology invited her to Cruise’s 2006 wedding in Italy, and she was asked to invite her friend Jennifer Lopez and Lopez’s then-husband Marc Anthony.”
“Remini claimed that during the three-day wedding, Church of Scientology officials attempted to separate her from Lopez.”
““They were trying to extract me,” she said.”


“… She is about to be fired because of her moral mistakes, Puyu said
"It's a century wedding, like" where's Shirley? "
“… Her 30 years in Scientology and why she decided to leave... "
"Now subscribe to this interview full of explosive new details, only for people!"
"Leah ramini said that going to Tom Cruise and Katie Holmes' wedding is not the Queen's fairy tale in the end."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
In a recent interview, the actress gives a 20 / 20 account of her new book, troublemakers: Surviving Hollywood and Scientology, in which she discusses her separation from Scientology
"The 45 year old said she was invited to cruise's wedding in Italy in 2006 by the Church of Scientology. She was invited to invite her friend, Jennifer Lopez, and her then husband, Mark Antony."
Ramini claimed that at the three-day wedding, church officials in Scientology tried to separate her from Lopez
"They wanted to get me out," she said



Number  179
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Following a fireworks spectacle, they would sneak off together after 11 p.m. for some alone time.”
“...falls into place He continued You have Windsor Castle in the background the sun is setting just over the top of Windsor Castle behind them it is just the most serene beautiful light...”
“Prince Harry and Duchess Meghan were up for hours on their wedding day, so it’s not surprising that they were a bit tired before they even hit up the evening reception.”
“After their first post-ceremony gathering, which was hosted by Queen Elizabeth II, the couple posed alone for photographer Alexi Lubomirski outside.”
“As if that weren’t pressure enough, they only had less than five minutes (seriously, the schedule was tight!)”
“...to get the perfect moment.”
“So after we d done the set up the family shots then we all went to the reception and if the couple were going to have any energy after that we were going to go into the rose garden and...”
“...just take some intimate quick shots Lubomirski explained to reporters on Wednesday May 23”
“So eventually we went out there we had about three and a half minutes to take some pictures because everything was like clockwork and it was just one of the those magical moments when you are a photographer and everything...”
“They are in love, walking around this beautiful garden, and then we walked around for a bit, and then just got pictures of them.”


"After a fireworks show, they'll sneak away together after 11 p.m. for a while."
“… Setting in the right place, he continued, "you have the background of Windsor Castle. The sun is setting on the top of Windsor Castle behind them. It's the most peaceful and beautiful light..."
"Prince Harry and Duchess Megan had been up for hours on their wedding day, so it's not surprising that they were a little tired before the evening reception."
After the first wedding party hosted by Queen Elizabeth II, the couple posed for photographer Alexis lubomirsky outside alone
"It seems that the pressure is not enough. They only have less than five minutes (seriously, the schedule is very tight!)"
"For the perfect moment"
"So after we took a complete picture of our family, we all went to the reception. If the couple still had energy after that, we would go to the rose garden, and then..."
“…… On Wednesday, May 23, lubomirsky explained to reporters, "just take a few intimate snapshots."
"So in the end we went there, and we had about three and a half minutes to take some pictures, because everything was like clockwork, and when you were a photographer, it was just one of those magical moments, everything..."
"They fell in love and took a walk in this beautiful garden. Then we took a walk for a while, and then we got their pictures."



Number  180
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“For the biggest celebrity news stories of the day, controversies, crime, and other hot topics listen to our new podcast ‘All Rise’ below!”
“Email us at tips@radaronline.com, or call us at (866) ON-RADAR (667-2327) any time, day or night.”
“Tristan Slaps Khloe With Nasty List Of Demands As She Decides To Stay In Toxic Relationship Thompson is in the driver s seat after cheating on baby mama Kardashian...”
“Tristan Thompson has slapped Khloe Kardashian with a shocking list of demands after his explosive cheating scandal, RadarOnline.com learned exclusively.”
“The NBA star amped up his controlling behavior “in return for staying in Khloe’s life in the long-term,” spilled a family insider.”
““Tristan continues to insist he’s done nothing wrong, and blames Khloe’s family for exaggerating his womanizing and trying to ruin his reputation.”Thompson refused to back down as confused Kardashian continued to struggle with her decision of whether to stay or leave her cheating baby daddy.”
““He’s willing to walk away, but Khloe’s desperate to work this out, so Tristan’s in the driving seat right now.”Ultimatums were set for the KUWTK star on the heels of his infidelity.”
““He’s agreed to stick around for now, but only if the family stops spreading stories, and he gets cut into Khloe’s portion of profits for the show,” the source added.”
““He wants Khloe to let him see True any time he wants and insists she should fly out to meet him where he is,” said the insider.”
““He can’t just jump on a plane to L.A. when he’s got a game coming up.”“What’s really galling here is Tristan’s ‘you owe me’ attitude.”


"For today's hottest celebrity news, controversy, crime and other hot topics, please listen to our new podcast" all up "!"
"Email us tips@radaronline.com , or call the (866) radar (667-2327) at any time. "
"Tristan slapped Chloe with a lot of annoying demands because she decided to continue a toxic relationship. Thompson was in the driver's seat after cheating Kardashian's mother..."
"Tristan Thompson gave him a shocking list of demands after Kardashian's cheating scandal, RadarOnline.com The website is dedicated to learning. "
"The NBA star strengthened his control behavior in return for his long stay in Khloe's life," a family insider said
"Tristan continued to insist that he had done nothing wrong and accused colo's family of exaggerating his feminism and trying to ruin his reputation." Thompson refused to give in because the confused Kardashian continued to struggle to decide whether to stay or leave her cheating baby dad
"He's willing to leave, but Chloe can't wait to solve the problem, so Tristan is in the driver's seat now." Kutek's star gave an ultimatum after cheating
"He agreed to stay for a while, but only if the family stopped spreading the story and he would take a share of the profits from Khloe's show," the source added
"He wanted Khloe to show him the truth at all times and insisted that she should fly to where he was to meet him," the person said
"When he has a game to play, he can't just jump on the plane and go to Los Angeles." "What's really annoying is Tristan's' you owe me 'attitude."



Number  181
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“See more bio…”
“Caitlyn Jenner is well known in the world as Bruce Jenner came out as a transgender woman in April 2015.”
“...messages...”
“She s definitely worried about the age gap he s only 37 but he s got a pile of kids and is very open about his attraction to trans women Although Caitlyn has got the fear that she is not his type but Mack has been replying to all the...”
“According to one of the insider,“Cait’s got her heart set on finding the perfect man to date and Yusaf ticks every box.”
“As per another source, Caitlyn and Mack have been catching up for a dinner.”
“Walking a short through the personal life of the former boxer Mack has 10 children who appeared in gay porn.”
“Generally, the story started from some uncertified site, who said that Jenner is “on the prowl” and wants to “sink her claws” into Mack.”
“So going to the news, the story is a complete lie or not.”
“Mack is a former boxer turned gay porn star.”


"See more profiles..."
"Caitlin Jenner is famous for Bruce Jenner's appearance as a transgender woman in April 2015."
“… Message... "
"Of course, she is worried about the age gap. He is only 37 years old, but he has a lot of children and is very open. He is attractive to cross women. Although Caitlin has fears, she is not his type, but Mike has been answering all the time..."
According to one person familiar with the matter, "Kate is determined to find the perfect man to date, while Yusuf checks every box."
"Another source said Caitlin and Mike were on their way to dinner."
"A short walk in the personal life of former boxer Mike, who has 10 children in gay porn."
Generally speaking, the story starts with some unconfirmed websites, which say that Jenner is "sneaking" to put his paw into Mike
"So go to the news and see if the story is a complete lie."
"Mike used to be a boxer and then a gay porn star."



Number  182
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“He’s been my lover and my friend for a really long time,” adding that there’s “a lot on this record inspired by our relationship.” But asked if she would be happy if Kinney started dating again, she said, “I’m not going to f - - king throw a party!””
““He’s told her he’s planning to visit her in Philly; maybe as soon as this weekend.”Gaga — whose new album, “Joanne” was released on Friday — said on Howard Stern’s Sirius XM show on Monday, “I’m actually very close to Taylor.”
““Alanna is head over heels,” we’re told.”
“Kinney and DiGiovanni recently visited Austin, Texas, together to attend the Formula One race and Taylor Swift concert, and we’re told DiGiovanni has visited him in Chicago, where he shoots the NBC show.”
“Jefferson University Hospital...”
“Insiders say that Kinney has been quietly dating a 26 year old girl from South Philadelphia Alanna DiGiovanni and unlike his ex s alter ego we re told she s not a Fame Monster DiGiovanni is a former Atlantic City bottle service waitress who now works in radiology at Thomas...”
“But Page Six is told that the “Chicago Fire” actor — who was engaged to Gaga for 18 months until their July split — has already moved on.”
“The singer said on Monday that she still loves ex-fiancé Taylor Kinney and joked she won’t be celebrating when he starts to date again.”
“Click to email this to a friend (Opens in new window)We hate to be the bearer of bad news for Lady Gaga.”


"He's been my lover and friend for a long time," she added. "There's a lot of inspiration on this record from our relationship." But when asked if Ginny would be happy if she started dating again, she said, "I'm not going to f-king for a party!"
"He told her that he planned to visit her in Philadelphia; maybe as soon as this weekend." Gaga's new album "Joanne" was released on Friday and said on Howard Stern's Sirius XM show on Monday, "I'm actually close to Taylor."
We were told, "Alana is a complete human being."
"Ginny and DiGiovanni recently visited Austin, Texas, for Formula One racing and Taylor Swift concerts. We heard that DiGiovanni visited him in Chicago, where he filmed NBC shows."
"Jefferson University Hospital..."
"Insiders say Ginny has been quietly dating Alana digiovani, a 26 year old girl from southern Philadelphia. Unlike her predecessor, we were told that she is not a famous monster. Digiovani is a former bottle maid in Atlantic City and now works in the radiology department in Thomas..."
"But page six was told that the hero of the Chicago Fire - who was engaged to Gaga for 18 months until they broke up in July - had left."
"The singer said Monday that she still loved her ex fiance Tyler Ginny and joked that she would not celebrate when he started dating again."
"Click to send this email to a friend (open in a new window) and we hate to be the bearer of Lady Gaga's bad news."



**Something goes wrong**
“Please visit the source responsible for the item in question to report any concerns you may have regarding content or accuracy.”
“The news articles, Tweets, and blog posts do not represent IMDb's opinions nor can we guarantee that the reporting therein is completely factual.”
“This content is published for the entertainment of our users only.”
“According to the accompanying story, “Cankle-clad Kim Kardashian is gearing up […]IMDb.com, Inc. takes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, Tweets, or blog posts.”
“Inside Kim’s Secret Plastic Surgery Plan To Cure Her Cankles,” RadarOnline is dramatically blaring.”
““Kardashian In Crisis!”
“But Gossip Cop has exclusively learned the truth.”
“That’s what a certain webloid wants readers to believe.”
“Is Kim Kardashian having plastic surgery to “cure” her cankles?”


"Please visit the person in charge of the relevant project and report any concerns about content or accuracy."
"News articles, tweets and blog posts don't represent IMDB's opinions, and we can't guarantee that the reports in them are completely true."
"This content is published just to entertain our users."
"According to the attached story," the bumpy dressed Kim kardashan is preparing [...] ] IMDb.com , Inc. assumes no responsibility for the content or accuracy of the above news articles, tweets or blog posts. "
"In Kim's Secret plastic surgery program to cure her ulcer," radaronline is dramatic and jarring
"Kardashian is in danger!"
"But the gossip is that the police only know the truth."
"That's exactly what a webworm wants readers to believe."
Is Kim Kardashian having plastic surgery to "cure" her ulcer



Number  184
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Everyone’s hoping this poker thing is just a phase.””
““They wish Dave would stick to skiing and fishing.”
““Dave’s trying to enjoy life a little by picking up new hobbies, but gambling isn’t what his old friends had in mind,” tattled the source.”
“Yet pals, worried about his decades-long battle with booze, fear Dave could end up flat broke like ‘NYPD Blue’ creator David Milch — who gambled away a staggering $100 million!”
“Dave — who made headlines in 2009 after a $2 million extortion attempt led the married comic to admit to multiple affairs with staffers — insisted his poker playing is not a problem, added the insider.”
“...player who hosted a regular card party at his Malibu home during the 1970s and 80s...”
“He might be worth 400 million but those guys will have no hesitation in cleaning him out David Letterman Bald Bearded Being A Dad Dave s lifelong idol and mentor late Tonight Show icon Johnny Carson was a legendary poker...”
““Dave’s totally out of his league with them.”
““Those guys are as close to professional players as you can get,” spilled the source.”
“...he should cool his jets warned the source...”


"Everyone wants poker to be just a stage."
"They want Dave to keep skiing and fishing."
"Dave is trying to enjoy life by developing new hobbies, but gambling is not what his old friends want," the source said
However, my friends are worried about Dave's decades of struggle with alcoholism, and that he will end up like David milch, the creator of New York Police Department blue - he has lost an amazing $100 million
"Dave made the headlines in 2009 because of a $2 million blackmail attempt, which led the married comedian to admit to having multiple affairs with employees," the person said. "Dave insists that playing poker is not a problem."
“… Players who had a regular card party at Malibu's home in the 1970s and 1980s... "
"He may be worth 400 million, but those guys won't hesitate to get rid of him. David Letterman's bald beard is his father's lifelong idol and mentor. Later tonight's show icon Johnny Carson is a legendary poker..."
"Dave is totally out of group with them."
"Those guys are as close as possible to professional players," the source revealed
“… He should cool his jet, warning sources... "



Number  185
Source test case:  ['Satire']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Let us know in the comments section.”
“"The timing of these things is all-important."”
“While the British family have confirmed a third baby is on the way, fans are curious to know when the engagement news will be announced.”
“Rumour has it that Meghan Markle has met the Queen and is preparing to relocate to London soon.”
“The engagement news is expected to come anytime soon.”
“But a report suggests it's being pushed back due to Middleton's pregnancy.”
“Also Read: Prince Harry-Meghan Markle engagement: Suits actress begins relocation to London?”
“According to sources of Life & Style, Prince Harry had to put a hold on the announcement because all eyes were on Middleton's third baby and he wants all attention on Markle when the announcement is made.”
“"Harry had hoped to officially announce his engagement to Meghan shortly after they returned from their three-week holiday in Botswana at the end of August," a source told the magazine.”
“But, "Kate's pregnancy has overshadowed everything else," another insider shared.”


"Please let us know in the comments section."
"The timing of these things is very important."
"Although British families have confirmed that a third child will be born soon, fans would like to know when the engagement will be announced."
"It is rumored that Megan markel has met the queen and is ready to move to London soon."
"The news of the engagement is expected to come soon."
"But a report showed it was delayed because Middleton was pregnant."
Another read: Prince Harry's engagement to Megan markel: does the actress in the suit start moving to London? "
Prince Harry had to postpone the announcement because all his eyes were on Middleton's third child and he wanted to focus on mark when announcing the news, according to a life and fashion source
A source told the magazine: "Harry had hoped to announce his engagement to Megan shortly after the end of August when he returned from his three week vacation in Botswana."
"But," another insider shared, "Kate's pregnancy eclipses everything else."



Number  186
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“She was even photographed entering the actor’s house, further confirming Affleck was not getting back together with his ex-wife.”
“He wants to be with Jen,” the source said, adding, “Ben wants to be a family again and is thrilled that Jen agrees.”
“The rumor was started after a latest issue of OK!”
“Magazine published an article titled, “Jen & Ben Back Together!” In the article, the publication quoted an anonymous source saying Garner has “agreed to give their marriage another shot” after “convincing” her estranged husband to go back to rehab to treat his alcohol addiction.”
“The source further said she promised him if he gets sober they ll renew their vows in a private yet romantic ceremony and become a family again This was because Garner reportedly can t let go and has always wanted to stick it out because she loves him and feels...”
“...she owes it to her kids to make things work with their dad And this was not all...”
“The tipster went onto say the romantic promise from the “Elektra” actress acted as the much-needed motivation Affleck was looking for to get sober again.”
““Ben realized that he’s no good on his own and that he wants his old life back.”
“He s telling friends he finally got his wife back Lastly to drive the rumor home the publication claimed Garner was already preparing to get back together with her estranged husband as she was seen bringing some of Ben s belongings back over to her house However Gossip Cop pointed...”
“Moreover, a confidante close to Garner told Gossip Cop any claim of the couple getting back together was “total lies.”Besides, Affleck was spotted with Playboy model Shauna Sexton several times over the past weeks, leaving restaurants together.”


"She was even photographed entering the actor's home, further confirming that Affleck was not reunited with his ex-wife."
"He wanted to be with Jane," the source said, adding that "he wanted to be a family again, and she agreed."
"The rumor started after the latest issue of OK!"
The magazine published an article entitled "Jane and Ben make up again! "In the article, the publication quoted an anonymous source as saying that Ghana" agreed to give their marriage another shot "after" Persuading "separated husbands to return to the drug treatment center for treatment of alcohol addiction
"The source further said that she assured him that if he was sober, they would take the oath again at a private but romantic ceremony and become a family again, because it was reported that Ghana could not let go and always wanted to stick to it, because she loved him and felt that..."
“… She owes the children, let them work with Dad, that's not all... "
The informant went on to say that the romantic promise of the "Elektra" actress is the urgent driving force for Affleck to regain consciousness
"Ben realized that he was not good on his own. He wanted to go back to his old life."
"He told his friends that he finally let his wife come back, and finally drove the rumors home. The publication claimed that Ghana was ready to reunite with her separated husband, because she was seen taking some of Ben's things back to her home, no matter what the gossip police pointed out..."
In addition, a confidant close to Ghana told gossip police that any statement about their reunion was "a complete lie.". In addition, Affleck has been found with Playboy model Shauna Sexton several times in the past few weeks, leaving the restaurant together



Number  187
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““I can’t express to you how traumatizing that moment is [when your friends and family leave the hospital] and then you wake up drugged the f— out.”When asked if he’s currently on medications, the rapper said, “Most definitely.””
“Image zoom Kanye West and Kim Kardahian West Credit Pascal Le Segretain Getty A source previously told PEOPLE that despite West s tweet storm For the rest of the family things are going on normally A second source also confirmed to PEOPLE that nobody including his wife has altered their...”
“...but still concerned about his recent outbursts...”
“A source tells PEOPLE that the reality star, 37, is doing her best to protect husband Kanye West since the rapper, 40, made controversial remarks on Twitter and in new interviews over the past week.”
“Get push notifications with news, features and more.”
““Kanye is the most amazing person when he’s not acting like this.”
“But when he gets manic, it’s really hard for everyone around him,” the insider says.”
““Kim is absolutely worried about him right now, but she will defend him publicly to the end.”
“She s a very loyal wife and her tweets and everything she s been saying is definitely very calculated to help Kanye Kardashian West defended her husband in a series of tweets of her own arguing that reports labeling him as having mental health issues for just being himself when...”
“...he has always been expressive are not fair I didn t even know he got his Twitter again until I started seeing tweets coming in from other people retweeting them...”


"I can't express to you how painful the moment was (when your friends and family left the hospital), and then you woke up and drugged f-out." When asked if he was taking medication at the moment, the rapper said, "very sure."
"Image zooming Kanye West and Kim kardahian West credit Pascal Le seggetty a source told people earlier that although West's Twitter storm affected the rest of the family, things were still going on normally, and another source confirmed that no one, including his wife, had changed their lives..."
“… But still worried about his recent outburst... "
"A source told people that the 37 year old reality star is doing his best to protect her husband, Kanye West, because the 40 year old rapper has made controversial comments on Twitter and new interviews in the past week."
Get push notifications containing news, features, etc
"When Kanye wasn't like that, he was the greatest man."
"But when he becomes manic, people around him feel bad," the person said
"Kim is absolutely worried about him now, but she will defend him openly to the end."
"She is a very loyal wife. Every word she tweets helps Kanye Kardashian West defend her husband in a series of her own tweets. She thinks that there are reports that he has mental health problems because he is just himself when..."
“…… He has been doing well, which is not fair. I didn't even know he had his own twitter again until I started to see other people forwarding twitter... "



Number  188
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“If that's not the case, we hope for both his sake and the sake of his children that he'll be able to find the help he needs.”
“Hopefully, Pitt's been able to party without getting drunk or high.”
“"Right now Angie holds all the aces in terms of custody, so Brad needs to keep on her good side," says the source.”
“Insiders say he and Jolie have reached a point where they're amicably co-parenting their six children, but that peace is rumored to be tenuous.”
“A relapse, of course, would be devastating not only in terms of Pitt's health and overall well-being, but also with regard to his custody rights.”
“"At this rate, Brad’s heading for a major relapse, and he’s only going to push Angie’s buttons if she thinks Brad’s flirting with Sienna," a source close to the situation tells Radar.”
“According to Radar online, Pitt was "the last man standing" at the Rabbit Hole Club in England on June 23, where he partied until 3 am after spending the day at the Glastonbury Festival.”
“So it's no surprise that friends are said to be concerned by reports that Pitt was recently spotted partying at a nightclub into the wee hours.”
“Anyone who's struggled with addiction can tell you that at the point Pitt's at now, it's a near-constant battle.”
“Of course, his sobriety is still relatively new, and thus, rather fragile.”


"If not, we hope he can find the help he needs for him and his children."
"I hope Pete doesn't get drunk at the party."
"Now Angie has all the trumps in custody, so Brad needs to be on the good side," the source said
"Insiders say he and Julie have come to the point where they are friendly in raising their six children together, but the peace is said to be fragile."
"Of course, the recurrence is devastating not only for Pete's health and overall well-being, but also for his custody."
"At this rate, Brad is heading for a serious relapse and only when Angie thinks Brad is flirting with Siena will he press her button," a person familiar with the matter told radar
According to radar online, Pete was the "last man to stand" at the rabbit hole club in England on June 23. After spending a day at the Glastonbury Festival, he reveled there until 3 a.m
"So it's no surprise that friends are said to be worried about reports that Pete was recently found gathering in a nightclub until early in the morning."
"Anyone struggling with addiction can tell you that in Peter's current situation, it's almost a constant battle."
"Of course, his soberness is relatively new, so he is quite fragile."



Number  189
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“A post shared by Beyoncé (@beyonce) on May 4, 2017 at 11:06am PDT”
“Beyonce’s spokesperson has a message for the site, and she rightfully doesn’t hold back.”
“Many assume that was why she did not attend the Met Gala, because she was simply too pregnant and too tired from carrying the Lemonade Twins to even care.”
“But Beyonce has been out and about, and she’s been active on social media.”
“Last Sunday, Bey and Jay-Z had a date night in LA – they went to the Los Angeles Clippers vs. Utah Jazz game at the Staples Center.”
“Bey and Jay got photographed at the game (sitting courtside) but Beyonce also posted some photos of her $6000-plus Gucci ensemble on her social media.”
“Those Instagram shots were everywhere because… well, Beyonce really looks pregnant (“this time,” I whisper).”
“Even her face looks pregnant (“this time,” I whisper).”
“Her lips are hella swollen, which caused Media Takeout to claim that Bey was getting lip injections during her pregnancy.”
“Well, Beyonce heard about it.”


"Beyonce (@ Beyonce) shared a post at 11:06 am PDT on May 4, 2017"
"Beyonce's spokesperson sent a message to the website, and she said she didn't hide it."
"A lot of people think that's why she didn't go to the met because she was too pregnant, too tired to take care of her lemonade twins."
"But Beyonce has been hanging out, she has been active on social media."
"Last Sunday, bay and Jez had a date night in Los Angeles - they went to the Los Angeles Clippers vs. Utah Jazz game at Staples Center."
"Beyonce and Jay were photographed (sitting on the court) during the match, but Beyonce also posted some pictures of her $6000 plus Gucci ensemble on social media."
"Those instagram photos are everywhere because Well, Beyonce looks really pregnant ("this time," I whispered)
"Even her face looks pregnant." "This time," I whispered. “
"Her lips were so swollen that the media took out that she received lip injections during her pregnancy."
"Well, Beyonce heard."



Number  190
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“But let’s not get ahead of ourselves.”
“A Beyoncé pregnancy would make 2018.”
“We get it.”
“Likewise, as Lili Reinhart, Drew Barrymore, Blac Chyna, and dozens of other celebrities who have fought off pregnancy rumors have proven, bloating is a real thing and assuming that someone is pregnant based on how much their stomach resembles a “baby bump” is dangerous and a form of body-shaming.”
“And until they do, all rumors are speculation.”
“As excited as we would be for another Beyoncé pregnancy, it’s important to note that neither she nor Jay-Z have confirmed anything.”
“Needless to say, the BeyHive is alive with speculation (and worry that Bey might cancel the rest of her tour to go on maternity leave.)”
“...album and their wedding anniversary is on April 4 it makes sense that the couple is expecting their fourth child as fans have noted...”
“The outfit a skin tight gold dress that Beyoncé pairs with a giant cape features a heart on her midsection which many fans believe represents her baby s heartbeat Given Bey and Jay Z s love for the number four 4 44 is the title of Jay Z s last...”
“In addition to Star magazine (a not-so-reliable tabloid, if we’re being honest) reporting that the singer is “over the moon” with her pregnancy, fans are also referencing a tour outfit that they believe is a secret message from Beyoncé herself, proving that she’s pregnant.”


"But let's not surpass ourselves."
"Beyonce's pregnancy will make 2018."
"We get it."
"Similarly, as lily Reinhart, Drew Barrymore, Blake chener and dozens of other celebrities who have resisted pregnancy rumors have proved, abdominal distension is a real thing, and it's a physical shame to assume that someone is pregnant based on how much a baby lump someone's stomach looks like."
"Until they do, all the rumors are speculation."
"While we're excited about Beyonce's pregnancy again, it's important to note that neither she nor Jay-Z has confirmed anything."
"Needless to say, the beys are full of speculation (and worry that bey might cancel the rest of the tour to take maternity leave),"
“… The album and their wedding anniversary are on April 4, and the couple have reason to look forward to their fourth child because fans have noticed... "
"Beyonce wears a tight gold skirt and a huge Cape, and has a heart in her middle abdomen. Many fans think it represents her baby's heartbeat, because Beyonce and Jay Chou's love for No.4 444 is Jay Chou's final title..."
"In addition to Star Magazine (an unreliable tabloid if we are honest) reporting that the singer is pregnant, fans also mentioned a set of touring costumes that they believed were Beyonce's own secret information, proving that she is pregnant."



Number  191
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“Follow The Cheat Sheet on Facebook!”
“The couple spends most of their time together at homeWith only of few photos of them out and about, the couple has gone to great lengths to remain under the radar and one way they do that is by spending time together at home.”
“In 2017 though, the pair were photographed together walking hand in hand along a beach in Malibu, California, and everyone thought then that they were going to be more public with their relationship.”
“But as it turns out, they still don’t want to talk about it.”
“Here’s what we know about the ultra-private couple and why they still refuse to speak publicly about each other.”
“Foxx and Holmes have never confirmed relationshipEven though the cat is out of the bag, Foxx and Holmes have never actually confirmed their relationship.”
“In fact, they did the opposite and denied it on many occasions by pulling the old “just friends” line.”
“So, despite their Labor Day PDA photo, or picture of them grabbing dinner in NYC, or gazing into one another’s eyes at a pre-Grammy event, we shouldn’t expect these two to suddenly do red carpets together anytime soon.”
“Next: Have they kept quiet because of Tom Cruise?”
“Did they stay silent because of a Tom Cruise ban?”


"Follow the memo on Facebook!"
"The couple spend most of their time at home, with only a few pictures of going out, and they spare no effort to keep a low profile, one of which is to stay at home together."
"But in 2017, they were photographed walking hand in hand on a beach in Malibu, California, when everyone thought their relationship would be more open."
"But it turns out that they still don't want to talk about it."
"Here's what we know about this extremely private couple and why they still refuse to talk about each other openly."
"Fox and Holmes have never confirmed their relationship, even if the secret has been leaked, Fox and Holmes have never confirmed their relationship."
"In fact, they are doing the opposite. On many occasions, they deny it by pulling the line of" just friends. "
"So even though they've taken a PDA photo at the beat of labor, or a photo of dinner in New York, or staring into each other's eyes before the Grammy Awards, we shouldn't expect these two people to suddenly walk on the red carpet in the short term."
"Next: are they silent because of Tom Cruise?"
"Are they silent because of Tom Cruise's ban?"



Number  192
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Another invented story!”
“The same source added that ‘George thinks he’s helping but he’s really just making more work for Amal.”
“This is the strange and also the incredibly absurd claim that popped up in one of this week’s new tabloids.”
“Gossip Cop was the one that looked into this situation and let everyone know what they have exclusively found out.”
“Venice ?”
“A post shared by Amal Clooney (@amalclooney) on Sep 3, 2017 at 8:52am PDTThe latest issue of Star magazine includes an article which says that the actor has been doting on his wife and twins since their birth.”
“The twins are Alexander and Ella, and they were born back in June.”
“According to Star’s questionable report, the human rights attorney has been somehow put off by her husband’s devotion to their family.”
“A so-called insider told the same magazine that Amal secretly hopes that the actor will go back to work as soon as possible.”
“Sometimes she jokes it’s like having three kids!’Star’s dubious insider continues, ‘George isn’t coping well with the lack of sleep.”


"Another fictional story!"
"The same source added," George thinks he's helping others, but in fact he's just doing more for Amar. "
"This is a strange and unbelievable absurdity that suddenly appeared in a new tabloid this week."
"The gossip police are the people who investigate the situation and let everyone know what they have found exclusively."
"Venice?"
"Amar Clooney (@ amalclooney) published an article in the latest issue of star magazine at 8:52 a.m. on September 3, 2017, saying that the actor has been doting on his wife and twins since they were born."
"The twins are Alexander and Ella. They were born in June."
"According to sta's suspicious report, the human rights lawyer was somehow dragged down by her husband's loyalty to the family."
"A so-called insider told the same magazine that Amar secretly wanted the actor to go back to work as soon as possible."
"Sometimes she jokes that it's like having three children! The star's suspicious insider went on to say that George didn't deal well with the lack of sleep



Number  193
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“There are so many out there in this world that have demons that they think suicide is the only way out ..."Michelle was 46.”
“If anyone would like to give to the National Suicide Prevention it would also be greatly appreciated.”
“Michelle's mom posted a statement, "...”
“Seven months after they married, Rosie and Michelle adopted their daughter, Dakota, who is now 4 years old.”
“Rosie cited irretrievably broken relationship as the reason for the divorce, which became final in March 2016.”
“They broke up in November 2014 and Rosie filed for divorce in February 2015.”
“Rosie and Michelle started dating in 2011 and got married in a private ceremony in June 2012.”
“My thoughts and prayers go out to Michelle's family, her wife and their child."”
“Mental illness is a very serious issue affecting many families.”
“Rosie tells TMZ ... "I am saddened to hear about this terrible tragedy.”


"There are so many demons in the world who think suicide is the only way out..." Michelle was 46
"We would also be grateful if anyone would be willing to help the country with suicide prevention."
"Michelle's mother made a statement
Seven months after their marriage, Rosie and Michelle adopted their daughter, Dakota, who is now four years old
"Rosie took irreparable emotional breakdown as the reason for her divorce, which became the final result in March 2016."
"They broke up in November 2014, and Rosie filed for divorce in February 2015."
"Rosie and Michelle started dating in 2011 and had a private wedding in June 2012."
"I pray for Michelle's family, her wife and their children."
"Mental illness is a very serious problem affecting many families."
"Rosie told TMZ I'm sorry to hear about this terrible tragedy. "



Number  194
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““She doesn’t like Lindsay and says she’s a bad influence on him.”Added the source: “She’s told him to clean up his act — or stay away from the kids!””
““Jen’s fed up with Ben’s behavior — especially since they agreed to divorce,” a pal snitched.”
“...affair with hard partying Saturday Night Live producer Lindsay Shookus...”
“But the latest blowup comes as no surprise to sources close to the couple both 45 who ve seen Jen suffer through Ben s affair with their kids nanny Christine Ouzounian in 2015 his humiliating public apology to actress Hilarie Burton who accused him of groping her and his current...”
“...lot before they went their separate ways...”
“She only seemed to calm down when Samuel got close to them Jen and Ben also parents to Violet 12 and Seraphina 9 stopped fighting to refocus on co parenting buying Samuel an ice cream cone and walking as a family with their heads down in silence to the parking...”
““Jen emptied out on Ben, and he seemed to be on the defensive,” according to our spy.”
“...riot act loud and clear...”
“She believes he needs to start acting more like a dad and less like a kid Spies on the scene at the Barrington Recreation Center after five year old Samuel s game spilled Garner wasn t restrained by being in public the 13 Going on 30 star read Affleck the...”
““Jen thinks he’s being incredibly childish and selfish,” the source said.”


"She didn't like Lindsay and said she had a bad influence on him," the source added. "She told him to clean up his behavior or stay away from the children!"
"Jane was fed up with Ben's behavior - especially after they agreed to divorce," a friend sneered
“… The affair with live producer Lindsay schokus on Saturday night... "
"But the latest revelations are no surprise to people familiar with the 45 year old couple. In 2015, Jennifer suffered a lot from her extramarital affair with her child, Christine ouzounian. She apologized to actress Hilarie Burton, who accused her of touching her and now..."
“… Before they go their separate ways "
"It was only when Samuel approached them that she seemed to calm down. Jane and Ben were also the parents of Violette 12 and Serafina 9. They stopped fighting and focused on raising their children together again. They bought Samuel an ice cream cone and walked to the parking lot silently with their heads down like a family..."
According to our spy, "Jen tells Ben that he seems to be on the defensive."
“… The riot was loud and clear... "
"She thinks that he needs to start acting more like a father than a child. After the 5-year-old Samuel's game" Savannah "was not restricted by the public, the live spies at the barilton entertainment center, 13 ongoing 30 star read the afflake the..."
"Zhan thinks he's incredibly naive and selfish," the source said



Number  195
Source test case:  ['Opinion', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“Ashton loved his brother so much that he was ready to give his life and willing to give Michael his heart.”
“However, failing to sell, the couple have rented their Beverly Hills mansionAshton willing to give up his life for his brotherWhen he was 13 years old, doctors diagnosed his brother, Michael with cardiomyopathy and said that his brother, an urgent surgery.”
“I think that’s just being idiots.”
“We’re very goofy parents when it comes to our children, but that don’t have skill.”
“'”Where his wife Mila adds,“I think we’re silly at home.”
“And she’s like, ‘Dad, just do your regular voice.”
“And then daddy pig, the whole thing.”
“...pig with an English accent...”
“Also Ashton and Mila reveal that they are very goofy parents Ashton says Do you know what s really funny is I sometimes try to read our daughter s books in the characters voices and she s like Dad can you just use your real voice I ll do Peppa...”
“The source claims that the star couple is struggling with their career because of which they are not being able to give much time in their relationship.”


"Ashton loves his brother very much. He is ready to give his life and his heart to Michael."
"However, because they couldn't sell it, the couple had rented their Beverly Hills, Mancio nashton, and were willing to die for their brother. When he was 13 years old, doctors diagnosed his brother Michael with cardiomyopathy and said his brother was in urgent need of surgery. "
"I think it's just an idiot."
"When it comes to children, we're all stupid parents, but there's no skill."
"His wife Mira added," I think we're stupid at home
"She would say," Dad, be your normal voice. "
"Then there's father pig, the whole thing."
“… Pig with English accent... "
"Ashton and Mira also revealed that they are very stupid parents." Ashton said, "you know what's really interesting is that I sometimes try to read the voices of the characters in our daughter's books. She's just like dad. If you can use your real voice, I'll do PEPA..."
"The star couple are struggling in their careers, and because of that, they can't give too much time emotionally," the source said



Number  196
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“At the time their reps gave a joint statement which read, “Before rumors or falsifications get out of hand we can confirm that Orlando [Bloom] and Katy [Perry] are taking respectful, loving space at this time.”The two stars have yet to address or confirm the wedding report.”
“Katy and Orlando originally announced their split in late February, 2017, just days after they seemed happier than ever at numerous Oscars parties.”
“The pair allegedly tied the knot in a super secret wedding in Prague!”
“You’ve got to check out these unexpected details!”
“Katy Perry, 33, and Orlando Bloom, 41, reportedly had a quickie wedding in Prague!”
““Word in her inner circle is that her recent trip to Prague to visit him was actually an elopement,” a source tells OK!”
“...mag.”
““Katy has never had a connection with a man like the one she has with Orlando.”
“Friends say neither of them wanted to waste more time apart While visiting Bloom in Prague where he s currently filming his upcoming Amazon series Carnival Row the mag s source says Perry and the actor enjoyed a romantic lunch on February 28 where they cozied up together at Cafe...”
“Savoy...”


"At that time, their representatives issued a joint statement, which said," before rumors or fraud get out of control, we can confirm that Orlando (Bloom) and Katie (Perry) are occupying the space of respect and love at this time. " The two stars have not published or confirmed the wedding report
"Katie and Orlando first broke up at the end of February 2017. Just a few days ago, they seemed to be happier than ever at many Oscar parties."
They are said to have married at a super secret wedding in Prague
"You have to look at these unexpected details!"
Katie Perry, 33, and Orlando Bloom, 41, are reported to have had a quick wedding in Prague
A source told OK: "in her inner circle, it is said that her recent visit to Prague is actually an elopement."
“… Magazine
"Katie has never been with a man like Orlando."
"Friends said that they didn't want to waste more time while visiting bloom in Prague, where he is currently filming his upcoming Amazon series Carnival platoon. The source said that Perry and the actors enjoyed a romantic lunch and they were comfortable together in the cafe on February 28..."
"Savoy..."



Number  197
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
“In the latest episode of the New Idea Royals podcast, Frances Sheen and royal expert Angela Mollard take you behind the scenes of the big day - from the bride's stunning dresses to the surprise guest list - and talk through all the highlights that kept us all riveted.”
“The Duke and Duchess of Sussex's twin joy may have been the help of his genetics.”
“'It's amazing...just incredible,' a friend gushed to the Enquirer.”
“'But they won't announce for some time, or until the end of the first trimester, as is the American custom.'”
“Another insider reportedly told the US publication, 'All the signs have been there for months now.”
“'It's wonderful news to be sure - but it shouldn't come as a shock to anyone.'”
“The Enquirer's shocking report claims 36-year-old Meghan secretly visited fertility doctors before her May 19 wedding to Prince Harry, who is sixth in line to the British throne.”
“'Harry and Meghan want to get pregnant as quickly as possible after their wedding,' a friend tells.”
“'They both know that as Meghan gets older, it can get increasingly harder to conceive - and they are both keenly aware of her vulnerability to health complications and the chance of miscarriage the older she gets.'”
“Along with fertility check-ups, Meghan also visited London-based nutritionist Melanie Brown at Kensington Palace, insiders told the Enquirer.”


"In the latest episode of the New Creative Royal podcast, Frances sheen and royal expert Angela mollard will take you behind the scenes of the big day - from the bride's amazing dress to the surprise guest list - and talk about all the highlights that keep us focused."
"The happiness of the Duke and Duchess of Sussex twins may be his genetic help."
"It's amazing It's incredible, "a friend gushed to the questioner
"But they don't announce it for a period of time, or until the end of the first three months of pregnancy, which is American custom."
"It is reported that another insider told the US media that all the signs have existed for several months."
"It's really good news, but it shouldn't shock anyone."
According to the shocking report of the inquirer, Megan, 36, secretly visited a fertility doctor before her wedding to Prince Harry, the sixth in line to the throne, on May 19
"Harry and Megan want to get pregnant as soon as possible after the wedding," a friend told reporters
"They all know that it's going to be harder and harder to get pregnant as Megan gets older - and they're acutely aware that the older Megan gets, the more likely she is to have health complications and miscarriage."
People familiar with the matter told inquirer that while checking her fertility, Megan also visited Melanie brown, a nutritionist at Kensington Palace in London



Number  198
Source test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result correpsonds with the MR
----------
““This is what it’s all about, loving everybody,” Foxx said to the sea of people.”
“On his usual antics, the comedian, actor, and singer even got down on one knee and proposed to a 93-year old patron in the building.”
“According to them, Jamie reportedly footed a bill for 100 bottles of Dom Perignon champagne.”
“1 000 people and was directing the DJ to alternate between Prince and Michael Jackson songs...”
“...just sadness when Katie called up Jamie to tell him she couldn t do this anymore Sources also say that while Foxx was at the new casino s opening he was at the head of a conga line of nearly...”
“.”
“...contradicted Radar Online s report Wednesday about Katie calling Jamie over the phone because she couldn t get over her trust issues Radar Online would add that there was no drama...”
“Jamie was telling friends he s expecting his girlfriend Katie Holmes to join him in Atlantic City the source tells the publication adding that Katie s daughter Suri wouldn t be coming down because she was in summer camp This...”
“According to Page Six, the false report broke around the time that Foxx was in Atlantic City for the opening of the new Ocean Resort Casino and was filming with Mark Wahlberg the night before for his “Wahlburgers” television show.”


Fox said to the crowd: "this is everything, love everyone."
In his usual antics, the comedian, actor and singer even knelt down to propose to a 93 year old patron in the building
Jamie is reported to have paid for 100 bottles of domperignon
"1000 people, directing DJs to alternate between Prince and Michael Jackson's songs..."
“…… I was sad when Katie called Jamie and told him she couldn't do it again. The source also said that when fox opened the new casino, he was on top of conga, almost... "
“.”
“…… Refuting radar online's report on Wednesday that Katie called Jamie because she couldn't overcome her trust, radar online will add, "no drama..."
"Jamie told his friend that he was looking forward to his girlfriend Katie Holmes going to Atlantic City with him. The source told the magazine that Katie's daughter Suri won't come because she's at summer camp this year... "
"According to the report on page 6, this false report was revealed when fox attended the opening ceremony of the new Ocean Resort Casino in Atlantic City and filmed with Mark Wahlberg for his wahlburgers TV program the night before."



Number  199
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Agenda Driven', 'Journalism', 'Opinion', 'Satire', 'Sensational', 'Wiki']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
“#FiftyShadesDarker A video posted by Fifty Shades Darker (@fiftyshadesmovie) on Jan 2, 2017 at 4:04pm PST”
“2017 at 9 08am PST Christian isn t a bachelor anymore Anastasia is changing everything...”
“Critics claim that Jamie and Dakota’s sex scenes for ‘Fifty Shades Darker’ are so bad that they are being forced to reshoot everything.”
“Jamie plays BDSM-lover Christian Grey in the big screen adaption of the ‘Fifty Shades’ series.”
“Christian Grey has a rather sadomasochistic relationship with college graduate Anastasia Steele, who is played by Dakota Johnson.”
“‘Fifty Shades of Grey’ had mixed reviews back in 2015, but it looks like ’Fifty Shades Darker’ might even be worse.”
“Insiders say that ’Fifty Shades Darker’ was recently screened in front of a test audience.”
“According to eyewitnesses, the audience laughed and giggled during Jamie Dornan and Dakota Johnson’s sex scenes.”
“To make matters worse, the audience was laughing during all the wrong scenes.”
“Some critics even said that both Jamie and Dakota were ‘trying too hard’ and that the film is anything but sexy.”


"Fiftyshadesdarker video released by fiftyshadesdarker (@ fiftyshadesmovie) at 4:04 p.m. on January 2, 2017"
"At 9:08 a.m. PST in 2017, Christian is no longer a bachelor, Anastasia is changing everything..."
"Critics say that Jamie and Dakota's sex scene in" Fifty shadows of darkness "is so bad that they are forced to re shoot everything."
"Jamie plays BDSM lover Christian gray in the big screen adaptation of the fifty shadows series."
"Christian gray has a rather sadistic relationship with college graduate Anastasia Steele (played by Dakota Johnson)
"In 2015, the reviews of" 50 degrees of gray "were mixed, but it seems that" 50 degrees of gray "may be worse."
"According to people familiar with the matter, recently, 50 degrees of darkness was shown in front of a test audience
"According to witnesses, the audience giggled during the sex scene between Jamie Donan and Dakota Johnson."
To make matters worse, the audience laughed in all the wrong scenes
"Some critics even say that Jamie and Dako are" working too hard "and the film is not sexy at all."



Number  200
Source test case:  ['Sensational']
Follow-up test case:  ['Satire', 'Sensational']
The result does not correspond with the MR
----------
The total pass rate is  0.3179190751445087
Correct number is  55
Total number is  173
(base) mayingruideMacBook-Air:script mayingrui$ 
